CHAPTER I.
The hour, th' occasion all your skill demands,
A leaky ship, embayed by dangerous lands.
Falconer
.
It
was during a violent storm in the spring of 1708, that a French
brig of war, seriously crippled, was discovered in the bay of New
York, showing signals of distress, and approaching, with indirect
course, to the harbor. There was, of course, not wanting a race of
panic-makers in those daysprogenitors, doubtless, of a similar class
in our ownwho at once saw in the unfortunate vessel an estray
from a belligerent fleet, hovering close at hand, and ready to
descend, with fatal swoop, upon the long-threatened city. Rumors,
indeed, of such an armada had long been rife, and had, perhaps,
accomplished their intended effect, in restraining the English colony
from any vigorous efforts at the conquest of Canadaan enterprise
on which more words than wadding had been wasted, but which, of
course, was not to be undertaken while any peril impended over its
own capital. France might thus be compared to some good dame,
who watches from a distance the quarrels between her neighbors'
children and her own, and contents herself with shaking a stick at
the former, while in reality too indolent, or too much occupied in
more important business, to fulfil any of her pantomimic threats.
Certain it was, that at this period she meditated no invasion of that
embryo metropolis, which reposed, in doubtful security, betwixt two
rivers and a picket fence; the latter being denominated by courtesy,
a wall, and stretching transversely across the town. The good ship
St. Cloud, on the contrary, if aught could be judged from her zigzag
movements, was approaching the city with anything but alacrity,
despite the nautical adage, old, doubtless, as her day, any port in
a storm. Driven from her course, dismasted, and a-leak, she had
been tossed for weeks, cork-like, upon the waves, the very plaything
of the elements, until all hope of attaining a friendly port was
abandoned
,
and every minor consideration became merged in the
instinctive desire for the preservation of life. Foremost to secure
their own safety, a reckless portion of the crew had deserted by night
in the only boat which had escaped destruction; and it was with no
other means of safety for the lives intrusted to his care, that Captain
Sill, on discovering himself near the Bay of Manhattan, resolved to
seek the harbor of New York. That he anticipated no mitigated
fate from his country's enemies, by reason of his disaster, was quite
apparent from the anxiety depicted upon his countenance, as he
paced the quarter-deck of his vessel, and looked mournfully towards
the land. What unusual reason he had to deprecate the
approaching
calamity will appear more fully, if we descend with him into the
cabin, and survey the few, but not unimportant personages, who
were under his charge as passengers, and who had vainly anticipated,
on leaving home, a safe and speedy voyage to the French colonial
capital, Quebec.
Something must be done by way of disguise, he muttered to
himself as he descended the gangway, it will never do for the
baron to enter the city in his proper character. The resident agent
of the French monarch among the fastnesses of the northern forests,
the friend and ally of the savage Hurons, would have little clemency
to hope for from the incensed colonists of New York: I would not
answer even for his life.
A start and surprised look of the speaker terminated this soliloquy,
as, entering the cabin, his eyes fell upon a tall, portly man, clad in
the habiliments of a sailor, who was pacing the floor with an air of
dignity quite at variance with his assumed character.
It was well thought of, my lord baron, exclaimed the captain,
after a moment's gaze at his companion; none but Boswain Bill
could have fitted you with these garments, and with a little less
excuse mea little moreyou understand me, I presumeyou will
pass muster as a sailor very well.
I confess I do not understand what it is that I want a little less
and a little more of, Captain Sill, replied the baron, and if you
have any advice to give, speak out and at once, for there is but little
time to be wasted.
Very true, my lord, very true; if you will excuse me, then,
common sailors do not walk with that lofty air; they do not stand
quite as erect; their chests are less prominent, andandthey do
not speak quite as boldly, or as correctly, as the Baron Montaigne.
Your honor is quite right, returned the other, changing his
whole deportment with a facility that surprised, and forced a smile
from the captain; Jack Beans can reef a sail, or splice a rope,
equal to any man on the St. Cloud, and no man can say anything
against him, unless it be that he loves his grog and tobacco on a
suitable occasion.
Nonono`a suitable occasion' would be the death of you,
said Captain Sill, laughing, all very well but that, though a little
too stiff; I have no doubt you will do very well, but mind and use
no such three-deckers in conversation.
I will, your honor, replied the baron, touching his cap with an
air of mock humility, that forced another smile from the commander,
and displaying at the same time a hand, which, although of no
delicate mould, was scrupulously clean.
Another thing, rejoined Sill, you seem to have overlooked;
you surely cannot be mad enough to think such hands will not excite
suspicion. Remember the fate of the Scottish Queen. But do not
look so puzzled; you must, in short, consent to be literally, as well
as figuratively, under a cloud for the present. A little obscuration
by mother Earth is all that is necessary: Boswain Bill will do it,
and tell him to see that it is well rubbed in, particularly about the
finger ends; I think a quarter of an inch is about the fashionable
breadth for the nail line.
I cannot believe it necessary to descend to these indignities,
said the baron, haughtily.
If this is an indignity, my lord, remember that the halter is a
greaterand that even the facing a file of musketeers in your shroud
is an honor not to be coveted: your escape is now the paramount
consideration, for on that depends not only your own safety, but
probably that of your daughter and niece, to say nothing of Father
Ledra, who would, perhaps, scarcely come to harm in any event.
It is very true, said the baron, and I will follow your
directions
:
but a word now on the subject of these children. Deeply as
I regret that I encumbered myself with them on this journey,
something
must be done, if possible, for their safety and resetle. I had
my views in transplanting Blanche to my western home, but of
these it is unnecessary now to speak; with her illness on the voyage,
her frequent sadness, and her singular sentiments, she has thus far
been only a source of trouble to meand now
A look of surprise and scorn had gradually stolen over the face of
the commander, who, at length, suddenly interrupted the other:
Speak you of your daughter, my lord? he said.
I speak of my daughter, Captain Sill; and if time permitted I
might, perhaps, tell you why it is that she has so little of the spirit
of a Montaigne, and possesses feelings so little congenial with
mine.
Let us change this subject, my lord; I see in your daughter
only a being of unequalled beauty and grace, modest, reserved, and
melancholy; if she has demerits, let me not hear them, and least of
all from you.
As you please, Captain Sill: I am somewhat old to be reproved,
either by word or look, in a matter of which I must necessarily be
the most competent judge. But Blanche's present safety is probably
sufficiently insured: ladies are not made prisoners of war, or if
nominally so, are subject to no rigor; and Father Ledra, who has
both her and Emily in charge, will doubtless be able to provide a
home for them, without disclosing their names or rank, until such
time as I can provide for their rescue.
Montaigne turned away, and the commander gazed after him a
moment in silence.
Safety indeed! he exclaimed, and in the profligate court of
Lord Cornbury; it is the safety of the dove in the eagle's eyrie.
So saying, he proceeded to knock at the door of an inner cabin,
and, in response to the bidding from within, opened it, and stood in
the presence of the object of his solicitude.
Of Blanche Montaigne, a few words of description must for the
present suffice. A little above the medium height of her sex, she
was still of that delicate and graceful mould which gives somewhat
of a
petite
appearance to the person. Although her features were
singularly symmetrical and striking, her face and neck of an infantile
delicacy of texture and hue, her hair redundant in rich glossy curls,
and her eyes of the purest blue, her beauty consisted even less in
these than in the sweet expression, which, while it illumined her
whole countenance, might be said to dwell with more enduring
permanence
upon her lips. It is to these flexile features, indeed, ever
silently depicting the emotions within, that the human face is chiefly
indebted for its character as an index of the heart. Ever legible,
whether for good or evil, they speak while the voice is silent, and
while even the eye is in comparative repose. In Blanche, they
told of all pure and gentle affections, of mirthfulness, modesty,
timidity, truthyet of mingling sadness and disquiet now, which
still seemed but a lingering cloud, bright itself with the effulgence it
concealed.
The companion of Miss Montaigne was a lady of about thirty
years, possessing little claim even to the remembrance of beauty, yet
dressed with an elaborate care which manifested a disposition to eke
out her slender stock of charms by adventitious aid. Her
countenance
was by no means repulsively homely; its parts, indeed, were
separately good, yet they seemed, so to speak, ill-assorted, and
lacking
that harmony of proportion which appeals so powerfully to the
eye, and compels the meed of admiration. Yet Emily Roselle,
favored by that compensating principle which everywhere prevails,
was in part remunerated for the want of a pleasing face by a fine
figure, and a natural ease and grace of manner; and but for a slight
deficiency of good sense and good nature, would have been not a
little attractive.
A third person who was seated in the cabin when Captain Sill
entered, and who had apparently been reading to the young ladies
from a volume which lay open before him, was the individual
spoken of by Montaigne as Father Ledra. He was a man of about
sixty years, with an aspect singularly benign and pleasing; there
was, indeed, no mistaking the genuine goodness which shone in
every lineament of his face, and gleamed, like the light of truth,
from his large grey eyes. Father Ledra was a Christian in the
strongest sense of that significant word. His saintly reputation was
well known to Captain Sill, who, after saluting him with marked
deference, addressed himself to the younger lady, and briefly
informed her of the means that were being taken for her father's
safety.
A few hours, he continued, and we shall at least be relieved
from the perils of famine and shipwreck, and as to everything
beyond, we must hope for the best.
Say, rather, we must trust to that same guiding hand which has
thus far preserved us, interposed the priest; three days since we
little dreamed of even this relief from the dangers which threatened
us.
The commander bowed and continued, still addressing Miss
Montaigne
:
Your father, deeply impressed with a sense of the importance to
his sovereign of his personal safety, is engrossed with preparations
for escape: he has, I believe, communicated to Father Ledra his
plans in your behalf, oror is about so to do.
It was an embarrassing position to stand as the apologist of a cold
and selfish parent before a neglected child, and the mounting color
on the cheek of Blanche told the mortification which she experienced
at such a necessity.
I do not know, she replied, hesitatingly; everything, I believe,
is left to the discretion of Father Ledra, and we are commended to
his counsel and guidance.
Uncle, in short, confides
us
to Providence and the priest, said
Miss Roselle, but seems to think something more is requisite for
himself and the interests of France.
A look of reproach from Miss Montaigne interrupted her cousin,
and if aught could be judged from the countenance of the latter,
prevented a still severer invective. The commander hastened to
take up the conversation, and having bestowed such advice and
encouragement as seemed appropriate, withdrew to his more
legitimate
duties. The vessel, meanwhile, by the aid of such expedients
as her dismantled state still afforded, was progressing on her sinuous
route towards the city, which her thinned crew, wearied with
unremitting
labor, gazed gladly upon in the distance, heedless of its
hostile character, and even of the prison homes which they had
reason to expect.
CHAPTER II.
The mighty monarch of the tribes that roam
A thousand forests, and on countless streams
Urge the swift bark, and dare the cataract's foam.
Mrs Sigourney
.
The
Baron Montaigne had long been a resident of French
America
.
An impaired fortune had originally induced him to serve his
sovereign in the New World, and long habit had rendered pleasing
what his increased wealth no longer made necessary. About a
year preceding his first arrival in Canada, and nearly sixteen years
prior to the time now spoken of, he had been bereaved of his wife,
an English lady of great merit, which, however, had failed of its
appreciation at the hands of her haughty lord. His infant daughter,
then scarcely three years of age, had been confided to the charge of
a kind maternal aunt in England, with whom she had resided until
the death of the latter, which occurred when Blanche had attained
the age of eighteen. A peculiarity of disposition and a desire to
shun society, which in his impoverished state imposed many
mortifications
upon his proud spirit, had tempted him into the very depths
of the wilderness, where, by the liberality of his sovereign, he was
enabled to erect a castle of no mean pretensions both to elegance
and strength. The Indian warriors saw with surprise its turreted
walls and frowning battlements arising amidst their forest solitudes,
and marvelled deeply at the magnificence of their great father across
the water, who could bestow such state and wealth even on his inferior
nobles. The section of country thus selected for a residence by
Montaigne
was about a hundred and fifty miles southwest of Quebec, on
the border of a stream which constitutes the outlet of Lake Champlain,
1*
and in a vast and unsubdued wilderness, which rather divided the
French and English territories than formed a distinct part of either,
Boundary lines, indeed, were drawn with no accuracy in those early
days, on a continent which was settled only on its edges, but at a
later period they became the subject of much controversy. Wars,
when waged, were rather for the sovereignty of the settlements and
the nominal conquest of vast inland regions, of which little was
known by either of the belligerent powers, excepting that they
stretched over a given number of degrees of latitude and longitude.
The Huron and Algonquin Indians had long been allies of the
French, as the Five Nations were of the English; and so important
did Louis consider their continued friendship to the welfare of his
American dominions, that no pains were spared to cement the
alliance. It was this purpose, and the additional hope of winning
over the Iroquois to his allegiance, and thus paving the way for a
complete conquest of New York, that had actuated the monarch in
the endowment of Castle Montaigne, and the liberal support of its
secluded lord. The baron, on his part, left no means untried to gain
the full confidence and respect of the savages,an object of no
difficult
attainment to a hardy soldier, who was capable of setting
examples
both of bravery and fortitude even to their veteran warriors.
The Hurons, who resided in the vicinity of Quebec, and on the
banks of the Sorelle, were colonies of the principal nation of that
name, whose home and hunting grounds were much further west;
they had been transplanted early in the preceding century by the
influence of their European allies, and had themselves grown into a
considerable tribe, having one village near the French capital, and
another in the immediate vicinity of Castle Montaigne, where their
territorial possessions were extensive. The parent tribe were also in
league with France, and paid willing fealty to King Louis, in the
person of his valiant agent, who had spent many months among
them, had given them many valued lessons in the art of war, and
had led them to several victorious fields against their oppressive
neighbors of the west. So completely had he won the hearts of the
bold savages, that they had formally elected him the principal chief
of their nation, denominating him, in imitation of his own sovereign's
title, a king, and enjoining upon their brethren nearer the seaboard
also to recognise him as such,a mandate which the junior tribe,
equally impressed with his prowess, and proud of his alliance,
zealously
obeyed.
But it was not by martial prowess alone that the hearts of the
Indians were always most effectually won: King Louis, at least, had
reason to acknowledge the efficacy of a very different warfare in
gaining their allegiance. The heralds of the Gospel were already
scattered everywhere through the French settlements, and had
penetrated
in some instances to the most remote corners of the land.
The cross had glistened at intervals along that whole vast circuit of
waters which stretches from Quebec to the gulf of the Mississippi,
and not one of its golden links of lake and river but had furnished
the baptismal element for some dusky neophyte of the wilderness.
Self-denying men, bound by holy vows, but more by untiring love
and unfaltering faith, dared, aye, courted martyrdom in every shape,
that they might gain souls to Christ. Of these, one or more were
always stationed at the castle, where their time was devoted not
only directly to their calling, but, accessary to the same general end,
to the secular education of such of the Indian youth as could be
induced to submit to the restraints of study. It was to join this
spiritual cohort, as a resident missionary at the castle, that Father
Ledra had crossed the ocean, patiently enduring privation, and
softening by his unobtrusive piety the prejudices against his church,
with which a Protestant education had imbued both Blanche and
Emily.
Seventeen long years the baron had sojourned in his new home;
long at least they seemed to the gentle girl, who had been taught
her daily lesson of affection for an absent parent, and had spent a
thousand hours of childish wonder and expectation, in view of that
great event, to which, from the first days of her remembered life,
she had been taught to look forwardher father's return.
Montaigne had, meanwhile, contented himself with receiving annual
letters from his sister-in-law, giving information of Blanche's welfare;
his answers to which, always cold and formal, seldom contained any
direct message to his daughter, even after she had attained years of
discretion. The remembrance of some unforgiven wrong on the
part of the mother seemed to hang for ever like a cloud between the
baron and his child. It was not, indeed, without a degree of
pleasure
that he read in all Mrs. Roselle's letters accounts of Blanche's
extraordinary beauty and grace, of her mild and gentle disposition,
and of her well cultivated and well stored mind; but if, at times, he
felt a longing to reclaim his child, the consciousness of circumstances
which must humble himself in her estimation continually intervened,
to chill and deaden all his better resolutions. Pride was his
master passion, and its baleful glare fell with a withering effect
upon all the gentler emotions of his nature. Beneath its
congealing
blight, a young and innocent wife had passed speedily from
the altar to the tomb; and well had it been for Blanche that the
unfolding wealth of her young affections had not been chilled and
repressed by its cold commands or its still colder caresses.
The event to which allusion has been made, as one for which
Montaigne
dreaded his daughter's scorn, as he had long endured his
own, related to his existing domestic establishment. A powerful
Huron warrior had early sought his alliance, and a dowry of
measureless
acres had purchased the simulated affections of the baron
for the trembling daughter of the chief. They were married after
the savage mode, while the wily groom smiled at the simplicity of
his allies, and recked lightly of the fetters which bound him to the
Indian maid. She was not his wife, so thought the haughty noble,
for no sacramental tie existed between them, no priest had
sanctioned
their union, no permission of Holy Church had made it
valid. Little did these things weigh with the trusting wife, who
became to him a faithful and affectionate partner, watching and
obeying in all things the faintest token of his will, and submitting to
all the tramplings of his imperious temper without a murmur.
One gentle word, one kind smile, repaid her for every wrong, and
formed a treasure for memory to resort to, during all the long
intervals
of coldness and neglect and scorn. Hers was, indeed, that
perfect love of woman, which exists alike in every clime. The
baron, conscious that rumors of his strange alliance must reach
Quebec, and thence pass to France, took every occasion to deny its
truth, and to censure the detractors who cast such obloquy upon his
ancient family; but circumstances soon occurred which made it a
more serious affair than he had anticipated. It became necessary
to obtain the royal confirmation to the grant which had been made
by the chief to his perfidious son-in-law, and Louis, who had
received tidings of the whole affair, refused to confirm the deed until
the marriage had been celebrated according to the rites of the
church. He went, indeed, further than this, and threatened his
distinguished subject with his displeasure and punishment if he
refused to ratify the contract with his Indian sponse. No words can
describe the anger and mortification of Montaigne at this
unexpected
result; and, in the privacy of his retirement, he denounced
the aged king as a drivelling dotard, fit only to govern women and
priests. But rage and remonstrance were alike unavailing to nullify
the decree, and with the most galling sense of degradation he at
length submitted to its requirements. In a chapel adjacent to the
castle, the wedding was publicly solemnized, and an infant daughter
of the bride, who shared with her mother the contempt of the
baron, was at the same time admitted to the rite of baptism. The
baroness, for such had now become her legitimate title, became
thenceforth a personage of additional importance in the eyes of her
dusky relations, and, it need scarcely be said, an object of renewed
hatred to her husband. Nothing could atone to him for the
wounded vanity of which she had been the guiltless cause; and all
her unobtrusive affection, all her silent watchings for tokens of
returning kindness, were repaid with increased coldness and scorn.
She was a cloud upon his heart, a blight upon his hopes, a barrier
betwixt himself and that bright world from which he had long been
immured, and to which he now felt that he never could return.
But many changes had taken place between that period and the
point of time at which the present narrative opens. The little
Myrtle, for such had been the baptismal name bestowed rather by
the priest than the parent, had grown to be a miracle of forest
beauty; and as the tendrils of the vine cling to the rock, so had her
infantile graces gained a foothold in the crevices of the baron's stony
heart. Despite his pride, his imagined wrongs, his tarnished name,
he had loved his daughter; and the neglected mother, who had long
despaired of any returning tenderness for herself, was still delighted
to enjoy the reflected beams of kindness which fell upon her child.
She exulted in Myrtle's beauty and grace, and watched every word
and look of love bestowed upon her, with an avarice of affection that
none but a mother's heart can parallel.
Years rolled by; and the baron, who had long been fully
reinstated
in his sovereign's confidence, had become so engrossed in the
duties of his station, and in his growing wealth and power, that he
scarcely remembered the existence of Blanche, excepting when
perusing
the letters from her aunt, or remitting the annual stipend for
her support. Myrtle attained her sixteenth year, a slight, straight
girl, with eyes and hair of unrelieved blackness, with long silken
lashes, and cheeks in which the rose of Europe triumphed over the
olive hue of the forest. She was, in short, a beautiful brunette,
sportive as the fawn, and scarcely less agile.
It was at this period that events occurred which marked an epoch
in the life of Montaigne, and which were productive of important
results to all with whom he was immediately connected. Political
movements relating to the colony required his presence in France,
and the same arrival which brought his sovereign's summons for his
return, conveyed to him the intelligence of Mrs. Roselle's death, and
of the homeless situation of Blanche. He repaired to Quebec, and
while awaiting the sailing of the ship which was to convey him to
Havre, sojourned with his friend, the aged Marquis Vaudreuil, who
was then viceroy of New France, and to whose exalted post, when it
should become vacant, the baron expected promotion. Here he
became acquainted with a nephew of the governor, one Count
Carlton
,
a young man of prepossessing person and manners, of whom
the marquis spoke in terms of the warmest eulogy. Rank, wealth,
wit, valor, and every accomplishment, if the governor's word was to
be taken, belonged to this extraordinary man, who had fled from the
gaieties of Parisian life to seek excitement and adventure in the new
world. Himself deceived, Vaudreuil little dreamed how erroneous a
portraiture he had drawn of his nephew, who was, in fact, a mere
adventurer, bankrupt in purse and reputation, and totally devoid of
principle. He had recently arrived in the colony, and by the
profoundest
dissimulation had gained the good graces of his uncle,
which he hoped by some means to transmute into the current coin
of the realm. Montaigne's great wealth and political importance of
course made him also a desirable acquaintance for the scheming
youth; and, long fasting from the adulation and deference which
his exorbitant vanity craved, he became a ready dupe to the
specious flatteries of the count. If he had up to this period
hesitated
about bringing home Blanche on his return from France, he
no longer did so. Here, he argued to himself, was a ready way of
disposing of her in marriage, and at once relieving his mind of its
responsibility in her behalf. So strongly did this idea take possession
of his mind, that, on parting with his friends, he repeated an
invitation
which he had already extended to Carlton, to visit Castle
Montaigne
after his own return from Europe; and added, in a jocular
way, that he had a marriageable daughter, and if the young people
should chance to fancy each other, he would not object to the
alliance
.
The marquis bowed coldly at this remark, which he
suspected
to be more than jest, for, knowing nothing of Blanche, he
supposed it to allude to Myrtle, and he thought it a poor compliment
to a gallant for whom half the belles of Paris were pining, to be
offered the hand of a half Huron maid, and who was even legitimate
only by the royal grace. But it was in the moment of departure,
and Montaigne did not dream of the erroneous construction which
was put upon his language. If, however, the Marquis Vaudreuil
derided the proposal of his friend, it was not so with Carlton, who,
while seeming to outdo his uncle in making sport of the affair,
secretly resolved to visit Castle Montaigne during the absence of its
lord, and acquaint himself with the Indian heiress.
The baron reached Paris in safety, and thence, while awaiting the
tardy action of the French cabinet, despatched a letter to England,
whither he could not safely proceed in person, summoning his
daughter to meet him, by an appointed day, at the neutral port of
Ostend, and notifying her of his intentions in regard to her change
of abode. Although the stiff and frigid sentences in which this
intelligence was conveyed were almost sufficient to repress the filial
promptings of her heart, Blanche was still delighted at the news; for
her home, since the death of her aunt, had been of the most
comfortless
description, and she was prepared to welcome any change which
gave promise of relief. She was authorized to procure a maid, or
companion, if practicable; and this privilege resulted in the selection
of her cousin Emily, less from any congeniality of feeling between
them, than from a sense of duty to the nearly destitute daughter of
her deceased aunt. Miss Roselle gladly accepted the proposal, for
she possessed the most romantic views of life, despite the dull realities
to which her experience had been confined, and the new world
seemed to her only a field for the exploits of chivalry, and the
triumphs of distressed beauty. She was of good family, and her
lineal claim to gentility was a subject on which her friends were
seldom left unenlightened. That these advantages would be of vast
importance in her new home she did not allow herself to doubt, and
as all the family finery had devolved upon her, she was able,
notwithstanding
her poverty, to fortify her pretensions by a display of
dress and ornament often more gaudy than becoming.
A week sufficed for the needful preparations, and when everything
was in readiness the ladies proceeded to a neighboring seaport, and
took passage for Ostend, where they arrived prior to the appointed
day, and awaited the coming of their distinguished relative. He
did not prove unpunctual; and although his arrival was with that
ceremony of equipage and attendants which might be supposed
gratifying to a young lady, Blanche's mind was engrossed by
emotions
which left little room for vanity. The interview was singularly
awkward and embarrassing; and the frightened daughter, after
several ineffectual attempts to break through the air of stateliness
and reserve which encompassed her parent, submitted at length
silently to its influence. Time, she thought, would work a change,
and nature yet re-assert its power in her father's breast. Visions of
artless devices, by which she would win his attention and regard,
passed rapidly through her mind, and she looked forward with joy
to the anticipated light of affection which was yet to beam upon her
long desolate heart. But, as there had been no pretence of
consulting
her wishes in relation to the proposed change in her life, the
timid girl scarcely felt at liberty to give expression to her feelings,
and the father saw in her silence only signs of moroseness and
dissatisfaction
.
The party set out at once for Paris, where they arrived in a few
days, and where Miss Roselle fully expected to be snatched up by
some ardent admirer before the baron was ready to resume his
journey. This event not occurring, they proceeded, after about a
month's delay, to Havre, and, in company with the missionary priest,
Father Ledra, embarked in the doomed St. Cloud, for Quebec. Of
the wreck and suffering which forced that ill-fated vessel to seek
shelter in an enemy's port, the reader is already aware.
CHAPTER III.
Torn spars and sails, her cargo in the deep,
The ship draws near with slow and laboring sweep.
Dana
.
It
was quite too bad to leave the crippled brig tossing upon the
tempestuous waves of the bay of New York during so long a
retrospective
chapter; but it all comes of beginning a story at the wrong
end, or rather, of beginning it in the middle,a plan which, although
it has classic precept and example for its authority, remains of
doubtful
utility. As the vessel had approached the harbor, the fears of
Miss Montaigne had rapidly increased. She knew enough of the
peculiar attitude in which her father stood in relation to the English
colonies, as the ally of the northern Indians, and the supposed
instigator
of many of their atrocities, to understand that his life was now
in extreme peril; and notwithstanding his unreserved selfishness, she
felt the utmost solicitude for his escape. Captain Sill assembled his
officers and crew, and imposed upon them the strictest secresy in
relation to the distinguished passenger who now stood among them
as one of their number, and the baron strengthened the appeal by a
handsome gratuity to the men. The young ladies were to pass as
sisters, bearing the name of Roselle, who were travelling in charge
of Father Ledra to their friends in Canada, a fiction diverging at so
slight an angle from the truth, that the priest, although he would
by no means consent to assert, agreed not to contradict it.
The piers of the city, meanwhile, had become populous with an
eager crowd, watching the approach of the vessel, and speculating
with every variety of opinion upon the extraordinary event. Not a
few were peering eagerly down the bay in search of the remainder
of the fleet, which they fully believed was about to make its
appearance
in a hostile attitude; and a classic old Dutchman, who had not
been at the university of Gottingen for nothing, talked mysteriously
about the Grecian horse, fatal to trusting Troy, and doubted, between
some most ominous whiffs of his pipe, whether the St. Cloud were a
wrecked vessel at all. It was an easy matter, he said, to cut down
masts and break away bulkheads, and come rolling sideways into
port in a storm, and yet have a thousand armed soldiers stowed
away in the hold, after all. Not that
he
cared much whether Louis
or Queen Anne held a city to which neither of them had any right,
but the destruction of life and property, he said, glancing at a
six-sided
store-house of his own upon the wharf, was a thing not to be
disregarded. A number of listeners turned pale at these remarks,
and some suggested calling out the militia and the fire-engines for
the defence of the city; while others thought the guns of the fort
ought to be fired into the wreck, without delay, by way of
ascertaining
the truth of the suspicions. But, as the troops from the fort
at this moment made their appearance, having been ordered out to
keep the peace and prevent the escape of the prisoners, it was
considered
safe to quietly await the
dnouement
, the more prudent
retiring a little into the back-ground.
Governor Cornbury, in the meantime, with several members of
his council, prepared to pay an official visit to the strangers. He
exulted at the accident, because the vessel and its stores would
prove a valuable acquisition to the colony and to his private purse;
but he had no intention of detracting from these advantages, by
burdening the government with the expense of maintaining a large
number of prisoners of war. The unfortunate captain, having dropped
anchor at a little distance from shore, received his visitors upon his
quarter-deck with great urbanity, and tendering his sword to the
governor, formally surrendered his ship; while Cornbury, equalling
the Frenchman in politeness, courteously declined accepting his
weapon, and at once admitted the officers to their parole. He next
requested that the crew should be assembled amidships, and having
expressed his sympathy for the hardships they had already
undergone
,
signified that they were to be unconditionally released, a
seeming magnanimity which was responded to with hearty cheers.
He had addressed the men in French, but with the commander, who
spoke English fluently, he conversed in that language, and turning
to him now, inquired if he had any passengers.
We have a few non-combatants in the cabin, responded Sill,
smiling, a priest, and two young ladies who are travelling in his
charge; it will be hardly necessary to invoke your excellency's
clemency in their behalf.
Our laws, returned the governor, more gravely, impose the
penalty of death upon any Romish priest who shall voluntarily enter
the province, and the most that we can do in your friend's behalf
will be to allow him thirty days to depart. As to the ladies, they
are allowed the largest liberty under all circumstances. I had almost
hoped, he continued, that your accident might afford me the
pleasure of an introduction to some of the officers of His Majesty's
colonial government; there are pending differences between us which
such an interview might go far to arrange: have I your word of
honor that there is no such individual in your ship?
My lord, replied Sill, slightly coloring, and glancing at the
crew, who remained amidships watching the interview, while the
baron's figure towered conspicuously among them, my lord, the
individuals now before you, and the three passengers below, are the
only persons on board my shipfor this you have my word of honor;
if you still doubt
I doubt nothing that Captain Sill asserts, answered the
governor, whose suspicions were aroused by the embarrassed air of
the other; but there is something that looks like mystery here;
let me see this priest of whom you speak; I much fear his ordination
has not been strictly canonical. Clerical robes have been used as
disguises before now, and if your friend does not belong to the true
succession, Mother Church will, doubtless, thank me for unmasking
him.
You will scarcely doubt Father Ledra after you have seen him,
said Sill, motioning to an officer to call up the passengers; I wish
the church had no representatives whose sanctity is more
questionable
.
A few moments' pause ensued, during which the eyes of the
governor wandered among the crew, and seemed to fix inquiringly
upon the prominent figure of the baron; but a rustling in the cabin
gangway, and the appearance of the priest, accompanied by the
ladies, at once recalled his attention. Miss Montaigne was closely
veiled, and hung tremblingly upon the arm of Father Ledra; while
Emily, unalarmed and unveiled, walked boldly at her cousin's side,
and seemed bent on setting her friend a pattern of courage, if not of
modesty. The evident interest excited by the approach of the ladies
justified the sagacity of the commandant, who had summoned them
to accompany the priest on deck with a view to a diversion of Lord
Cornbury's somewhat dangerous attack.
Captain Sill has much misconceived my meaning, said the
governor, politely removing his hat, if he understood me as
requiring
the attendance of the ladies on deck; let them return if they
choose, or let them at least be seated.
My sister is much frightened, answered Miss Roselle, hastily,
and glancing at Blanche, and is afraid to quit the side of her
protector
;
we must be excused, therefore, for coming into your presence
unbidden.
I am much beholden to Miss Roselle's fears since they procure
me the honor of this interview, returned Lord Cornbury, bowing
formally to the speaker, but scarcely removing his eyes from the
slight and graceful figure of her companion; and yet, he
continued
,
smiling, it devolves a somewhat unpleasant duty upon me:
the commissions of his Most Christian Majesty rest at times upon
very diminutive shoulders, and a veil, excuse me, might possibly
hide a moustache. Your sister, if such she be, will doubtless favor
us with a view of her face.
Which will at least be
prim facie
evidence in her behalf,
interposed a punning notary, who was in attendance in his official
capacity.
Emily whispered a moment to Blanche, who, sinking into a seat
which had been placed for her, drew aside her veil with trembling
hand, revealing, by the act, charms which seemed like a gleam of
sunlight to the beholders. Miss Montaigne's beauty was of that
perfect order which admits of no cavil, even from the lips of envy or
rivalry; it impressed the eye with a whelming sense of loveliness,
both in feature and expression, and seemed, as it was, the reflection
of a gentle and unsullied heart. Pale with agitation, her eyes
rested upon the deck, and it was not until some moments that
Cornbury, startled at the pleasing vision, recovered his
self-possession
.
Here is no soldier, certainly, he said, gaily, unless it may be
a field officer of Cupid; my inquisition is at an end in this quarter,
and I can only beg pardon of Miss Roselle for having given her
such evident pain. The ladies will consider themselves entirely at
liberty.
The governor had been surprised at the facility with which Emily
conversed in the English language, and on seeking an explanation
from that lady, was informed that both she and her sister were
educated in England, and were, on the maternal side, of English
descent. The captain's familiarity with the same tongue was less a
matter of marvel, his profession being one which rendered such an
acquirement almost indispensable. But Father Ledra, though
learned in the ancient tongues, conversed only in French, and
Cornbury
was compelled to address him in that dialect; but a very
brief conversation convinced the governor that his suspicions were
groundless, and he even declined the proffered inspection of the
luggage
of the ecclesiastic, an inventory of which would have revealed
little else than books of devotion and instruments of penance.
I am indeed a soldier, he said, when the governor's suspicions
were explained to him, raising his mild eyes upwards, while his
white locks fell like snow upon his shoulders; I am indeed a
soldier
,
but it is of the cross of Christ; my warfare is with spiritual
evil, and my coat of mail, pressing his hands upon his breast, is
one that inflicts wounds, but does not ward them.
Lord Cornbury was satisfied with his inquiries, and would have been
contented to withdraw at this stage of the affair, leaving the vessel in
charge of the proper governmental officer; but another and more
dangerous
inquisition had unfortunately been going on for some minutes
previous, in a different part of the vessel. Mr. Attorney Nabb,
the notary, of whom mention has been made, was one of those little,
restless, waspish men, who are never content to act in a subordinate
capacity; and after chafing for some time under his forced restraint,
he had slipped out of the shadow of his superiors, for the purpose of
acting the little great man in another quarter. His field of
operation
was amidships, where he blustered around among the crew for
some time, with no well defined aim beyond that of impressing the
sailors with a sense of his importance; but after much peering about,
and many wise looks, he came suddenly to a stand in front of
Montaigne
,
and remained looking up at the portly figure before him
with a singular air of admiration and contempt. The disproportion
of physical power between the two, which was ludicrously great,
perhaps
suggested to the pigmy the idea of displaying a little official
authority, by way of balancing accounts.
Who are you? he said, addressing the supposed sailor in
French.
Jack Beans, if it please your honor, said the baron, twirling his
cap, with an admirable appearance of embarrassment.
Nabb pulled out a pencil from his pocket, and noted down the
answer with great gravity; an action which, of course, attracted the
general attention of the crew, as the attorney well knew it would,
and when he next threw back his head for the purpose of putting
another question, he had the satisfaction of seeing that Mr. Jack
Beans seemed a little alarmed. Several interrogatories succeeded in
regard to the age, residence, and occupation of the supposed sailor,
all of which were carefully written down, and the practised eye of the
attorney could not fail to perceive at each additional inquiry renewed
tokens of apprehension. Satisfied, however, at length, with having
frightened the giant and displayed his own importance, he was
about turning away, when his eye was arrested by the edge of a fine
linen wristband protruding from beneath the coarse flannel sleeve of
the sailor's shirt. Startled at the sight, suspicion at once took
possession
of his mind, and several minute circumstances to which he
had before paid little heed, gave it confirmation. Stepping a few
paces backward, to gain a better view of the Frenchman's head, he
noticed the soft and silky appearance of the hair, and the fine face
and neck, which gave no evidence of exposure to the sun; while
Montaigne, in the effort to avoid quailing, had inadvertently resumed
his usual air of authority, and met the gaze of the other with the
look of a chained eagle. Convinced that he had stumbled upon a
prize of some kind, the attorney's delight knew no bounds; he
continued
complacently gazing upon his victim for some moments,
running over in his mind the probable magnitude of the service
which he was about to render to government, and the extent of his
reward. He must be, thought Nabb, an officer of the army at
least, and possibly a nobleman; it might even be the Marquis
Vaudreuil
,
or one of the royal family, or, for soaring fancy seldom stops
midway in her flight, the very majesty of France himself. Gloating
over his discovery, he reached upwards, and tapping Montaigne upon
the shoulder, said:
Lord Cornbury has released the
crew
of the St. Cloud, but not
any officer or gentleman who sees fit to assume a seaman's dress:
Monsieur will please to consider himself under arrest.
So saying, he turned away to inform the governor of his discovery,
but had scarcely communicated his information, before a slight
commotion was perceived amidships, and three figures bounded over
the gunwale, and descended the vessel's side. The boat by which
the governor and his suite had approached the ship was waiting at
the foot of the man-ropes, the waterman in whose charge it had
been left having been attracted by curiosity on board the vessel.
A moment of consternation prevailed, and the attorney, furious with
the fear of losing his prize, seemed altogether demented: shouting,
an escape! stop him! stop him! he flew rather than ran towards
the place where the baron had disappeared, and calling loudly for
the
posse comitatus
to follow, he leaped upon the gunwale. The
last of the fugitives was at that moment entering the skiff, and Nabb,
gliding down the ropes like a squirrel, pitched into the boat, just as
they had succeeded in casting her loose. Recovering his feet, he
darted to the side of the stalwart baron, and grasping him by the
arm, exclaimed, I arrest you in the Queen's name! but Montaigne,
seating himself without reply, drew the little man forcibly to his lap,
and shouted,
Pull now for your lives! a thousand pounds if we escape!
The whole scene up to this point had occupied scarcely thirty
seconds, and the tumult and excitement on deck were still too great
to admit of any deliberate action. Blanche had swooned, Miss
Roselle was in hysteries, and Captain Sill, fearful of an outbreak
among his crew, was calling loudly to them to remain quiet. Lord
Cornbury himself was far from being self-possessed, and, gesticulating
with his sword, he called to the commander of the troops on the
adjacent wharf, and ordered him to fire a volley into the boata
command which was about being executed, when a shriek of agony
from the skiff arrested general attention.
For Heaven's sake don't let them fire, my lord, exclaimed one
of Cornbury's companions, it will be certain death to Mr. Nabb.
All eyes were turned towards the skiff, where the prominent
2
figure of Montaigne, seated, facing the shore, and holding the
struggling
attorney before him, like a shield, was plainly visible. He was
near the stern of the vessel, thus at the same time protecting the
two sailors, who were bending meanwhile lustily to their oars, while
the little bark was making such headway as the heavy billows would
allow. It was a critical moment; the troops had taken aim, and
the order to fire was trembling on the lips of their officer, when a
reluctant countermand from the governor brought down their guns.
Boats were next in requisition for the chase, but the advantage of
the start, and the desperate vigor of the fugitives, left little to fear
from the pursuit of oars alone, and before a sail-boat could be
procured
and got under weigh they were well out from the land.
Sagaciously taking a route nearly in the wind's eye, they had the
satisfaction of seeing the last-named vessel compelled to describe an
are of an immense circle, before she could even begin to bear down
upon them. The baron, in the meantime, took his turn at the
oars, and even compelled the notary to duty in the same line, under
penalty of being left behind. Frequent changes at this labor, with
stout hearts and strong arms, worked wonders, and in less than
twenty minutes, notwithstanding the roughness of the water, they
reached the Jersey shore, while their pursuers were yet more than a
mile distant. Nabb had grown much terrified in contemplating the
probable disposition which was to be made of himself after he had
ceased to be serviceable; and his alarm was not abated on landing,
by hearing some cool inquiries made by the sailors of their principal,
as to the manner in which he should be dispatched. But Montaigne
entertained no such design, and reminding the notary that he was a
prisoner of war, released him on his parole of honor not to aid or
assist, by information or otherwise, in the pursuit. Impressed with
the importance of retaining his skiff, the baron caused it to be
skilfully
concealed in a ravine in the woods, and then, with the sailors,
plunged into the thicknesses of the forest to await the approach of
night. The pursuing party came up some thirty minutes
subsequently
,
only to find the half-exhausted attorney alone upon the
beach. Still impetuous in the chase, they plied him with a dozen
questions at once, as to the course of the fugitives and the disposition
made of the boat; but Nabb rigidly preserved his parole. If
ridiculous
and conceited at times, he was not wanting in honor as he had
proved himself not deficient in courage. The pursuers, therefore,
after much ineffectual search, returned to the city, contenting
themselves
with the belief that the Frenchmen would be starved in the
wilderness, or be murdered by the Indians.
Lord Cornbury was much chagrined at the affair, and the more
so when he had succeeded in extorting from the fears of some of the
crew the name and rank of the fugitive. That he had had so
coveted a prize within his very grasp, and yet had suffered him to
escape, was a most galling reflection. Rage for a while became
dominant in his breast, and he had nearly resolved on a revocation
of his clemency towards the remaining prisoners; but reflection
induced him to follow out the line of policy which he had before
adopted. They were all set at liberty on the terms which have
already been named, and Father Ledra was allowed ample time to
quit the province. The governor, for a while, lost sight of the
minor incidents connected with the affair in the attempt at regaining
the baron, an object for the accomplishment of which, by proclamation
and pursuit, he left no means untried. Troops were sent up the river,
and Indians through the forest; and extra posts and runners were
flying in every direction, proclaiming the escape and the princely
reward of re-capture. That the lion was in the jungle somewhere
between New York and Albany, there could be little doubt; and so
confident were the anticipations of his being taken, that the council
in New York several times debated the subject of his doom. But
the vigilance and valor which had planned so extraordinary an
escape were not easily to be circumvented. A protracted journey,
prolific in incidents of peril and suffering, was terminated by his safe
arrival at Castle Montaigne, an event to which others of great
moment were subsequently linked, as the diligent reader of the
following
pages will discover.
CHAPTER IV.
Quaint old town of toil and traffic, quaint old
town of art and song;
Memories haunt thy pointed gables, like the rooks
that round them throng.
Longfellow
.
Jacobus Waldron
was a Dutchman ingrain. He was born
somewhere near the centre of Holland proper, out of the range of
all foreign atmospheric influences, and of parents, whose lineage,
traceable for centuries, was of unadulterated Dutch. He spoke,
wrote, read, thought, and dreamed in Dutch, wore Dutch garments
with a Dutch air, and ate, and drank, and smoked, and slept after
the most approved fashion of his race. It had been with many
misgivings that he had migrated, when yet a young man, to New
York, which at that time was a colony of Holland, but which, by
some strange diplomatic process that he did not understand, was
soon afterwards passed over to the sovereignty of England. Like
some huge flapjack, tossed by the skilful housewife into the air, and
ever coming down in a reversed position, such, to Jacobus's seeming,
had been the political tumblings of the infant state, which had
already belonged twice to both Holland and England, had been
now taken on the sly and now by force, and had finally been
transferred
with the dash of a pen to the last named government, in
company with some ignominious islands in the West Indies and the
South Seas. It was a galling reflection to Mynheer Waldron that
his native land had thus expatriated, as it were, thousands of her
loving sons, who had thought, even at this distance, to nestle safely
down under her maternal wings. But he had brought with him all
his worldly means, one half of which consisted of small yellow
bricks, with shingles, shutters, and weathercocks, which were
destined
to grow into a house in the new world, and which had taken
a thousand fantastic shapes in his imagination, as he smoked, and
pondered, and dreamed through a three months' voyage from
Amsterdam
.
He had brought with him, too, a plump little wife and
a still plumper baby, crowing as yet, although of a sex which might
more appropriately have cackled. And thus it was that Jacobus
continued a denizen of New York, notwithstanding its excision from
Holland, the news of which cruel act reached him just as he had
completed his house, a building of many angles, which looked as
old on the day when it was finished as it did a century subsequent,
and on the very steep and smooth roof of which no bird, not
remarkably
sure-footed, would have dared to alight. He shut himself up
for a while in his castle in great consternation, not knowing what
amount of personal calamity to apprehend; but finding himself
unmolested, he gradually took heart, and commenced timidly
cultivating
his land, of which he had several acres; and, finally, growing
more and more daring, ventured to smoke his pipe on his front
stoop, in the face of the whole city. As time rolled by, Jacobus
was delighted to find that he remained undisturbed, and that his
little farm, stocked with some genuine Dutch cattle, and a few negro
slaves, who were then a cheap commodity in the province, afforded
him a very comfortable subsistence. If there was no lack, however
so neither was there any overplus; for his negroes, unfortunately,
were all provided with mouths, and even his children, as they came
successively to light, proved to be similarly equipped; so that, in
one way and another, his yearly products vanished as fast as they
came. He had many schemes for growing rich, none of which,
however, ever came to sufficient maturity in his mind to be acted
upon; but he kept hoping for better times, and fully believing that
something or other would turn up, by and by, greatly to his
advantage
.
That indefinite something was doubtless the very same thing
which has been about to happen to thousands ever since, who have
lacked energy to overcome the natural
vis inerti
of both mind and
body, and who, practising neither self-denial nor industry, look
confidently
for the rewards of both. Whatever it was, it did not come
to Jacobus. The course of nature was not subverted for his benefit.
He did not grow rich, though he grew fat; for as years increased
upon him, he worked less, and schemed more. Eighteen summers
rolled by, and he was startled, one fine afternoon, on rubbing the
smoke out of his eyes, and calling his little Hetty to his side, to
find that she had really grown to be a young woman, and not a
little handsome withal. It was strange that he had never noticed
this transformation before; for whatever his daughter might have
seemed to others, to him she had always been the same little
toddler
,
who used to dance among the cabbages at the age of three,
beguiling him by the hour from his little relished labor, and even
knocking down, at times, the underpinning of those airy structures
which he so much delighted to build. But now she herself became
the subject of a scheme, suddenly conceived, but long revolved, as
she stood at his side, the patient recipient of many puffs, not such
as beauty covets most. Jacobus gazed into her pretty face, and
smoothed her glossy hair, and eyed her neat round figure and her
dimpled little hand, and thought of the rich young Vanderknipper
in the neighborhood, who, everybody said, was in search of a wife.
True, he was a booby, and as surly as a mastiff, but he owned half
the street in which he resided, and many a fine block besides, his
father having recently abdicated in his favor, and gone to a world
where real estate is unknown. It was with much embarrassment
that Mynheer Waldron succeeded in broaching the delicate subject,
for the idea of matrimony, he doubted not, would overwhelm the
poor child with alarm. He proved to be somewhat abroad in his
calculations, as usual: matrimony, in the abstract, was not an object
of aversion to Hetty; but she would by no means consent to become
Mrs. Vanderknipper. She cared little for blocks, and less for
block-heads
,
and, besides that, she had other views; not that she said to
her papa what she thus saucily thought, with the demurest and
seemingly
most submissive of faces. Argument and reason were
unavailing
,
and Jacobus, pondering deeply, began to wonder whether the
weekly visits of a young English merchant, who brought over his
newspaper regularly for the father to read, while he chatted by the
hour with Hetty, had anything at all to do with the matter. It could
not be; for Mr. Huntington, although an enterprising, active young
man, was as poor as himself; and as neither party could make any
money by the operation, it did not seem at all probable that the
merchant should seek an alliance with his daughter. Once more,
Mynheer Waldron was in error; Huntington loved Hetty, and
married
her, before the father well knew whether he had given his
consent or not; and Time, whom no events can retard, passed on
with all its myriad dramas, for another period of twenty years, at
which epoch his great kaleidoscope, being thoroughly shaken up,
presented objects in a very different aspect. Jacobus was still alive,
verging on eighty, as poor as ever, and still looking confidently for
some favorable change in his affairs. Huntington's business had
prospered famously for a while, for he was a dealer in furs, a magical
sort of trade, at which all parties were gainers, except the producers
of the raw material, who were cheated quite out of their skins. He
grew rich, indeed, till even the lout of a Vanderknipper took off his
hat to him; and then something jogged the rolling world, and a
heavy cargo of peltry, bound to China, sank, uninsured, in the
Pacific. Huntington took to his bed, and passed thence to the
churchyard; and Hetty pined but a year, before she slept at his
side, showing that life and wealth are only other names for bubbles
and shadows. But they had not lived in vain. A son, of manly
beauty, of graceful but athletic figure, of open and engaging
countenance
,
perpetuated his father's worth and his mother's gentleness
At the age of nineteen, he had been called home from a foreign
university by intelligence of his first calamity, only in time to receive
the coveted caresses of his remaining parent, and to follow her,
destitute, and an orphan, to the grave. Some hearts are schooled,
gradually, to grief, and grow familiar with its returning visage; but
Henrich's first draught of sorrow was from the lees. He mourned
as none but the ingenuous and noble-hearted can mourn; and when
to others' seeming least mindful of his bereavement, his whole heart
was often flooded with the gushing tenderness inspired by some
sudden recollection of his loss. Mementoes were all around him,
hourly touching some mystic thread of memory, and summoning,
from her haunted caverns, the apparitions of departed bliss. Ah!
little do they think, whose experience of adversity has been confined
to the common buffetings of fortune, of that greater calamity, which,
taking one treasure, leaves all others valueless! To lose a friend,
and feel that there can be no return, not even for one short hour,
through all the coming months, and seasons, and years of life, no
word, no glance, no token of forgiven wrong, of continued love, of
hoped re-union; to know this dreadful truth, to feel it pressing
heavily upon a heart yet unused to its vacancy, this is misery
indeed, and it was that of Henrich.
But Heaven has graciously implanted in the mind, as in the body,
those recuperative energies, which enable it to rise at length,
buoyant
,
from the severest lacerations. The young Huntington became
one of his grandfather's household, although, fortunately for both,
not without a remnant of means which saved him from dependence.
He possessed a taste for study and added largely, in private, to
that broad superstructure of learning which had been already founded
in his mind; and when a few summers had passed away, there
were but slight traces of his affliction discernible in his deportment.
He had become happy and hopeful; his laughter was again heard
by welcoming ears; his step was light and agile; and his whole
frame animated with the returning elasticity of youth. Still
determining
and still hesitating to enter in some way upon the active
2*
duties of life, he yet clung to his books and his amusements with an
indecision that he resolved should soon terminate. He would
attempt something; he would not be an idler in the busy world
around him; disconnected with its sympathies and hopeless of its
rewards. Yet his were not the common illusions of youth,
presenting
the personal aggrandizement resulting from wealth or fame as
the ultimate end of life. Taught in the school of affliction, he felt
that there was something nobler and less selfish in existence than
this; and that the glorious universe, of which he was a conscious
part, was something more than a theatre for mere personal display,
however brilliant might be the ephemeral gifts of man. The silent
exemplars of ancient virtue, visible in colossal though indistinct
proportions
upon the classic page, and the more direct teachings of that
high and holy philosophy, before which the light of mere human
learning pales its ineffectual ray, had given to his character that
moral prominence which alone truly exalts humanity; and which,
when wedded to intellect, becomes, like the blended light and heat
of day, both brilliant and benign.
It was at this period of his life that an event occurred, which,
though singular in itself, deserves chronicling, only by reason of its
sequences, at an after day. Fond of hardy sports, and skilful as a
marksman, the forests were his frequent resort when oppressed with
the weariness of study; and on a fine June afternoon, he had
sauntered
,
gun in hand, to the woods, uncompanioned save by the bright
memories and brighter hopes that spring spontaneous in the breast
of youth. There was a point, a little north of the wall, where a high
sandy embankment overlooked the city, the confluent rivers, the bay
and its islands, and the opposing shores, which stretched away in the
distance, and converged in a hazy line around the shining waters, till
but a narrow vista hinted of the unrevealed beauties beyond. It
was a spectacle of rare beauty, and Henrich lingered long to gaze
upon it, and to watch the shifting shadows that played upon the
bay and beach, as the gauzy clouds sailed lazily across the bright
blue sky. The town reposed quietly before him, sending up no busy
hum to his ear. The shouts of children in the streets, driving the
bounding ball, or watching the diving kite; the sound of the
woodman's
axe and its quick echo; the rattling of an occasional wagon;
the laughter of trafficking men; the song of the light-hearted negro;
these were the city's blended voices. The gleam of the sentinel's
bayonet came from the distant fort as he paced his idle round; the
unlifted flag was seen drooping from its staff; and, frowning from
their embrasures, the threatening cannon looked out towards the
sea.
Beyond this hill, over which the ploughshare of ruin has long
since been driven, was a thicket or dense portion of the forest,
remarkable for its profuse foliage and the unrelieved depth of its
shade. It was of considerable extent, and included a ravine, at the
bottom of which a sullen streamlet proved an attraction to the game,
and consequently to the sportsman also. He had not proceeded far
in this direction, when he perceived signs of what seemed at first
a mortal contest between two athletic men; but a nearer advance
and a closer scrutiny showed him that one only of the combatants
was a human being, who was wrestling at vastly unequal odds with
a huge gaunt wolf. Unusual as was this circumstance, it being well
known that these animals seldom singly attack a man, unless
impelled by the fiercest goadings of famine, the combat was of the
most violent kind, and gave promise of a speedy termination.
Appalled at the imminent peril which threatened a fellow-being,
Henrich hastened to the spot, and for some time strove in vain to
make himself a party to the conflict. So closely was the man locked
in the fearful embrace of the beast, and so rapid were their gyrations,
that any attempt to dispatch the latter with his weapon, might
have proved equally fatal to the other. For a few seconds he
darted around the parties, from side to side, seeking vainly for a
safe opportunity to discharge his rifle with effect; and then, impelled
by the increasing peril of the stranger, he threw his gun on the
ground, and with open arms rushed into the mle. The fierce
flashing eyes of the wolf, his ensanguined jaws and teeth, as he
turned snarlingly for a moment towards the new comer, were not
calculated to inspire courage in his breast; but determined not to
abandon a fellow mortal in such extremity, Henrich grasped the
infuriated beast by the neck, and throwing himself heavily upon him
succeeded in disengaging him from the wounded man. The latter,
staggering backwards for a moment, rallied, and raising a club was
about to renew the war, when the animal, alarmed at the
reinforcement
of his foe, commenced a growling retreat. It proved, however,
a less masterly and less successful performance than some feats of
this class which are on record; for Huntington, coolly recovering his
weapon, called upon the rescued man to stand aside, who was still
menacingly brandishing his club, and making a feint of pursuit. A
quick aim and a detonation that was mingled with a short, fierce
yell of the wolf, as he rolled on the ground, ended the affair; and
for the first time Henrich had an opportunity to gratify his curiosity
by looking at his companion. He was a rough, sun-burnt man of
about forty years, clad in a sailor's dress, and with a countenance
which must have been singularly forbidding in any aspect, but which
at the present moment was almost flendish in its expression. Seamed
with scratches, stained with blood, lighted with eyes that still flashed
rage, his face scarcely needed the coarse, disordered hair, and matted
moustache
which environed it, to seem altogether diabolical; and
when Henrich, suppressing his emotions of horror, sympathizingly
inquired the extent of his injuries, the harsh, grating reply of the
other was in singular unison with his looks.
The foul fiend seize him! he said, glancing at the insensate
carcase; I was asleep upon the ground, or he never would have
dared to attack me; and as for you, young man, I suppose you
think you have saved my life!
Henrich smiled, and was about to reply, when the other
continued
:
But in that you are quite mistaken; if you had let us alone, I
should have done well enough; I don't need help against one
wolf, and not much against a whole pack; however, you meant well
enough, Henrich Huntington, and for such a milk-soppish looking
fellow
,
did
well enough, too; only, next time, I'll thank you not to
interferethat's all! and so saying, the man picked up his crushed
cap, shook the dust from it, and thrusting it on his head, marched
off without further comment.
The young man gazed after him with an air of utter surprise, nor
did he withdraw his eyes until the other had entirely disappeared in
the depths of the forest. Then smiling, as he proceeded to reload
his gun, he said:
I killed the wrong wolf that time, certainly, and should have
received more thanks if I had helped the other side. Who can the
savage be? and how does he know my name?
Thus soliloquizing, Henrich, after loading and priming his piece,
proceeded to examine the body of the slain animal, which was of a
size and species unusual in that region, and one from a personal
encounter with which the bravest might well have shrunk. His
bold attack, however, was very remarkable, and rendered probable
the truth of the stranger's assertion, that it had been made while he
was asleep, and, doubtless, in the opinion of his assailant, already
defunet.
The young man, after examining the body a few minutes, was
about to turn away, when he heard a light bounding step breaking
through the underbrush, and a young Indian hunter stood at his
side. Uttering a quick guttural sound, that would hardly have been
recognised as a laugh, excepting by one familiar with Indian modes
of expression, the savage looked deferentially at Huntington, and
then pointing at the game, said:
Old long-ears; me shoot him twice last year; no usesee!
and turning the carcase over, he pointed out two scars upon the
animal's chest, which were evidently the traces of severe wounds.
Continuing his examination, he again uttered a chuckle of delight,
and taking his knife from his belt, moved it dexterously for a few
moments about the shoulder of the beast, and produced a leaden
bullet, which he held up exultingly to Henrich.
Mine! he said; my wolf! What does my brother say?
Say? replied Henrich; why, I say that you have proved title
very clearly; and if you want the headthere it is; help yourself,
Winny! The bounty will find you in powder for a month.
Nodding good-naturedly to the young man, the Indian quickly
severed the head, and seizing it by the ears, started on a run
towards the city, to claim the small bounty which was then paid for
slaughtering beasts of prey. Henrich, meanwhile, abandoning his
proposed sport, returned slowly homeward, musing upon the singular
events of the day.
CHAPTER V.
She never wanted a good word
From those who spoke her praise.
Goldsmith
.
Mrs. Sniff
was a slender little widow, of active tongue, whose
dear departed had grown enamored of the grave, by hearing it
described as a place of silence, and was strongly suspected of having
taken a voluntary leave of life. If his relict had not mourned
deeply for her bereavement, then there was no virtue in crape; for
hers was of the finest quality, and was selected, with the
discriminating
eye of grief, from the most recent importations. Mrs. Sniff
was frequently astonished to find herself on the very verge of forty,
a circumstance singular in itself, and well worthy of surprise,
inasmuch
as she had been christened somewhat over half a century;
but she possessed a knack at aping girlhood which might almost
cheat Father Time himself, and which, in the apprehensions of some
neighboring spinsters, bade fair to prevent her being harvested in
due season.
A snug little house and garden, and a very shadowy income, were
the widow's, who, with a single servant, lived alone in a retired
quarter of the city; and it was not without delight that she received
propositions from a fine-looking foreigner to admit two young ladies
into her household, not exactly as boarders, of course, but as
companions
and friends, who would pay a very liberal stipend for the
favor, and ask no questions. But if Mrs. Sniff was delighted, she
was careful not to appear so; she really did not know, she was
entirely unused to anything of the kind; but she certainly had some
spare room, and if Captain Sill could assure her that the ladies were
quite respectable, and would reflect no dishonor upon the roof of
her dear departed Sniff, she thought she might bring herself to
consent
,the
pay, of course, to be in advance. The captain, who had
kindly undertaken this commission, by reason of Father Ledra's
ignorance
of the English language, succeeded in satisfying the expected
hostess of the entire worthiness of her guests, and in baffling her
curious endeavors to ascertain any particulars of their history. The
situation seemed to him in every way desirable. Seclusion was a
primary object with Miss Montaigne, who was enjoined to hold
herself
in readiness to depart, whenever her father should be able to
send an escort for her safety; and, in the meantime, to live as retired
as possible, and, above all things, to conceal her real name. The
preliminaries of a treaty were therefore arranged, not to be ratified,
however, until after a personal inspection of the premises by Miss
Emily; an inquisition, at the mention of which Mrs. Sniff exhibited
much uneasiness, and begged it might be deferred until the
following
day. If the ladies were to be allowed to choose for themselves, it
was manifestly quite a different affair. Fathers, and uncles, and
guardians are easily gammoned, thought the widow, but when it
comes to these meddling girls, flying about the house, peering into
every corner, and turning up their noses at all the shifts and artifices
of genteel poverty, that is another thing. And so it was. But
forewarned is forearmed, thought Mrs. Sniff; and no sooner had the
captain withdrawn, than the house was turned forthwith out of the
windows, and thoroughly renovated, by the aid of two borrowed
slaves, who, belonging to a Dutchman, had been taught that
cleanliness
was a cardinal virtue, and quite essential to salvation. Having
thus made sure that no unbecoming sights or odors would greet the
sensitive organs of her visitors, everything was carefully replaced,
the scanty finery being skilfully divided between the two rooms
designed for their use, and some very bountiful bouquets adorning
the respective mantels. The little parlor below was made to do its
best, which was little more than to exhibit through an open window
a fine view of the East river, and of the opposite shore of Long
Island; the garden was put in hasty trim, and the widow herself,
particularly prim, received Miss Roselle with many regrets that her
house and premises were unusually out of order, by reason of a long
catalogue of disturbing influences which she proceeded to relate.
Emily had been cautioned not to be over particular, as the
retirement
would counterbalance many defects; and she tripped daintily
about the house for some time, preceded by her chattering hostess,
who herself decried everything with such an amazing humility that
she quite disarmed criticism. But Miss Roselle was in truth
surprised
at the general air of neatness which she encountered; and
contenting herself, therefore, with much indistinct murmuring, she
dictated a few unimportant alterations, by way of a salvo to her
authority, and at length condescendingly expressed her satisfaction.
This will be your own room, I presume, said Mrs. Sniff,
re-enter-ing
the better chamber; it is the largest and most airy, and the
view from the window is so charming.
I think I shall prefer the other, Emily replied, slightly coloring,
for she perceived that she was taken for the principal of the two
strangers; I do not fancy large rooms, and this love of a morning
glory under the window will be so delightful.
And so the bargain was concluded, and on the same day Blanche
and Emily were quietly settled in their new quarters. It was with
a singular feeling of desolation that Miss Montaigne contemplated
her new position. Separated from her father for an indefinite period,
and anticipating a speedy parting with both of her remaining
protectors
,
she might well look forward with misgivings to the future.
Father Ledra was to sail in a few days in a Dutch vessel bound to
Holland, and was thus to regain his home; and Captain Sill, who
by some private diplomacy with the governor had obtained
permission
to depart, took advantage of the same opportunity. They
called together on the day of embarkation to take a final leave of
their young friends, and to commend them to the especial kindness
of their hostess, who being, as she protested, but a girl herself,
feared that she could not do much for them; but promised to watch
over them with a sisterly care.
We are three young things together, Captain Sill, she said,
delighted that she had so distinguished a personage under her roof,
and my little dove-cot here, as I call it, is quite without a protector,
since the loss of my poor dear ; she did not
say
Sniff, but
substituted the action for the word, which answered the purpose
quite as well.
Blanche was deeply affected at parting with Father Ledra, for
whom she had the sincerest regard; nor did she fail to reciprocate
the kindness of the worthy captain, who seemed to take almost a
paternal interest in her welfare. Nothing, indeed, but the imperative
claims of a beloved family at home would have induced him to leave
New York, until he had seen Miss Montaigne re-united to her
friends, and at times he felt disposed to urge her return with him to
Paris, but the injunctions of the baron were, of course, a law which
they had no right to disregard.
The departure of the visitors left Mrs. Sniff in a sad state of
perplexity
.
There had been something of deference in their deportment
towards the young ladies, which induced her to suspect that the
latter must be persons of considerable distinction; and the airs of
Miss Emily and the reserve of the beautiful Blanche, both
strengthened
her suspicions. Here, then, was a rare turn in Fortune's
wheel; to have disguised countesses and marchionesses, or
duchesses
,
perhaps, under her roof, and selecting her out from all
the city for their friend and protectress. She always knew she had
never been appreciatedMrs. Sniff did; and thought her time would
come, and now at last it had. Her own excessive gentility had
done it all,she could see that clearly enough; and it would never
have happened if her poor dear Sniff had been in the way, who had
always been a clog upon her, and prevented her from rising to she
knew not what heights of distinction. But it was still with no little
trepidation that she looked forward to the duties imposed upon her
by so delicate a station. She would, doubtless, she thought, be
called upon to act as a sort of usher for the young ladies in good
society, where they would of course be emulous to shine; and she
began to think over the list of her visiting acquaintances to see who
among them was of sufficient rank to serve her in such an
emergency
.
There was young Shiel, a very distant cousin of her own,
who was a fashionable man about town, and was said to be on
intimate terms with Lord Cornbury. True, he was a scamping
fellow, dissolute and worthless; but then he was genteel, and the
very man whom it was her duty, as a friend and protectress of the
young ladies, to introduce to them. But Shiel, unfortunately, could
scarcely be reckoned as an acquaintance; for although there had
long been a tradition in the family of her having once refused his
hand at a dance in favor of her newly-betrothed Sniff; and although
his apparition had frequently been raised in family altercations, to
the great terror of that meek gentleman, as one of the might have
hads of his much injured spouse; notwithstanding all this, Shiel
had coolly put up his eye-glass on meeting her for the last twenty
years, and never succeeded in discovering who she was. But then
Shiel was getting to be an elderly young man, and might be
contemplating
matrimony; and with such rare attractions as the
dove-cot
now possessed, he could of course be brought around. Well,
then, there was Shiel to begin with. But Mrs. Sniff pondered a long
time before she could think of any one else. There was the Dutch
alderman at the corner, whose purse was supposed to be altogether
bottomless, it was so very deep; but he was a crotchety old fellow
who cared nothing for countesses; and his buxom daughter Sally,
whose face was always blazing with the unexpired tints of the
kitchen fire, could scarcely be shown off to much advantage. But
then there wasstrange that she had not thought of him sooner
young Henrich Huntington, so handsome, so aristocratic-looking, so
graceful and unpretending withal; and who had been educated in
an English University, and for whom many a rich Dutch belle would
have given her very ears, with their great golden drops in the
bargain. True he was poor, but the countesses need never know
that if he only kept his own counsel, which she had no doubt he
would. And then, he had a love of a little sail-boat, and could give
them such delightful excursions up the rivers and down the bays,
and away off to Hedge-hog Point and Gibbet Island; which latter
place, although not exactly a place of amusement, possessed the
attraction of several capital swings, of such an enchaining character
that those who once entered them could never tear themselves away.
The widow Sniff, indeed, possessed a vivid imagination, and saw
everything of the color of the rose, excepting her weeds, which she
resolved to discard; and having emerged from her cloud of sables
she could easily, she thought, fall back to thirty-five, by the aid of
rings, ringlets, and a blonde veil. If her lodgers had thought her
genteel before, what would they think then; and as to Mr. Shiel,
why there was such a thing as reviving the embers of a decayed
passion, and there was no telling what might happen; so the
duchesses, after all, must take their chance.
Thus, long and sagely, did Mrs. Sniff plot and ponder; but all
her schemes, like many originating in wiser heads, were destined to
avail but little. Some of her aims remained unaccomplished, and
others, as will be seen, attained a fulfilment which owed but little to
her agency.
CHAPTER VI.
Vine leaf and flower had newly burst,
And on the burden of the air
The breath of buds came faint and rare;
And far in the transparent sky,
The small earth-keeping birds were seen,
Soaring deliriously high,
And through the clefts of newer green
The waters dashed their living pearls.
Willis
.
Solitude
and seclusion, doubtless, have their charms, but these
were not found sufficient at all times to keep Blanche and Emily
within the purlieus of the dove-cot. It was on a bright afternoon
in June, not many days after they had become domiciled in their
new home, that they ventured together upon a stroll, seeking to gain
a glimpse of the world around them. Their hostess, who dealt
largely in the marvellous, had held out, from time to time, divers
intimations of impending dangers with which every other place was
beset excepting the ground sheltered by her sacred roof; and Emily's
excitable imagination became populous with buccaneers, banditti,
ghosts, goblins, and witches, until almost every spot seemed to
harbor one or another of these unwelcome neighbors. There was,
indeed, an air of wildness and novelty pervading the new world into
which she had been introduced, which favored the most colossal
growth of credulity. Its many wonderful realities formed, of course,
the basis of still more wonderful fables, and rendered the boundary
line of rational belief not always easily discernible, even by more
sagacious minds than that of Miss Roselle. Sleepless, however, as
were her apprehensions, they did not extend to the anticipation of
danger on the present occasion, and the cousins, yearning for the
freedom of the green fields and the open air, of which they had been
so long restrained, went joyously upon their way. They passed
through the central gate of the city, and following up the windings
of a small creek, which led past some quiet farm-houses, they reached
the base of the sandy embankment of which mention has been made,
and toiled, panting, up its grassy sides, exhilarated by the deep
inhalations of fresh air which they were forced to imbibe, and
charmed with the widening circuit of view which each upward stage
extended before them. Properly speaking, they could not be said
before to have seen the magnificent spectacle of the bay of New
York, which now, with its fairy islands, its romantic shores, and the
entrance of its broad tributaries, the Hudson and East rivers, were
comprised in a single picture, dwelling upon the eye with a most
pleasing effect. They gazed long and delightedly, pointing out to
each other the objects of attraction which successively fell under
their notice, and for a while scarcely conscious that they were
suffering
from the sun of June, which, although far past the meridian, was
pouring its slant rays through the air with an oppressive intensity.
When at length, sated with the prospect, they turned their
gaze northward, the adjacent forest, with its cool dense shades,
presented an aspect too inviting to be resisted. There certainly
could be no danger, they imagined, while keeping only in its
border; and with some trepidation, arising from the mysterious
warnings of their hostess, they ventured to avail themselves of the
retreat. It was, indeed, a temptation difficult to resist. The voice
of birds alone disturbed the tranquil repose of Nature, as, flitting
from bough to bough, their tiny plumes flashed momentarily upon
the eye; and the dreamy hum of the bee, as on gauzy wing
suspended
he now hung buzzing above some tempting flower, and now
buried himself in its fragrant depths. A brook, most diminutive of
its race, gurgled at their feet; and, as it rattled down the declivity
towards a still thicker shade, seemed hastening with fear from the
scorching sunbeams which threatened its very existence. Strange
odors were in the air, grateful to the sense, and hinting of forest
flowers, hidden in a thousand lonely nooks, peeping from beneath
piled leaves, crouching beside decayed logs, clinging to crevices of
rocks, or bending above the glassy brook, and resting their warm
petals on its wave.
Blanche possessed a spirit happily attuned to the harmonies of
nature, and in unison with all its charms. Sorrow and fear, and a
sense of loneliness, had clouded for a while her sunny heart, but it
answered now with elastic impulse to the witcheries around her. She
had recently recovered from the illness of her voyage, and the gradual
re-action of her spirits had been suddenly accelerated until joy and
hope and gratitude seemed to have filled her heart. The sunbeam
was not brighter, the flowers were not purer, nor the singing birds
more blithesome than was Blanche. Miss Roselle, although widely
uncongenial to her cousin in the points most essential to friendship,
was in the main a good-natured girl, and the possessor of some
cleverness much obscured by conceit. Her romantic views of life,
also, were continually conflicting with its common-place events, and
not infrequently drawing upon herself a ridicule, which she was
fortunate
enough never to perceive. Such as she was, however, she
was the only friend of Blanche, for whom she entertained a profound
respect, not untinctured with envy, and founded on qualities which
were lightly prized by their possessorher beauty and rank. The
latter was too painfully connected with the idea of an unfeeling
parent to be the subject of much self-gratulation; and mere personal
charms, in a mind constituted like Blanche's, are little valued until
they have proved an attraction to some beloved object. Then,
indeed, does beauty vindicate its power, and the heart, however
innocent and artless, learns to prize every minute charm and grace
which can help to rivet the rosy chains of love.
Half an hour had glided past, while Blanche and Emily had
tarried just within the edge of the woods, at times roaming idly
about, and at times seated conversing upon a fallen tree: they were
in the latter position, absorbed in the examination of a rare and
beautiful wild-flower, when a quick sudden tramp was heard at their
side, and they sprang in terror to the ground. The appearance of the
intruder was one that might reasonably have excited some alarm in
the minds of the ladies, even had they not been, as they were, highly
predisposed to that emotion; for an armed man, with marks of
blood not only upon his garments, but upon his face, stood at their
side. Emily uttered a succession of piercing shrieks, and fled towards
the city; while Blanche, with a contagious terror, fell fainting to the
earth. The stranger, who was none other than the young
Huntington
returning from the singular adventure which has been related in
a preceding chapter, and who had not perceived the ladies until they
sprang from their seat, stood paralysed for a moment with contending
emotions. He was indeed scarcely less startled than those to whom
he had proved such an object of dread, and before he could recover
sufficient self-possession either to recall Miss Roselle or to conjecture
the probable cause of her fright, she had disappeared over the brow
of the hill. His attention was immediately given to Blanche, whose
extraordinary beauty, as she lay seemingly lifeless before him, was
scarcely less a matter of surprise than everything else connected with
the adventure. He sprang to the neighboring brook, and bringing
water in his cap, dashed it freely and not without effect, in the face
of the patient, who slowly revived, but on the sight of Henrich
standing near had well nigh swooned a second time. The young
man hastened to allay her fears by such explanations and assurances
of safety as the excited state of his own feelings would permit him
to make, and he had the happiness of seeing her in a short time
restored to a comparative degree of composure.
I fear we have been very foolish, she said, smiling faintly, as
Huntington assisted her to rise, but we are strangers in the country,
and have been taught, perhaps, some unnecessary apprehensions.
So saying, she turned to depart, when Huntington begged that
he might be allowed to accompany and protect her from further
danger, a proposal which, in her still weak and trembling state, she
could scarcely refuse. She was yet far from certain that the stranger
was not an outlaw of some kind, but his courteous manner partly
assuaged her alarm, and she did not feel disposed to risk giving
offence by refusing his civilities. The blood-stains were still upon
him, and her own blood ran cold as she saw them, yet she dared not
appear to observe such a seeming token of crime in her companion.
They walked slowly together, but the brook which they were
compelled
to cross, fortunately recalled to Henrich an intention which he
had formed before his recent adventure, of making his ablutions in
its waters. With this remembrance came of course a sudden
consciousness
of his appearance, and coloring to the temples, he quickly
explained everything to his fair companion, and then hastened to
the cleansing wave. It was no small relief to Miss Montaigne to
feel convinced, as she now did, that all her suspicions were unfounded;
and when Henrich re-appeared, with freshened features and smiling
face, the last vestige of her fears had departed.
Let us hasten and find poor Emily, she said, who may have
fainted upon the road, for her fright, I believe, was greater, if
possible
,
than mine.
Miss Roselle, however, had reached home nearly senseless, and
scarcely able to articulate; but she had succeeded in informing her
frightened hostess that Blanche had been carried forcibly off by a
horrid-looking bandit, armed to the teeth, and that she herself
had narrowly escaped the same fate. Her arrival, however, had
fortunately
been retarded by the indirect route which she had taken,
and before any alarm could be communicated to the neighbors,
Blanche and Henrich were distinctly seen at a distance, descending
the hill side, and approaching towards home.
She's rescuedshe's rescued, shouted Emily, and darting from
the house, she hastened to meet her friend with every token of
delight. Visions of chivalrous knights of the silver cross or the
3
golden plume, began to pass through her mind, and she only
regretted that she did not see her swooning cousin, hanging, with
dishevelled hair, across the pommel of the saddle, held by one
gauntleted
hand of her rescuer, while another guided his fiery steed.
Reluctantly pardoning the approaching hero for the absence of the
horse and its accessaries, she was conning fit phrases to commend
his bravery, when the merry smiles of Blanche and something in
the appearance of her companion began to impress her with a
mortifying
presentiment of the true state of the case. As this was at
once verified by her cousin's explanation, Miss Roselle was not a
little discomfited, but inasmuch as Henrich politely took his leave
after consigning his charge to her care, she still entertained the hope
that he might be a bandit after all, who had indulged in a sudden
fit of magnanimity. Convinced that this was not probable, her
hopes successively fell to a smuggler and a housebreaker, and she was
sure he bore a resemblance to some pictures she had seen of such
characters, who were quite apt, she said, to be handsome, with small
white necks, and waving hair. That he did not dare to accompany
them quite home, that he departed in the direction of the woods on
pretence of having forgotten his gun, that he did not mention his
name or inquire Blanche's, or ask permission to call and learn if she
had quite recovered, were so many arguments for her opinion; and
Miss Montaigne, much amused, did not care to controvert a
position
which, however convinced of its incorrectness, she had no means
of disproving. On reaching home they found Mrs. Sniff fully
inclined to adopt the views of Emily, but when the cousins had with
much difficulty agreed upon a tolerably correct description of the
stranger, she could not fail to recognise the picture as that of Mr.
Huntington, on whom she had previously bestowed a glowing
panegyric
in their presence. Emily was therefore driven from the last
foothold of her romantic theory, and abandoning it with little
grace she contrived to throw the burden of her blunder on the
widow to whose unnecessary warnings all their alarm was
attributable
.
Mrs. Sniff was a lady of meek manners, when policy dictated
humility, and she shouldered the reproach manfully, only hoping
that the dear young ladies might never find occasion to credit her
assertions more fully.
To Henrich the adventure was fraught with interest; the
impression
made by the charms of Blanche, and especially by her artless
and graceful deportment, hung around him like a spell. Her swoon
and recovery, her succeeding alarm, and her final relief from
apprehension
,
had presented with rapid transition, so many phases of a
beauty, which dazzled alike in each, and seemed an epitome of every
variety of loveliness. Mingled with this admiration, a strong
curiosity
pervaded his mind. Who was this fascinating stranger, and
from what region, benighted by her absence, had she come, to
irradiate the New World with her charms? Such were the
questions
which, in a moment of enthusiasm, Henrich mentally
propounded
,
and which, smiling at his own ardor, he determined
speedily to solve. Not that it could avail him aught to know. If
the bright picture would bear a close and continued inspection, if
there was no dark reverse to its first dazzling surface, his fears at
once suggested some other barrier, high and insuperable, which
would intervene between himself and so attractive an object. Hope,
like the hooded falcon, refused to soar, and gained with difficulty
even an upward glance of aspiration. How strange a feature of
the human heart is that which adjusts its doubts to the magnitude
of its desires, and sees, by the light which streams from some
coveted goal, only the obstacles which crowd the path of
attainment
!
But Henrich reflected with pleasure that politeness demanded of
him a visit to the strangers after their singular meeting; and he did
not hesitate to call upon them on the same evening. He was
received with evident pleasure by both the ladies, and the event of
the day formed the theme of no little merriment.
It was really very ridiculous of us, Mr. Huntington, said
Blanche, and you must be generous enough not to tell the story
greatly to our disadvantage: please to throw in a few additional
marks of blood, for our excuse and, if possible, the wolf's head and
ears.
It is quite unnecessary, Miss Roselle, replied Henrich; the
rivulet in which I washed told me that your fears were fully
justifiable
.
I little thought that my encounter with the beast would be
the cause of so much suffering.
Do not speak of it, Blanche rejoined; the joke is well worth
its costbut pray, tell us, what were your own sensations at so
strange an interruption to your reverie?
You will laugh, answered Henrich, when I tell you, that at
first I fully believed I had startled a covey of partridges; the
fluttering
of dresses was not unlike the noise of their wings, and the fallen
tree, which is the frequent resort of these birds, doubtless confirmed
the illusion.
This is really quite too bad! exclaimed Miss Montaigne; I
had fully hoped to make you own to a little fright or trepidation,
or something that might make an offset to our fears; but instead of
that, it seems we have all the ridicule to ourselves, and have
narrowly
escaped being shot, as birds, besides.
You are truly unfortunate, said Henrich. I do not see that
your misery admits of any palliation.
Well, well, continued Blanche, laughing; we may at least
be thankful that Mr. Huntington did not mistake us for owls
instead of partridges, which our stupidity would have rendered quite
excusable.
The interview was prolonged somewhat beyond the limits of a
formal call, and when Henrich rose to depart, it was with a
reluctance
that surprised himself. Mrs. Sniff politely asked him to
repeat his visit, and, unconsciously, his eye turned to Miss
Montaigne
,
with the hope of hearing the invitation seconded from the
only quarter which could give it value; but Blanche, with
instinetive
delicacy, remained silent, and Emily, to whom, in her character
as an elder sister, such a duty more properly pertained, saw fit to
follow her cousin's example. After a moment's hesitation, the visiter
replied ceremoniously, and withdrew. With admiration
undiminished
,
hope unaugmented, curiosity unsated, he returned slowly and
thoughtfully to his home. If Miss Montaigne had given the
simplest
form of assent to the widow's polite requesta bow, a smile,
or even a marked look, there would have been a little loop on which
to hang a little hope of favor; now there was none, and he might
not again seek their presence. The rumors of their rank, which
Mrs. Sniff sedulously diffused, doubtless by way of aiding their
design of seclusion, did not fail soon afterwards to reach his ears,
and confirmed him in the mortifying belief that the omission of the
much coveted invitation was by no means accidental.
CHAPTER VII.
She's beautiful, and therefore to be woo'd;
She is woman, and therefore to be won.
Shaks,Henry VI
.
Major St. George Grover
was a man who had made some
converts to the doctrine of total depravity; yet he was far from
being a polemic, and might have found it difficult to tell what were
his own views on that much mooted point. Of an aristocratic and
wealthy family in England, he had long pursued an unremitting
career of profligacy in that country, whence he had but recently
transplanted his vices into the New World, where, it need scarcely be
said, they took deep root, and produced an abundant harvest; not
dissimilar, indeed, to some indigenous crops in the same soil, for
earth, unfortunately, has no clime in which sin is an exotic.
Major Grover was one of the individuals who had accompanied
Lord Cornbury on board the St. Cloud, where he had been a silent
observer of events, had been struck with Miss Montaigne's beauty,
had stared at her with relentless effrontery, and, scarcely aside, had
laughed merrily with Ensign Midge over some jeering remarks upon
her charms. He had at once resolved on becoming acquainted
with so attractive a person; and he saw with delight that her
companion
was a simpleton, and her protector a priest of the proscribed
school. For many days he had lost trace of the strangers, but he
discovered their retreat at length, and learned, by singular assiduity,
the history and situation of their hostess, with the prominent traits
of her character. He learned, too, that beau Shiel was a distant
relative of the widow, rather beyond speaking distance, it is true,
but privileged, of course, at any time to resume the claims of kin.
Shiel on his request did not hesitate to call on Mrs. Sniff, much to
her delight, and to express his regrets that the cares of business had
prevented him for some little time preceding from keeping bright the
chain of friendship between himself and his respected cousin. But
the widow said it was not to be spoken of, and she was sure she was
much obliged to Mr. Shiel for remembering her at all; and so a
footing was very soon established for that gentleman in the dove-cot;
and he knew, as he expressed himself to Major Grover, exactly
where he stood. He did not know where the ladies stood,
however
,
for, equally to his own chagrin and that of Mrs. Sniff, they did
not descend to the drawing-room, and the widow was compelled to
manufacture two extemporaneous headaches in their behalf. She
took the opportunity, however, to hint at the scrupulosity of rank,
and informed Mr. Shiel that she would try to prevent a recurrence
of his disappointment, if he would do her the honor to dine with
her on the ensuing day, an invitation at which he secretly exulted,
and which, after a very studious perusal of some blank tablets, to
make sure that he had no other engagements, he graciously
accepted.
But now came Mrs. Sniff's turn to be delighted, aye, to be
thrown into a very paroxysm of silent ecstasies; for Mr. Shiel
craved the very particular favor of being allowed to bring with him
his friend, the Honorable Major Grover, a gentleman of ancient
family, who could trace his lineage back to the days of the
Conquest
,
and was even suspected of having had ancestors before that
period; but that was mere conjecture. The favor was of course
readily accorded, and the visitor took his leave, with a profusion of
courteous words and gestures, in which line, however, he scarcely
transcended the remarkable exploits of the widow, who seemed to
respond with a sort of mesmeric motion to all the grimaces and
genuflections of her visitor.
It had been a rash and unconsidered thing, Mrs. Sniff's invitation
had, and the subject lay all that night upon her mind with peculiar
heaviness. Strange visions haunted her sleep. Her lodgers had
again proved refractory, and would not leave their rooms, and her
illustrious visiters and herself were vainly trying to dine upon a pair
of boiled epaulettes, which defied all her attempts at carving, and
were quite deficient in gravy besides. If she tried to propitiate
Blanche, she was pelted with glass slippers for her pains; and
Emily, taught by her friend's example, proved equally intractable.
The dews of anxious thought were upon the widow's brow when
she awoke in the morning, which was necessarily at an early hour;
for, to secure such a result, she had compelled a bantam rooster,
famed for his vociferous greetings of the dawn, to take lodgings in
her room. She set earnestly about the labors of the day, and
engaged in the preparations for dinner with such enthusiasm, as to
quite overlook the minor matter of breakfast, a meal which, by the
customs of that age, was clearly entitled to precedence. She was
fortunately, however, reminded of this slight blunder by a voracious
serving girl, whose seldom-sated appetite proved a faithful monitor
on the occasion.
Fearful that Blanche and Emily would in some way slip
through her fingers, after all, it was not until the latest allowable
minute that she informed them of her expected guests; they
were only some of her particular friends, she said, who would
take things quite as they found them, and were not to be treated
with ceremony. Major Grover was so fond of his beloved England,
that he longed to see any one who had recently trod its blessed
shores, so Mr. Shiel had said, and she thought it was a very pretty
sentiment, and one which did equal honor to his heart and his
gizzardwhich last word was a
lapsus lingu
of the widow,
occasioned
by a sudden remembrance of a contemplated chicken fricasee,
in which those parts of the dissected fowl were to figure.
Miss Montaigne did not absent herself from the great dinner, for
she had not the heart to disappoint her anxious hostess, and,
doubtless, was not quite devoid of curiosity to see one of the lions of
New York society; while Emily was delighted beyond bounds at
an event so full of promise. The visiters came in due season, and
were introduced in due form. The widow and Miss Roselle, who
were both elaborately dressed, seemed equally to captivate the
obliging Shiel, who quite gave up the beautiful Blanche to the
attentions of his friend. That these were anything but pleasing to
her would have been quite apparent to an indifferent observer; but
Grover, being quite fascinated by his companion, fell into the
common
error of believing that she was equally pleased. It will not be
necessary to record more minutely the events of a day, memorable
only for laying the foundation of an acquaintance, which the major
strove sedulously to improve, and which led to some striking results.
For a while he persecuted Blanche with attentions seemingly
respectful, but which took no form sufficiently definite to admit of
effectual repulse. She avoided him when she could, and when she
could not, was coldly civil, and ceremoniously polite. Thus affairs
stood for a few weeks, when an event occurred which wrought a
marked change in the designs of the suitor. He chanced one
evening
at a
restaurateur's
to hear the name of Roselle pronounced in a
foreign accent, and upon observation he discovered two Frenchmen
of the lower class, conversing together in their own language, and
in a low tone of voice. A little attention enabled him to perceive
that the colloquists were sailors who had formed part of the crew of
the St. Cloud, and that they were discussing some events connected
with its capture. Seemingly engrossed in some other matter, he
contrived to pay the closest attention to their discourse, which was
the less guarded, because they supposed their dialect to be
unintelligible
to the other individuals present.
From this conversation Grover learned the important fact that the
younger of the two ladies passing under the name of Roselle was, in
reality, a daughter of the celebrated Baron Montaigne, who, on arriving
at New York, had assumed the obscurer name which she now bore,
3*
and that she only awaited some expected opportunity to be provided
by her father, for leaving the city. This information was full of
interest to the listener, and for a while he could not decide how best
to avail himself of its advantages. Despite his self-flattery, he was
conscious that he had as yet made no advances in Blanche's
affections
adequate to his exertions; and it was now a solace to his pride
to believe that if he was baffled it was by one, conscious of rank
temporarily obscured, which might claim an equality with his own.
What then if he should abandon his irrational prejudices against
matrimony, and seek this peerless beauty with an honest love? The
hymeneal fetters could not be as onerous as they had been
represented
,
especially if one were disposed to wear them loosely, as he
certainly should do. Blanche would adorn any circle; her dowry,
if not immediate, would, doubtless, be princely at some future day;
and he would carry her back to England to eclipse the crowds of
Lady Janes and Lady Annes, whose virtuous mamas had denounced
him as an irreclaimable
rou
, and had shown as much perturbation
at his appearance in their guarded circles, as the cluttering hen when
the hawk hovers in the air. He would, besides, have the credit of
great generosity and disinterestedness; for he would woo and wed
the stranger in her assumed name, seemingly ignorant of her true
rank and expected patrimony. Thus would he also pay the higher
compliment to her attractions, and make more sure of her regard.
But on the last point he indulged no fears; the thought of a refusal
did not enter into his mind, and would have been scouted as
the very ravings of delirium. Having thus resolved, he kept his
own counsel and lost no time in inaction. There was, at once, a
marked change in the character of his addresses to Blanche, who,
finding no coolness sufficient to discourage him, rejoiced at the
prospect of being soon able to give him a peremptory dismissal.
She was not kept long awaiting such an opportunity, but found it a
difficult thing to convince her astonished suitor that she really
rejected his offer. It was again and again renewed, and the haughty
major found himself under the mortifying necessity of crying up his
value, and explaining the magnanimity of his proposal. His wealth,
his rank, his family, were all dilated upon as creating a disparity of
advantages in his favor, which might well entitle him to look for a
different answer. But no different answer came. Blanche was
obliged to him for his good opinion; she had endeavored, since the
first suspicion of his sentiments, to discourage him, and she begged
that her decision might be considered final and conclusive.
Grover retired from this interview,not a lover,but a madman.
Opposition had inflamed his passion, wounded his vanity, awakened
his pride, and called into intense action every evil part of his nature.
He was capable of making a mock of every moral obligation, when
his mind was undisturbed; what he could do in its present dangerous
ebullition, remains to be seen.
CHAPTER VIII.
Win her with gifts, if she respect not words;
Dumb jewels often, in their silent kind,
More quick than words, do move a woman's mind.
Two Gentlemen of Verona
.
Within the oyster's shell uncouth
The purest pearl may hide:
Trust meyou'll find a heart of truth
Within that rough outside.
Mrs. Osgood
.
The
movements of Major Grover for the few days succeeding the
events last related were of a singular character. He was much
alone, was often wrapt in contemplation, and occasionally gave way
to unusual expressions of feeling. At times he was closeted with a
rough sailor-like man, to whom, in the presence of third parties, he
talked loudly of cargoes and consignments, but for whose private ear
he had other themes. Captain Snell had just arrived in the city,
and his ship, anchored off Staten Island, had not yet been able to
get into port, notwithstanding the most favorable winds that ever
wafted keel. He had, indeed, a rich cargo of goods, which he had
procured with much labor and peril on the high seas, and he wanted
a market and protection while he disposed of his property: he
wanted, as he significantly said, to be winked at by the
government
.
He needed in short exactly what Grover could procure for
him, which the latter very well knew, and he played his card
accordingly.
It's only a wedding trip, Captain Snell, he said, summing up
the substance of many previous remarks to his acquiescent auditor;
a few weeks' absence, a little assistance, perhaps, in conveying my
bride to the vessel, and your evidence if necessary afterwards, that
it was all fair and voluntarythat's all.
That's all easy enough, major, replied the sailor,I did
something such a job once for a count in Lisbon, and she was quiet
enough when we got back; they won't prosecute their husbands, of
course, and have to make the best of it.
That's it, exactly, said Grover, who next proceeded to explain
the details of his proposed plan, to all of which the other listened
attentively, and pronounced it easily practicable.
It is n't anything at all, he said; I thought it must be a life
and death affair, at least, from the way you tacked and shifted
around the subject before you came to it; but it aint anything, that
aint, and she lives where she is so easily to be got at, too; just let
me know when you are readythat's all.
Grover, who was quite in earnest in his infernal scheme, proceeded
to make the necessary arrangements, yet without taking any one
fully into his confidence. The temporary absence of the widow and
Emily was to be procured; and Shiel was considered the fitting
agent for this part of the enterprise. On the day selected he invited
the ladies to take a drive with him on Long Island; and easily
accepting Blanche's excuse, which had been anticipated, he found
little difficulty in persuading the other two to accompany him.
That there was mischief on foot of some kind, he very well knew,
but of what particular variety, he was ignorant. It would have been
easy to lure the servant girl from home, who was a colored slave
about twenty years old; but as such a measure might excite
Blanche's suspicions, it was resolved rather to kidnap and dispose of
her at some southern market. Unwilling, however, to resort to
these extreme measures, while there remained the slightest hopes of
success by milder means, and still flattering himself that Miss
Montaigne
might already have repented her decision, Grover resolved to
make first a final effort at persuasion. He had, indeed, exhausted
every variety of blandishment; he had practised all those pleasing
arts which a life of gallantry had taught him; but he would make
one additional effort, and fortify it, if necessary, by disclosing to
Blanche the mesh with which she was surrounded, and from which
she could indulge no hope of escape.
It was a calm afternoon in June that had been selected for this
daring and atrocious exploit, and Miss Montaigne, seated alone in the
little parlor which has been described, was reflecting upon the
marked events which had recently diversified her life, and changed
it from one of singular monotony to one of unusual and varied
action. What fortune was in store for her in that mysterious future
which seemed thickly shrouded from her view, it was impossible to
conjecture. Separated since infancy from every near relation, she
was about to join a parent who manifested no affection for her, and
one whose Huron wife and half Huron daughter would occupy
towards her the legal relation of mother and sister. With such
companions she was to pass her time, buried in the forest, and even
of less consequence than her Indian sister, who doubtless at least
possessed the affection and regard of her savage relations. Of
Myrtle
and her mother she could only think as of tawny and blanketed
women, like those of their race whom she had seen during her
abode in New York. It was a dismal prospect to contemplate
closely: but Blanche would not yield to despondency; there was,
after all, something of wildness and romance in the picture, and her
playful imagination gave to it tints and hues which belonged less to
the subject than to the joyous and innocent heart from which they
emanated. She resolved, too, to find happiness in duty; she would
soften her father's heart by unremitting kindness; she would educate
her Indian sister, and surprise her with the thousand novelties of
civilized life; she would even make a friend of the dreaded baroness,
if the latter were not altogether a cannibal, and past the hope of
reclamation. What pets, too, she would have! A pair of gentle
fawns should feed daily from her hands, and race with her through
the fields; the rabbits should burrow in the garden; the birds
should build beside her windows; and the clambering flowers,
exhaling an atmosphere of fragrance, should tempt the bee, and the
tiny hummer, and the gorgeous butterfly; and all these would be
her friends and playmates.
As Blanche gazed from time to time out of the window while
engaged in these reflections, her eye was attracted by several rough
looking individuals in the garb of sailors, who were idly sauntering
in the vicinity. One leaned indolently against a post at a
little distance from the house, trolling some nautical chorus;
another lay stretched upon the grass on the common; and a party
of three, further towards the river, were chatting and smoking
beneath a tree, but not giving way, as might be expected from
sailors on furlough, to any noisy mirth. She felt some alarm at
first, remembering the isolated situation of the house, but inasmuch
as the men remained quiet, and made no nearer approach, her
apprehensions soon subsided. She remembered the ludicrous results
of her fears in the forest a few weeks preceding, and resolved not
again to play so childish a part. She had, indeed, withdrawn her
eyes from the landscape and was again wrapt in contemplation,
when she became suddenly conscious that she was no longer alone,
and on looking up she discovered the detested Grover at her side.
He had entered the room with a silent and cat-like motion, and
there was something in the bland expression of his face and in the
soft, purring tone of his voice as he addressed her, equally feline in
its character.
I have again come unbidden, he said; may I hope not
entirely unwelcome? One of my vessels, long due, has arrived
since I left your presence, and I have hastened to lay some of its
treasures at your feet.
An attendant at his signal entered the room, and depositing a
large package upon a table, immediately withdrew: Grover followed
him to the door, which he carefully closed, and returning, proceeded
to open the parcel, while Blanche, who had before made several
ineffectual efforts to speak, rose suddenly to her feet.
Do not open it, she said, speaking with some vehemence, yet
in a low, trembling voice, do not leave it, Major Grover. I can
accept no favors which I have neither the power nor the wish to
requite; if I have not, heretofore, spoken plainly
But too plainly, my dear Miss Roselle; but ladies are proverbially
changeful, even as the shifting colors of this beautiful silk, unfolding
and displaying a piece of the most gorgeous fabric, and piling upon
it a profusion of rich lacesthese might make bridal robes for a
princess; and here, he continued, unclasping a box of costly jewelry,
are ornaments which would adorn all other beauty, but which will
receive new lustre from Miss Blanche Roselle.
Miss Montaigne looked on with scorn, and cast frequent glances
towards the door, as if with a presentiment that an attempt at egress
might be opposed; there was something strange and threatening in
the eye and manner of her suitor, which impressed her with vague
forebodings; and, seemingly without design, she slightly changed
her position to one more favorable for flight. The movement was
not unnoticed by Grover, who also, with apparent inadvertence,
placed himself between her and the door, and somewhat changing
the tone of his voice, continued:
I have made all allowances for the modesty, which, Csar-like,
has thrice refused what it intended from the first to accept. My
rank and wealth have, I know, rendered you incredulous as to the
honesty of my intentions; you have, perhaps, even heard some
old-wives' tales of deserted flower-girls or heart-broken milk-maids,
whose cause you may be chivalrous enough to wish to avengebut
to you, beautiful Blanche, I swear perpetual fealty; for your sake, I
will bear the chains of Hymen, and as you so much mistrust me, I
will ask not even the favor of a smile until we are wedded.
A passing color and a quick breathing alone told of the suppressed
indignation of the listener; she did not dare to reply; the words of
her companion were those of entreaty, but his voice was in a tone
of command, and there was a menacing expression in his face, which
overpowered her with fear. She cast a hurried glance from the
window in the anxious hope of seeing Emily and Mrs. Sniff returning,
or of seeing some visiter approaching the house; but there was
nothing that gave prospect of relief. She did not dare to attempt to
pass out lest she should learn that she was really a prisoner, and should
precipitate whatever of evil she had to fear. She resolved, therefore,
to gain time by parley, but even in this design she seemed to be
anticipated by her persecutor. He continued to urge his suit as yet
in respectful language, but the uneasiness of his air, and his frequent
outward glances, seemed to indicate the expected approach of some
other party. He was, in fact, awaiting the promised arrival of a
legal functionary, who was authorized to tie the matrimonial knot,
and on whose perfect subserviency to his interests he could depend;
on his approach, if persuasion continued fruitless, he had determined
at once to disclose to Blanche her peril, and make the alternative
proposition
of instantaneous marriage or abduction. The suddenness of the
demand, the imminency of the danger, the few minutes which she
would be allowed to decide, combined with the force of prior
arguments, he did not doubt would overcome every obstacle and
produce a complete acquiescence. But while he waited, he grew
momentarily impatient; delays were dangerous; there was indeed
no fear of the return of Shiel and his companions, and one of the
sentinels was even prepared to prevent the casual approach of
strangers to the house, by the alarm of an infectious disease which
was to be sedulously shunned. But still he felt that haste was
desirable; and although it was not yet the appointed time for his
coadjutor's arrival, he resolved to go personally and expedite his
movements. Blanche, he thought, was yet unalarmed, and although,
perhaps, angry at his pertinacity, she did not, he believed, entertain
the least suspicion of his design. She would not, therefore, think
of flight, and if she attempted could not accomplish it, for the
pirates had orders to prevent her departure, and if she persisted in
going or in making an outcry, they were to carry her forcibly to
the vessel. He departed, therefore, without giving her any
intimation
of his intended return, and only paused near the door to
give directions to one of the banditti for additional vigilance during
the few minutes of his expected absence. But Miss Montaigne, as
has been already seen, was by no means unalarmed; her first fears
had been allayed, but the strange deportment of Grover and the
continued presence of the sailors who still lounged listlessly about
the premises, now combined to excite her worst apprehensions.
It has been said that there was in the house besides Miss
Montaigne, one individual, too insignificant to be dreaded, even as
an informant, yet whom Grover intended to include, if convenient,
in his kidnapping enterprise. Jule, for such was the slave's name,
had belonged to the Sniffs from childhood, and her faculties had
been somewhat sharpened by the necessity of inventing expedients
to evade some of her mistress's inordinate exactions of labor. She
was a good-natured girl, warm in her attachments, and, since the
arrival of Miss Montaigne, had manifested the greatest pleasure in
serving her. Unused to words of kindness and consideration from
those above her, Jule had seen the beautiful stranger manifesting an
occasional interest in her welfare, which had astonished and delighted
her; and the heart of the negress had closed with avidity upon
this rare object of affection. Nothing could be too good, nothing
too nice for Miss Blanche: and the least smile of approval from her
was more than a reward for every exertion of the humble servitor.
Powerless as such an ally might seem, Miss Montaigne hastened
to seek her counsel and aid; but Jule, already alarmed, and flying
from what seemed the post of more imminent danger, met her with
intelligence that confirmed all her fears, and added tenfold to their
intensity. She had herself watched the strange movements of the
men, had noticed their sailor-like garb, and had overheard Grover's
instructions, on departing, for a vigilant watch, and forbidding any
egress from the house. There was little time for reflection; and
Blanche implored the negress to make an attempt to escape and
seek assistance. That Miss Montaigne was the principal object of
pursuit, and that whatever danger impended over herself would not
be enhanced by flight, even if unsuccessful, Jule readily saw; but
even if it had been otherwise, she would have refused nothing to
Blanche. With ready wit, too, she reflected that if she went out,
apparently unalarmed, and as if bound on some ordinary errand,
she might perhaps be allowed to pass unmolested. Her absence
might even be considered an advantage, inasmuch as the
abduction
of one individual could of course be accomplished more
safely and quietly than that of two. Hanging a basket, therefore,
upon her arm, and hastily informing Blanche of her design, she
sauntered lazily from the door, singing, with half-choked voice, a
negro refrain, and carefully dissembling her fears. Her exit was
from the rear door, and her course through the garden towards a
lane in its rear, led directly past two of the guards. They had
been instructed to prevent any attempt at flight; but they had also
been ordered not to excite any premature alarm or suspicion on the
part of the inmates of the house, and for a moment they hesitated
on their proper course. Here was evidently no flight; the slave
would soon return, and if not, her absence would rather do good
than harm; and with this view of the matter, they had well nigh
permitted her to pass, when one, still undecided, suddenly accosted
her.
Avastthere, avast, Nan! You sing merrily for a blackbird
just drop alongside here, and tell us where you are bound to; 't aint
every one that dares to sail openly under such dark colorsis it,
Jack?
You mind yer own business, and git out of our garden, afore
Mrs. Sniff sees you, or you'll ketch it, answered Jule. I'm going
to pick peas over in dat field; `Massa eat de sugar, Sambo git de
cane;' and she passed tremblingly on towards the fence.
Blast the blackamoor! exclaimed the sailor, following as he
spoke; can't you answer a civil hail better than that? bring to, I
say, and show your papers, or we'll blow you out of waterbut if
as how, he continued, as Jule slackened her pace, and looked back,
if as how you are really under sailing orders for that field, over
there
I didn't say any such thing, replied Jule, and I haint got any
papers, nor notting elst but dis ere pail.
Let her go, Bill, or elst don't let her go, one or t' other, said
the other sailor; what's the use of jabbering to the wench?
I
says, let her go, and very good riddance it is.
And
I
says, mebbe not, Mr. Jack, said the first speaker, who
seemed to imbibe the spirit of contradiction from the interference of
his companion; you just bring her to a minute, while I run around
and ask Bluff about it, kase, you see, it's a kind of a nice question,
after all.
So poor Jule was brought to, and compelled to await the decision
of higher authority.
It's a high time of day, she said, with affected wrath,if
people can't come for to go in their own mistress's garden, which
they've lived with twenty yearsin broad daylight, it isyou let
go my arm, you scaramouch, you!
Steady, lass, steady, replied Jack, least said, soonest mended;
I aint no scarrymouse, neither, and it's well for you you aint aboard,
or you might get a dozen or two for your impudence.
With emotions that cannot be portrayed, Blanche beheld from a
window the scene which has been described; she saw Jule
unaccosted
,
nearly pass the guard, and, after a temporary detention,
resume her progress, only to be a second time stopped and questioned,
and held rudely by the arm. While she waited with fearful
misgivings
for the result, the bandit, who has been called Bill, returned
from his embassy, and, speaking in a voice that reached the ears of
Miss Montaigne, said, Mr. Bluff says there aint so much as a cat
to go out of the house, 'cause she mout be a kind of carrier-pigeon,
like, you see, which this ere thing don't look much like, of course;
but then she must trot back notwithstanding, and no words about it
either.
Jule hesitated for a moment; but there was nothing to do but
submit, and with a heavy heart she returned to the house, where
Blanche was already giving way to all the anguish of despair.
CHAPTER IX.
What masking stuff is here?
What's this?a sleeve? 'tis like a demi-cannon.
Taming of the Shrew
.
If
consternation had paralysed the faculties of Miss Montaigne, it
gave new energies to the slave. With the celerity and nearly the
fierceness of an imprisoned wild-cat, she flew from window to window,
seeking to catch sight of some casual passer, to whom she might
shriek for help; but no one was visible, and every hope of succor
from without was abandoned. Yet her resources did not seem to
be exhausted. Pausing a moment for thought, she suddenly darted
up the kitchen stairway, and before Blanche could conjecture her
designs, she re-appeared with various articles of apparel, both of her
own and Miss Montaigne, including the bonnet and veil of the latter
and an ample hood of her own.
Be quick, she said, signifying her meaning more by motions
than words, let us change clothesdey will chase Jule, Miss
Blanche will run away.
Miss Montaigne startled at the strange proposition, having no
confidence in its success, and unwilling to subject the slave to the
increased peril which success would involve, hesitated to assent; but
Jule, disposing summarily of her objections, proceeded to partly
disrobe her young mistress and to substitute her own coarse and
clumsy garments for the elegant apparel of the other. The
dimensions
of the negress were, fortunately, not materially different from
those of Miss Montaigne, but there were some awkward discrepancies
of shape, which it required ingenious expedients to overcome. An
ample frock of the fabric usually called linsey-woolsey easily concealed
the graceful outline of Blanche's form, but at the same time threw
into more apparent disproportion the tiny feet and ancles which it
left revealed. This, however, did not escape the eye of Jule, who
chuckled as she produced three pairs of coarse hose, with which she
proceeded to indue the dangerous members; and when a pair of
thick, heavy shoes, tied with leathern strings, was added to the
equipment
,
she declared that the effect was grand, and that the feet were
exactly like her own. The wide, dark hood was next thrown over
Blanche's head and neck, and drawn close in front, care being taken
that no stray ringlet should peep from beneath its edges.
The work of disguising thus far had proceeded rapidly, although
with but little diminution of terror on the part of Miss Montaigne,
who expected momentarily that the return of Grover would terminate
her hopes of flight. They had but a few minutes at the furthest to
complete their task, and yet the most difficult part of the labor
remained to be done. It was, indeed, no easy matter to array the
coarse and crooked frame of the negress in a lady's dress; yet,
inasmuch as the fortunate correspondence in height obviated what
might have proved the most insuperable difficulty, much was hoped
from the trial. No ingenuity, indeed, could diminish the ample
shoulders of Jule, or close the wide-gaping dress of silk around her
waist; yet a light shawl, judiciously arranged, partly concealed the
defect. The feet and ancles, of dimensions hopelessly large, defied
every attempt at compression, and when viewed in connexion with
the backward extension of the heel, threatened a quick betrayal of
the deceit. Although clad in stockings of fine texture, and in shoes
slitted at heel and toe to increase their width, little could be hoped
in regard to them, excepting that in the confusion of flight they
might escape observation. Not that Jule herself perceived the
difficulty
;
however sagacious on other points she saw no ground for
apprehension here, and eyed the arrangement with much
complacency
.
'Em looks berry well, Missa Blanche, she said; daze a little
larger dan yours, a berry leetle, but nuffin to signify.
Miss Montaigne's bonnet and veil were next carefully adjusted
upon the girl; and to perfect as far as possible the disguise, Blanche
quickly severed a few of her glossy ringlets, and securing them to
the crisped hair of the negress, suffered the ends to fall a little
below the edge of the bonnet upon every side. The sable throat
was carefully concealed by a collar, the veil drawn closely over the
face, and the hands enclosed in gloves of black, which, although
bursting in every part, revealed no contrasting color from within,
and still seemed whole. The adjustment of the curls was a happy
thought, and did more to complete the illusion than almost
everything
beside; for, hanging around the poor slave's neck with a
graceful and tremulous motion, nothing could be less suggestive of
the woolly treasures to which they were appended; they hinted
rather of the snowy cheeks and neck of their true proprietress, which,
with many other charms, might well be supposed to lie hidden
beneath the flowing veil.
Such as they were, the disguises were at length completed, and
Blanche began to indulge a faint hope of success. Imitating, as
best she could, the attitude and gait of the slave, she hastily tutored
the latter to mimic her own; and enjoining short steps, and as
economic a display of feet as was practicable, the parties prepared
for flight. The building fronted the river, at the distance of about
thirty rods from the shore, and the intermediate space was an ope
field, sparsely studded with trees, which on the side nearest to the
settled part of the city drew more closely together, and screened the
landscape from any distant observation. The garden which has
been named was situated behind the house, and extended back to
an unfrequented lane, which, at the distance of some twenty rods
southward, communicated with one of the suburban streets of the
city.
It was arranged that the negress in her assumed character should
make a sudden exit from the rear of the dwelling, and having thus
attracted the attention of the two men who had before challenged
her, should dart around the house, and run towards the river, while
Blanche, as soon as the sailors had started in pursuit, was to make
her escape through the garden and the lane. The approach of the
critical moment at first unnerved Miss Montaigne, and seemed to
paralyse her powers; but sinking for a moment to her knees to
implore the Divine protection, she rose with renewed courage, and
followed her companion to the door.
Jule set out with good courage, and at a nimble pace; and,
turning the corner of the house, was at once followed, as had been
anticipated, by the two bandits from the garden. Scarcely,
however
,
had she proceeded a dozen yards across the common, when she
found herself running into the very arms of a third pursuer, who
was proceeding to meet her, and whom her blinding veil had
prevented her from discovering at a distance. There was no
evading the contact, and the negress, raising her bronzed and
mallet-like fist, fairly knocked her expecting captor to the ground,
and again darted off in a lateral direction. A shout of derision
arose from the other conspirators at the discomfiture of their
colleague, and, with a single exception, they all joined in the
pursuit
.
Bluff, the leader of the band, was a huge fierce man, who,
foreseeing as he thought the inevitable capture of the fugitive, and
remembering that there was a slave in the house, who was also to
be secured, hastened to execute this part of his fiendish errand.
Blanche, in the meantime, had attempted to escape, but her
extreme terror, her awkward dress, and especially her heavy, loose
shoes, had been so many impediments to rapid flight. She reached
the rear of the garden, but lost some seconds, which seemed like
hours, in finding the gate that opened into the lane; and when it
was found, the simple latch became intricate to her confused
faculties
,
and she again lost time in finding her way out, which she had
only succeeded in doing, when a ferocious shout from the house told
4
her that she was perceived and pursued. The sound fell like a
thunder peal upon her excited nerves: for a moment she moved
slowly, and seemed, like the victim of a nightmare, to struggle
against invisible fetters, but at the next, she darted forward, not
towards the thoroughfare, as she had intended, but, unconscious of
her course, in an opposite direction.
The lane extended northward to a field, in which, at a
considerable
distance west, a farm-house was visible, and towards this refuge
Blanche now directed her steps. Despair gave her energy, and
when once fairly in progress, she fled almost with the fleetness of the
deer; but Bluff had reached the lane at a few bounds, and she
heard his clattering feet behind her, and the hoarse imprecations
and threats with which he called upon her to stop, seemed uttered
almost in her ear. Every instant she expected to feel his grasp
upon her shoulder, yet still her fate was suspended. The
farm-house
was no longer distant, but she felt her strength departing, and
her senses failing; fences and trees were flying indistinctly past her,
the sky grew dark, the earth was in motion on every side, and now
it rose up before her like a wall, and smote her hot forehead, and
she lay stretched at length upon its surface, with mingled voices
ringing in her ear. How long she thus lay she could not tell; she
had not fainted, but was in that half swooning state in which the
senses receive but imperfect impressions from the outer world, and
give to realities all the wildness of a dream. She did not forget
her peculiar peril, but still expected momentarily to feel the
clutching
hand of her pursuer upon her person, and to be dragged
forcibly away.
But a better fate was in reserve. The house towards which she
had thus inadvertently fled, proved to be the dwelling of Jacobus
Waldron. Huntington, from the window of his study, had
perceived
the chase, and suspecting something wrong, had snatched his
gun, and hastened out to meet the fugitive. A glance at the
foremost
figure told him it was Jule, the slave of his neighbor Sniff, and
another view informed him that the pursuer was none other than
the rude sailor whom he had encountered in the forest. The
recognition was mutual; and the pirate, uttering a triple volley of
oaths, abandoned the chase, and proceeded to retrace his steps.
Though baffled, he thought, in obtaining the negress, the main
object of his expedition was secured; and although Grover would be
sorely disappointed at a mischance which might reveal his outrage
to the public, the slave could not be a witness against him in any
criminal prosecution, nor did she personally know anything that
connected him with the transaction. Thus consoling himself for his
defeat, he hastened to rejoin his companions.
Huntington had seen Mrs. Sniff and Emily driving out of town a
few hours before in company with Shiel, and had not doubted that
Blanche was also with them; his first decided impression, therefore,
was that some piratical fellow had seized so favorable an opportunity
to kidnap the slave for the purpose of transporting her on his next
cruise, to some neighboring market. Such an event would not be
without precedent in those early days of the commonwealth when
crime stalked abroad in every shape, and by reason of its frequency
and familiarity to the view seemed shorn of half its hideous
proportions. Anxious, however, to solve the mystery, although
unalarmed about Blanche, Henrich turned quickly to the prostrate
figure before him, and touching it not lightly with his gun, bade the
slave arise and tell him what had happened.
Get up, Jule, get up! he said, you are safe enough now;
stand up quickly, and tell me what is the matter; the poor thing!
he continued, stooping and shaking her roughly by the arm, thinks
she is half way to Virginia by this;
stand up
, I say, you simpleton,
I don't think your delicate nerves are quite shattered yetstand up!
Blanche still bewildered, rose with difficulty, half conscious that
she was saved, yet ignorant of her preserver, and vainly trying to
comprehend the singular language in which she was addressed.
There, don't show off any more airs nowyou are more
frightened than hurt, I assure you, said Henrich, somewhat
harshly.
Why do you speak to me thus? exclaimed Blanche imploringly
and with tearsat the same time throwing back her hood: do
you not see that I am in distress?
It was an exceedingly fortunate thing for Henrich that he was
not standing at that moment upon some precipice, or beside some
terrestrial chasm, into which he could have leaped and buried the
burning shame and grief which overwhelmed him, as he saw to
whom his coarse reproachful language had been directed.
Is it indeed you, Miss Roselle? he said at length, speaking
with difficulty; how,why do I find you in this disguise? You
cannot believe I would have spoken thus to
you;
tell me what has
happened, and let me first secure you a refuge, and then avenge
your wrongs.
Blanche, now fully restored to memory, glanced at her servile
dress, and smiled faintly as she replied: I understand it all now;
but poor Jule is in danger; she has risked her life for me, and is
doubtless at this moment in the hands of the pirates; you look
surprised, but I cannot explain now; Heaven has preserved my life
by her meansand yours; and something must be done to save
her.
Huntington promised to make every effort to accomplish this
object, and hastened to conduct Blanche to his own home for
safety, while he should proceed to alarm the authorities, little hoping,
however, that so slight an offence as stealing a slave would arouse
them to any very vigorous action.
Do not think me ungrateful to you, Blanche continued, as they
walked hastily along; my thoughts are still in a tumult of
excitement
,
and if you knew from what a fate the poor African has saved
me, you would not wonder that I am anxious for her safety.
You give me the best proof that you are incapable of ingratitude,
Miss Roselle, replied Henrich, when you manifest so great an
interest in an humble slave; but do not be alarmed for the girl
they can scarcely meditate any harm against her, and I hope it will
be an easy matter to procure her release.
Blanche was soon under the steep roof of old Jacobus, and in the
especial charge of that worthy, who welcomed her very heartily, and
made some violent efforts to comprehend the affair, but without any
corresponding success. That the stranger was really the serving girl
of his neighbor Sniff, turned white with excessive fear, was among
the most prominent of his conjectures, but one that seemed open to
doubt. Henrich departed on his errand, but not without being
reminded by Blanche, with the slightest perceptible change of color,
that she was not unreasonable enough to expect him to incur any
personal peril in his mission: indeed, that she considered it her duty
to protest against his doing so.
CHAPTER X.
I saw her hand: she has a leathern hand,
A freestone colored hand.
Shakspeare. As you Like it
.
When
Jule, after her remarkable pugilistic feat, started anew
upon her race, it was, at first, with confused and ill-directed efforts.
She found herself headed off, to use an expressive phrase, in every
attempt to approach any settled quarter of the city; and the nearest
dwelling in the direction which she was compelled to take was so
remote, as to afford but little hope that she could reach it before
being overtaken. She resolved, however, to try; for she was strong
and active, and notwithstanding the restraints of her novel dress,
made no inconsiderable progress. Her tight, cramping shoes were
the principal impediment to speed, and these she resolved to discard;
an operation which resulted in a decided expansion of the released
members, and enabled them to get, what in the vocabulary of the
fancy would be called a better
bite
of the ground. Her speed now
visibly increased, and her panting pursuers beheld with astonishment
her prodigious exploits both of strength and agility. Nothing
seemed to impede her flight; hill and valley were alike easily
overcome
;
if a ditch interposed, Jule went over at a flying leap, and the
fences were either passed, in quadrupedal mode, through chinks and
gaps, or else were surmounted and bestridden in a manner less elegant
than energetic; retaining, withal, many torn trophies-from her dress,
and holding them up fluttering to the wind.
For a while everything promised success, and her chagrined
pursuers
,
lagging in the chase, strove by loud threats to terrify her into
submission. Little would Jule have heeded threats, but her violent
efforts had caused a rapid expenditure of strength; and while her
anticipated refuge was yet at a long distance, her speed began
visibly to decrease. She could not rally; the pirates gained rapidly
upon her, and her capture became inevitable. With ready sagacity,
therefore, she readjusted her dress in order to prolong the deception
in regard to her person; for she did not, of course, know whether
Blanche's safety was yet secured, or whether she had even gained
courage to leave the house. She had barely time for this precaution
before she found herself in the rude grasp of her captors, who vented
many an oath upon her stubbornness, and placing her between two
of their number, proceeded to retrace their steps.
Jule did not struggle or speak; all her thoughts were for the
safety of Blanche, and her only efforts were to avoid discovery. The
party proceeded rapidly to their boats, and in ten minutes were
gliding across the water in the direction of a ship, which lay anchored
near the opposite side of the river; in a still shorter time,
subsequently
,
the veiled slave was sitting alone and undisturbed in its cabin.
Mr. Boatswain Bluff, meanwhile, had sought out Major Grover,
and informed him of the flight of Miss Montaigne, of her capture,
and of the escape of the slave; and the major, both mortified and
angry at Blanche's continued resistance to his suit, rejoiced at an
extremity which would no longer admit of compromise or retraction.
He at once accompanied Bluff on board the vessel, listening,
meanwhile
,
with much astonishment to the narrative of Blanche's
wonderful exploits, both in pugilism and locomotion.
She's a Tartar, sir, she is, said Bluff, begging your honor's
pardon; Bill Sweeps' eye, sir, is as good as out, and he aint any
baby to handle either; your honor would do well to be careful how
you speak her.
The most timid of animals will show courage and strength when
driven to extremities, replied Grover; and yet it seems wonderful
that even desperation could give power to one so very delicate.
Not
so delicate, your honor, returned Bluff, bending to his oars
she's got a fist, sir
A
fist
, Bluff?
Like a sledge-hammer! said the boatswain.
You are a fool, replied Grover, her hand is like a child's, small,
white, and dimpledit could not stagger a kittenBill Sweeps must
have fallen from mere fright.
Well, sir, it aint for me to dispute your honor, but seein' is
believin', and mayhap your honor 'll see and believe by and bybut
I
say she has a fistand feet too, that aint no trifles!
Her feet are like a doll'slike a fairy's, like a Chinese princess's,
small, and of the most exquisite symmetry, and her ancles are like
like
Like a cricket-club, I swear, said Bluff, laughing, and she made
a very liberal display of them, too, in scampering across fields,
jumping
ditches, and tumbling over fences.
Grover, now thoroughly incensed, was about to reply angrily,
but remembering the importance of keeping on good terms with the
outlaw, he suppressed his wrath as he best could. Since he had
stooped to converse familiarly with his companion, he could scarcely
complain that the latter took some license, and even perpetrated a
few jokes at his expense. The sailor's propensity for fun, together
with a desire to magnify the difficulties of a very simple achievement,
was, he was convinced, at the bottom of all his marvellous stories.
Well, well, he said, a joke's a joke, and you are welcome to
yours; I only wish, since you had your eyes so wide open, that you
had managed to capture the wenchit don't speak very well
for five strong men that one woman has baffled them altogether,
and another almost.
Fact, sir, fact, replied the boatswain, that's a disgrace to our
flag, that is; Joe Bluff feels it to his fingers' ends, he does, and if
your honor wants a wench to wait on the lady, I'll go and pick one
up yet, somewhere.
Grover, of course, declined this offer, and as they had now reached
the vessel, their colloquy came to a close. Everything was ready
for instantaneous departure, the wind was fair, and the major was
not disposed to create any delay. He conversed for a few moments
with the captain, and while the ship was brought around, he
descended into the cabin, and found himself alone with the prisoner.
Jule had seen his approach to the ship, she felt assured of Miss
Montaigne's safety, and there was no longer any necessity for
continuing
her deception, yet she trembled for the result of a disclosure,
and uncertain how best to accomplish it, sat hesitating, and nearly
stupefied with terror, when Grover made his appearance. Her hands,
from which, for convenience, she had removed the gloves, were
concealed
beneath her veil, which was of ample dimensions, and of a
favoring hue, and although there was everything in the outline of
her figure, and in its general air, to confirm suspicion, when once
fairly aroused, there was nothing of itself sufficient to unsettle an
existing prepossession. Fatigue, flight, and distress, accounted for
everything unusual or awkward, and the well-known curls, fluttering
like aspen leaves, with the emotion that shook every part of the poor
girl's frame, seemed a proof of identity, equal to a notary's
certificate
,
sealed and stamped.
Grover hastened to address her in a tone of apology and
condolence
.
Her own rash action, he said, had precipitated an event which
really need not have occurred, and which he had not anticipated;
he was most sorry for any alarm or trouble which it had occasioned
her, and hoped everything would be imputed only to the excess of
his passion.
And now, he said, dear Blanche, let this farce come to an
end; only pledge me solemnly your faith, and we will return at
once to land, and our wedding shall be celebrated with princely
magnificence; I need not urge that you are in my power; that
you have no possible escape; that we are bound on a three weeks'
cruise, and that when we return, you will no longer have the power
4*
of choicesee, we are even now dropping down the stream! A
sob, and the sound of hurried respiration, were the only reply:
an increased tremor shook the frame of the captive, and the little
glossy ringlets danced like electrified feathers.
You do not speak harshly to me, continued Groveryou will
relentyou will not withstand the ardor of a devotion, which has so
nearly driven me to madness.
The chattering of teeth beneath the veil, and a choked and
indistinct
articulation at length manifested an attempt to reply.
Speak but one word of encouragement! exclaimed Grover, in
an excitement of suspense.
Boo-ooh-ooh! exclaimed Jule, crying hysterically, like a child,
and with no musical intonation.
Rage has no tears, said Grover, and these are auspicious
signscalm yourself, dear Blanche! Thus saying, he touched with
gentlest motion the lace-encircled wrist which lay nearest to him,
and sought to draw the appendant hand from beneath the veil.
It came! Was it a serpent with protruded fangs? Was it a
Leyden battery, triply charged? or why has the suitor sprung
backward
from the contact, with a face in which every lineament is
wrought to madness,with ashen lips, that quiver but do not speak,
with eyes riveted, as by some horrid fascination, upon the object
which he has revealed? Ungloved, the broad, black, bony member
lay before him, with its huge knuckles, and the club-like
termini
of
its fingers, proclaiming the whole story of his discomfiture and
disgrace
.
It was no dream, no
diablerie
, no freak of a frightened
imagination,but an awful, evident, insurmountable reality, destined
to whelm him with ridicule unprecedented and unending. Breath,
speech, and the power of motion returned at length, and the roar of
an unbridled rage ascending to the deck, drew the leading ruffians
wondering to the cabin door; the discovery flew from mouth to
mouth, until the boisterous merriment of the crew outsounded the
tumult below, and for a while defied every attempt at control. The
cabin was at once filled with wide-grinning faces, and the slave,
expecting death, yet plucking up spirit, had retreated to the wall,
and assumed an attitude of defiance, as with glaring eyes she
watched the movements of her captors. Grover, with clenched fists,
stood at her side, trampling unconsciously upon his tasselled cap,
and incoherently questioning both the prisoner and the crest-fallen
Bluff, who, as the leader of the kidnapping expedition, was chiefly
chargeable with its failure.
What devil prompted you to this deceit? he said fiercely to
the former.
I did it
mysef
, said Jule, boldly, if you kill me for it; Missa
Blanche was good to Julenobody was ever good to Jule before
and nowand now, I have saved her life, and I'm glad of it.
You're an idiot! retorted Grover, stamping with passion, and
you shall be drowned like a rat for your painsoverboard with the
chattering baboon! he continued, turning to the men.
The pirates looked at each other, at Bluff, and at their captain,
who, smiling under a hideous mustache, had been, from the
back-ground
,
a silent observer of events. The boatswain, willing to do
something towards wiping out his own disgrace, but unused to
receiving orders excepting from his leader, stepped forward, and
looked to the latter for approval.
Come, dispatch! shouted Grover; we'll show her how to
walk a plank with a spring to itdrag her along!
No one stirred; and Grover, glancing fiercely around the room,
caught the eye of the captain, who, coming forward at the same
moment, said:
Major Grover, this ere job wasn't in the agreement at all; and
though I aint very squeamish about sich matters, yet it's rather
dangerous here in port, and my boys shan't have nothing to do with
ithowsomever, major, ef
you
want to drownd the wenchwhy
there she is, and there's the waternobody shan't interfere!
Let him try it! said Jule, with defiance.
Grover foamed with rage: Give me a pistol, then! he
exclaimed, turning to Bluff, who handed him one of a pair, which
was stuck in his belt; Stand back there, boys,; we'll try the
toughness of her hidestand back!
But at this moment a shout of fair play! rang from one side of
the cabin, and a large negro, one of the crew, crowding himself
forward, rushed up to Jule, and placed one of his own pistols in her
hand;fair play! he said,don't shoot the child down like a
wolfif pistols is the word, let 'em both have 'em!
The movement appealed strongly to the sympathies of the
pirates, as well as to their rude sense of justice, and the novelty of
the idea was irresistibly attractive. The captain, solicitous for
Grover's
safety, attempted to interfere, and ordered the slave to be
disarmed; but the clamor outsounded his authority, and no one
offered to obey, which might indeed have proved a dangerous
undertaking. The men fell back to clear a space for the combat,
but Grover, declining so extraordinary a duel, had mingled with the
retreating phalanx, and quite disappeared from the view of his
antagonist.
Still frantic with wrath, he yet had sense to perceive his ludicrous
position, and would have needed but little additional goading to
cause him to turn his weapon upon himself. He went upon deck,
and sought the fresh air, postponing for a few minutes his still
determined revenge; but delay brought reflection, and a change
of views. He was a bad man, but not bad enough, excepting in
the very boiling of passion, to murder one whose only fault had
been fidelity to a friend. Perhaps he might still have accomplished
such an object if he had persisted in it; but he was heartily
sickened
of the whole transaction, and asked for nothing but to be
quietly put on shore. He made no terms about the negress, never
doubting that she would be carried away and sold, inasmuch as the
business of slave-snatching was quite profitable, and frequently
formed an interlude to the more legitimate pursuits of the pirates.
Captain Snell did not dare, after so bungling a piece of business, as
he called it, to return to port, and was compelled to seek some
other market for his cargo; he parted with his guest with many
apologies, and, mindful that he might yet find the services of the
major highly valuable in so growing an emporium as New York,
made him heartily welcome to the specimens of silks, laces, etc.,
which the latter had received, and which, having been left on the
premises of Mrs. Sniff, became a windfall of the first magnitude to
that lady.
But the worst of men have some human sympathies unseared.
The ruffians had been struck with admiration at Jule's whole
conduct
;
her craft and courage especially eliciting their praise. Her
fellow African interceded earnestly for her release, and the popular
voice deciding it, she was set ashore the same afternoon on the
Long Island side of the bay, a few miles south of the city.
CHAPTER XI.
He who stems a stream with sand,
And fetters flame with flaxen band,
Has yet a harder task to prove
By firm resolve to conquer love.
Scott
.
When
Henrich returned from his fruitless quest after the slave,
he found Miss Montaigne still trembling with unsubdued excitement,
and fearful that even her present refuge might afford no sufficient
protection against her lawless persecutor. She had started at every
sound during his absence, and felt as if she were again exposed to
all the perils which had so recently impended over her; her fears
had been augmented, too, by the remembrance of Henrich's
instinctive
offer to avenge her wrongs, and she did not hesitate, on his
return, to exact from him a promise that he would not seek
personally
to visit retribution upon the offender: I have, indeed, a right,
she said, to require this at your hands; for if gratitude did not
prompt a regard for your interest, I cannot but remember that my
own security may continue to depend upon yours.
Huntington replied with suppressed emotion: he was too happy
to have been her preserver; her lightest word should be to him a
law, and he would leave no vigilance unexercised to secure her
continued safety. Such were his words; yet, fearful of seeming to
presume on the benefits he had conferred, they were delivered
rather with an air of distant respect, than of cordial regard.
The fate of Jule continued to excite commiseration, and Blanche
was already engaged in planning schemes to discover her future
place of bondage, and to procure her freedom, when the delighted
slave entered the house, bringing the first intelligence of her escape.
Emily and Mrs. Sniff were also soon added to the company,
panic-stricken
by the tidings of the recent atrocity, to which they had so
unwittingly been rendered accessaries. Jule, of course, became the
lion of the hour, and related her adventures with much minuteness,
awakening the deepest interest, and not a little merriment beside;
yet poor Blanche, to whom the recital only imparted a more vivid
sense of the danger she had escaped, was in no mood for laughter.
Indignation succeeded alarm in her breast; and she felt her wrongs
the more keenly, when she reflected with what impunity they had
been committed. To seek legal redress would be utterly futile: the
slave being inadmissible as a witness, there was no evidence to
connect
Grover personally with the transaction; and even had proof
been attainable to set in operation the unwieldy machinery of the
law, the offender's rank would shield him from any adequate
punishment
.
Miss Roselle declared she would never again set foot in the
dove-cot, and freely accepted, in behalf of herself and Blanche, the
tender of a refuge in Mynheer Waldron's hospitable house until a
new home could be found. The engrossing subject was discussed
until a late hour of the night; and Blanche again and again
reiterated
her thanks to the gratified slave, and exacted from her a
promise to call on the ensuing day for some more substantial token
of her regard.
Sumfin to remember you by, Missa Blanche;notting else,
said Jule, who was unwilling to be thought mercenary.
It shall, indeed, be something to remember me by, poor child!
replied Miss Montaigne,if the priceless boon of freedom is
worthy of remembrance.
Freedom, Missa Blanche! exclaimed Jule, with starting tears
Oh nodat cannot be; Harry Bolt loves Julewould marry
Jule, if she free; but dat can't bedat cost two hundred dollars!
The negress emphasised the last words in a manner that implied
an overpowering sense of the magnitude of the sum named, and a
conviction that she had quite put at rest Miss Montaigne's
benevolent
intentions in her behalf.
Well, well, replied Blanche, scarcely refraining from tears,
come and see me, Jule, and bring Harry Bolt along with you.
To this invitation the negress, after consulting her mistress's eye,
and seeing no indications of disapproval, promised compliance. The
widow was mortified and vexed by the conduct of her distinguished
friends, almost into a state of speechlessness, which, in her case,
might be considered the very collapse of grief. She was, however,
but little alarmed for her own safety; and being mindful of certain
valuables which would be exposed by her absence, she returned to
her house, taking with her the reluctant negress and a borrowed
farm-dog for her protection.
When Henrich Huntington arose on the ensuing morning he was
quite unable to discover his grandfather's old-fashioned rickety
house, with its high, precipitous roof, its clumsy chimneys, its loose
clanging window-blinds, and its scarecrow weathercocks, which he
had long been accustomed to laugh at and ridicule. In its place he
saw a venerable edifice, time-stained it is true, but also time-honored,
possessing in all its parts an air of the utmost cheerfulness, and
challenging his profoundest respect. The declivity of the rafters
exactly suited his taste; the chimneys had grown into favor; the
iron roosters, if a little scrawny were still graceful and life-like; and,
if here and there a shutter, deprived of a hinge, hung obliquely at
its post, he was not sure that it did not improve the general air of
the building. The very garden, large and shapeless, had a new,
fresh, pleasing aspect; and if its only flowers were the coarse, gaudy
hollyhock and the unfragrant poppy, both had a certain peculiar
beauty, and the odor of the latter could hardly be called
disagreeable
.
Whether the presence of Miss Montaigne had anything to do with
this transformation, can of course be only a matter of conjecture
Certain it was that she continued to engross a large share of
Henrich's
thoughts; and if, with an effort, he banished the beautiful
vision as something dangerous to dwell upon, it still recurred in
each unguarded moment, to his mind. So the calm lake, broken
by some disturbing pebble, loses for a while its image of the sky,
but still resumes the picture, with its own returning placidity.
But let him not be blamed, if at times he yielded to this pleasing
thraldom, for the charms of Miss Montaigne were calculated to
fascinate even a less susceptible mind than that of Henrich.
There are no words to paint the singular sweetness of her smile,
which seemed like a gleam of sunlight from some inner world of
purity and love. Rich in its golden treasures of thought and
feeling
must have been the heart which emitted rays like these; and
Henrich was but too happy to catch their casual radiance, to treasure
them in his memory, to recall them in dreams, and to wonder what
there was of human suffering or achievement that could win from
relenting Heaven a treasure so transcendent. Never before had his
own poverty or obscurity been to him a source of serious regret;
but now he felt that he could make any effort to open the gates of
wealth or scale the cliffs of Fame.
Willing to diminish the distance between them, he had tried to
discredit the rumor of her rank and wealth, as one which might
well have originated in Mrs. Sniff's desire to create a temporary
clat
for herself; but there was something in the deportment of
Blanche which gave confirmation to the story. An air of unstudied
gentility pervaded her movements, with a tasteful avoidance of show
and affectation, and an entire freedom from that obtrusive dignity
which, ever guarded against aggression, betrays its uncertain
footing
by its very efforts to stand. The mystery that enveloped her,
the singular mode of her arrival, the uncertain duration of her stay,
and her voluntary seclusion from society, all added to the interest
which she excited in the mind of Henrich; nor had he failed to
observe, in estimating her position, that independent action, even in
matters of moment, which almost precluded the idea of her elder
companion being in reality her sister. Her offer to enfranchise the
slave was made without consultation with Emily, nor did it seem to
excite any surprise in the latter. Henrich did not, indeed, yield a
moment's credence to the exaggerated views of his voluble neighbor,
yet he was compelled to believe it probable that Blanche belonged
to that aristocratic division of English society, between which, and
everything below it, so strong a line of demarcation exists.
The accident which had made him her benefactor, while it tended
to augment his growing attachment, and to impart an air of romance
to its character, seemed, in reality, rather to widen than diminish
the distance between them. A chivalric sense of honor forbade the
exhibition of a sentiment which might seem to found its claims for
reciprocity upon such an obligation, or which might impose any
restraint upon Blanche in seeking, in her still dependent state,
his fullest assistance and counsel. The proud consciousness that
she looked to him for protection was itself a pleasure which he
would not lightly jeopard; and he resolved, while sedulously
watching
her interests, to guard with equal assiduity his own demeanor.
The negress, Jule, did not forget her appointment with Miss
Montaigne; and while the latter was discussing with Henrich a
subject connected with her welfare, made her appearance,
accompanied
,
according to promise, by her beau. Harry Bolt was a rare
specimen of colored humanity. His skin was of that exceeding
blackness aud coarseness of texture, which, to use a horticultural
simile, may be compared to a black turnip; and his coarse woolly
hair, from some unknown cause, perhaps by reason of a monopoly
of the coloring matter by other parts of the system, had turned
white at an unusually early age, and had given him an appearance
not very common even among the oldest negroes, and exceedingly
rare at the age of twenty-four. He was also very tall and awkward,
yet, despite so many disadvantages, could not be called ill-looking,
for he had a pleasing countenance, with fine eyes, and a perfect
treasury of teeth. He reached the house in company with Jule, but
his courage gave out at the door, and after much shuffling and
whispering on the outside, his companion entered alone.
Harra 'fraid to come in, Missa Blanche, she said; he say he
don't know how to act.
Never mind, Jule, replied Miss Montaigne: tell him he need
not act at allbring him in.
Harry accordingly shuffled into the room, looking very sheepish,
and with his head hanging down, but he soon became composed
enough to listen to the questions of the young lady; and although
lost in conjecture as to her design, succeeded in giving very coherent
answers. He even confessed to the soft impeachment of loving
Jule, without any change of color, which, being rather deeply set,
would have required a pretty strong emotion to disturb.
'Taint no use, though, he said, twirling his cap; 'taint no
use, unless Missa Sniff die. Missa Sniff haint got any relations, and
she promise to give up Jule when she die.
That is liberal, certainly, replied Blanche.
Yes, dat berry liberal, sartain, said the negro, quite gravely;
but dat long time fustlast winter she berry sick with fever, and
we had some hope, but she come out of it, and now she better an
ever; got strong constooshun, Missa Sniff has.
Jule listened on the broad grin to this narrative of disappointed
hope; but checking herself, as she thought of her perpetual bondage,
she added, sadly, I told you it could not be, Missa Blanche; Jule
can't be free.
But Harry can work, lay up money, and buy you, Jule?
Yes, Missa, he got ten dollars laid up now
Eleven! said Harry, triumphantly.
But he ony can save three dollar a month, and so it will
take six years amostand dat long time to work for me; I tell him
guv me up, and get a free wife somewhere, said Jule, putting the
corner of a check apron to her eye; but he says he wont
And so I wont! exclaimed Harry; what for should I do such
a ting as dat; de time will come round byme by; it's ony six more
Pinksters, and Pausses, and Christmasses; and I shall be ony forty
when de time is up.
Forty, Harry? said Henrich; why how old are you now?
I'm twenty-four, Massa Huntington; I speak de trut; not a day
older: I shall be twenty-four a fortnight ago to-morrow.
And in six years you will be forty; will you?
Harry hesitated and looked at Jule, who seemed also in some
doubt, and said she believed it was forty or thirty; but Massa
Henrich was a scholar and could reckon it up himself.
But tell me, said Blanche, how did you yourself become free,
Harry?
I tell you dat, answered the negro, excitedly; my Massa
good man, he belong to de churchdeacon Bolt, a berry good man
he own me and a plenty more. I tended dat church, swept it,
washed it, ring de bell, and dig de gravesdig poor Massa's grave
at last, and when he die he guv me to de church in his willkase
he berry good man.
He was, indeed, said Blanche, smiling; then
you
belonged to
the church, did you?
Yes, Missa Blanche, said the negro, grinning; dat what I tell
umI b'longed to de churchde best white man among 'em didn't
b'long to de church as much as I did; but de church folks talked it
over and had a meetin' all about it, and frighten me berry much
I didn't know what dey were going to do to me!
Well, what
did
they to you, Harry?
Golly gosh! said the negrodey said dey wouldn't hab me!
dey turn me out o' de church, and guv me free papers, and paid
me ten dollars a year for ringing de bell eber since!
It need hardly be said that Miss Montaigne was fully prepared
to carry out her generous purposes. Although parsimony was not
among the faults of the Baron Montaigne, his daughter would
scarcely have felt at liberty, without his permission, to make such an
application of the funds with which he had supplied her; but she
had, fortunately, a private purse equal to the emergency, which she
had saved out of her allowance for pocket-money during the last few
years of her abode in England; and over this, at least, her control
was complete.
Slaves were not at that day of nearly as great value in the
province as they subsequently became; and the price which Jule
had named for herself proved to be correct. Mrs. Sniff had long
been desirous to sell the girl, and break up her lonely establishment,
and no difficulty was encountered in the arrangement, which had
already been effected through the agency of Henrich, who had,
indeed, but just returned and placed the deed of manumission in the
hands of the delighted Blanche, when Jule and Harry arrived.
There was a little pause in the conversation, during which Miss
Montaigne hesitated how to bestow her boon; and Jule, glancing at
Henrich, seemed to suspect that she and Harry might be trespassing
by too long a stay.
Shall we go, now, Missa Blanche? she said.
Not yet, replied the young lady, with emotion, handing, at the
same time, the papers to Henrich; please to explain it to them, Mr.
Huntington, she said in a low voice, turning away her face, and
affecting to look for something in her reticule.
Jule has told you, I suppose, Harry, he said, what took place
yesterday, and how she saved Miss Roselle from being carried off by
the pirates?
She tell a-me-all, said Harry; sma'at gal, Jule is, and run like
an ostridge.
Miss Roselle is very thankful to hershe will never forget the
favor that Jule has conferred upon her; and in order to do what she
can in return, she is going to make Jule a great present, and one
that will last for a life-time.
Golly! exclaimed the negro, in whose mind, as in the slave's,
visions of some new and gaudy dress were floating; golly! but it
must be made of good strong stuff, if it last so long as dat!
It is made of paper! replied Henrich; in other words, Miss
Roselle has
bought
Jule, and made her
free
here is the deed; take
it, she is no longer a slave.
Free?free?free, Missa Blanche? shouted Jule, flinging up
her arms as if she were throwing off some imaginary shackles; oh,
dat is too much, too much! oh Missa Blanche, Jule nebber earn dat
oh Missa Blanche, Jule will pray for you, night and mornin', all
her lifeall her life; and the poor girl fairly sobbed with emotion.
Harry manifested no less delight, but in a far different way. He
did not trust himself to speak in the presence of Miss Montaigne;
but thrusting the paper into his hat, with a sort of hysterical chuckle,
he rushed from the house, and uttering a succession of shouts, threw
himself upon the grass in the lawn, where he continued to roll for
many minutes.
And am I really free, like a white woman? said Jule,
examining
her arms and chest, and looking up and down her figure, as if
she expected to see some physical transformation in her person;
no more b'long to Missa Sniff, no more work for herwash, iron,
cook, chop wood, make garden, do ebbery tingno more scold,
scold, scold, and call me lazy beast, when I do my bestoh! Missa
Blanche, it is too muchtoo much!
You have fully deserved your freedom, Jule, said Miss
Montaigne
,
and I am delighted that it makes you so happy; go, now,
Harry is waiting for you; some other time you shall thank me, if
you wish.
Jule accordingly departed, still ejaculating Oh, Missa Blanche!
Missa Blanche! it is too much! too much!
CHAPTER XII.
Justice is lame, as well as blind, amongst us:
The laws, corrupted to their ends that make them,
Serve but for instruments of some new tyranny
That every day starts up.
Otway's Venice Preserved
.
For
a few days succeeding his short sea voyage, Major Grover
kept quietly within his own doors, perfectly contented that he did
not hear the outer air ringing with derisive shouts at his
discomfiture
.
He denied himself to all visiters, not excepting Shiel and
Midge, until the persevering calls of the latter, whose sycophancy
was his passport, obtained his admission. Grover did not know
to what extent his recent exploit had become public, and
notwithstanding
his vigilant watch of the words and manner of his visiter,
for the purpose of gaining some intimation on the subject, the
ensign was careful that he should not be enlightened by any means
of his.
Mr. Midge was sorry that the major had been ill, was a little off
the hooks himself, hoped it was nothing seriousbut this cursed
climate was enough toto
Yes, certainly, of course, replied Grover, with an absent look;
'tis a bad climate, particularly for the goutbut my attack is
nearly over nowandandany news stirring, Midge?
Not an item, replied the other, zealously; there is a perfect
stagnation of gossipthe people have positively nothing at all to
talk about.
This might be considered stretching a point, considering that the
town was actually ringing with the kidnapping affairthough, as
usual on similar occasions, without a single correct version of the
story being afloat, among the dozens that were current; but it
greatly relieved Grover, who being quite ignorant of Jule's escape,
now supposed that Miss Montaigne must have kept secret his agency
in the transaction. But Midge had gone a step too far; for in his
anxiety to disclaim any knowledge of his friend's disaster, he had
quite forgotten that he really had important intelligence to
communicate
.
I am mistaken, after all, he continued, in saying there is no
news. Cornbury has unpleasant tidings from the north; Seabury
and his command have been surprised by the Hurons, and George is
now in the hands of Montaigne.
Lieutenant Seabury a prisoner of Montaigne! this is sad news
indeed, exclaimed the major, his countenance lighting up with a
gleam of satisfaction, which contrasted strangely with his language
how have you these tidings?
By an Indian express from Albany; the runner came through
in two days and reports that the garrison at that place were in
hourly apprehension of an attack.
They need not fear it, replied Grover; Indians do not often
attack forts, and Montaigne dare not venture so far south; this has
been done by some outlying band of savagesbut how does
Cornbury
bear the capture of his nephew?
As a lioness the loss of a whelp, replied the other; he raves
with wrathrails at the home government for not keeping him
better supplied with troops, but vents his fury chiefly on the French
baron.
Good again! exclaimed Grover, heedlessly; but what does
he saywhat does he say?
He says that the Queen's ministers
Nononowhat does he say of the Baron Montaigne?
He says he is a treacherous, crafty, cold-blooded villain; that if
the whim takes him, he will give poor George to the savages to be
tortured, and that he would not that any harm should happen to
the lad for all New France!
Said he so, Midge, said he so?he is rightSeabury is a
noble fellow, and must be protected at all hazards; and Grover,
rising to his feet, traversed the room with an excited air for some
minutes, when, turning abruptly to his companion, he continued:
Mr. Midge, will you do me the great favor to carry an immediate
message for me to Lord Cornbury, confidential and important?
Oh, with the greatest possible
Exactly. I anticipated such kindness; I have had occasion
before to acknowledge your valuable services, and shall not forget
my obligationsnay, do not speak now, if you please, but listen:
go to Cornbury, tell him that I can place in his power, within the
next twenty-four hours, such a hostage for his nephew as shall bind
the Baron Montaigne by his very heart-strings! Ask him to send
me immediate authority for the arrest and safe-keeping of any
member of the baron's family who may now be in the province of
New York; and tell him I ask no other reward for my services than
to be made the custodian of the prisoner. I have reasons for not
going personally to Cornbury on this business, and I know that I
can place the fullest reliance on your discretion and fidelity.
You shall not regret your confidence in me, Major Grover,
replied the ensign.
One word more, added the major; you will understand that I
do not desire an interview with the governor, nor to make any
explanations; tell him despatch is required, and if he proposes to
come and see me, I rely upon you to prevent it; tell him, if you
choose, that I am absent from home, arranging the preliminaries of
my project. Go now, if you please, and bring me a speedy answer.
The ensign promised everything, and departed, not a little
delighted at his embassy, and at being the depository of a state
secret.
5
This is a rare turn of luck, continued Grover, in soliloquy;
Cornbury is blind with rage, and will readily assent to my
proposition
;
having once passed his word he will not recede from it, and
Blanche Montaigne becomes an immate of my house! And why
should she not? If she is not the `captive of my bow and spear,'
the fortune of war has at least thrown her into my hands; Montaigne
wages no civilized warfare, and we will hold him in check by what
means we can. Women have been hostages before now; and where
can the beautiful Blanche be retained with less scandal than in the
house of Major Grover?here are apartments for her use, servants
for her attendance, the most respectful, ceremonious, courteous
treatmentat least as far as the world will know; and as for the
restI alone am responsible.
Grover had not miscalculated the sentiments or actions of Lord
Cornbury; the messenger returned, armed with the required
warrant
,
and with a pledge of the fullest compliance with what the
governor called the whimsical terms of his friend. The message
also enjoined speedy action, and the utmost vigilance to prevent any
failure of so momentous and useful an enterprise.
Seemed he much surprised, ensign? inquired Grover; or did
he express any doubts of my ability to make good my engagement?
He did, indeed, express surprise, replied Midge, and also
some incredulity; he said it was possible there might have been a
disguised son or other relative of the baron among the discharged
crew of the St. Cloud, but that if so, he had doubtless made good
his escape long before this.
It is strange, indeed, said Grover, with an absent air, that there
are men who pass through life with their eyes wide open, and yet
fail to see what is passing directly before them;I do not, of course,
mean His Excellency, Mr. Midge!
Certainly not, replied the obsequious ensign.
The young man lingered some time with the hope of receiving
some further clew to the project on foot, and was at length delighted
by a request from his companion to call on the ensuing morning,
prepared to lend his aid in the undertaking. As this involved an
intimation to take his leave for the present, Mr. Midge gracefully
withdrew, leaving his companion wrapt in a close-fitting reverie. If
the major manifested less haste than Lord Cornbury's injunctions
seemed to require, it was because he felt certain that Miss Montaigne
had no means of escape; and because the arrangements which he
contemplated for her reception required more time than the fraction
of a day which was already far on its wane. His house at once
exhibited the bustle of an active preparation for the expected guest;
and while no accessaries of comfort were unprovided, a still more
studied regard was paid to decoration. Changes that wearied
conjecture
employed the astonished domestics, and even some
neighboring
artisans, until a late hour of the night, while the personal
supervision of Grover extended even to the minuter details of their
labor.
I play a sure card at length, he said, and my triumph may
well be graced with a show of magnanimity.
Mr. Midge was not behind the appointed hour in his return on
the ensuing morning, yet he found Major Grover impatiently
awaiting
his arrival, and learned to his great joy that the important
commission was to be intrusted entirely in his own hands. But it
was with some abatement of his delight, though with unbounded
surprise, he learned that the person to be secured was a lady, and a
daughter of the renowned Baron Montaigne. There were few
laurels to be won in such an enterprise, but there was favor to be
gained in high quarters, which was an object of equal importance to
him, and he resolved on the faithful and judicious performance of his
trust.
Grover was unwilling to be personally an actor in an event, which,
in the outset at least, he desired to represent as entirely official, and
dictated by principles of state policy. He knew that his motives
could not remain unsuspected, but he cared nothing for a public
censure which did not carry the sting of ridicule, and which was
not equal to the frustration of his designs. He believed, as has been
seen, that his connexion with the recent attempt to carry off Miss
Montaigne was not publicly known; and if it should become so, he
did not doubt his ability, through his friends and parasites, to give
it a coloring which should not reflect seriously to his disadvantage.
His success, indeed, in his present achievement was to become
subsequently
a matter of boast, as an original and brilliant exploit in
the annals of gallantry, well calculated to obliterate the memory of
any previous failure.
He gave Midge an accurate description of the person of Blanche,
and directed him to accomplish his errand with as little publicity as
possible, and with all proper courtesy. A carriage was, of course, to
be provided for her transportation, and she was to be allowed any
reasonable time to make preparations for what was to be represented
to her as merely a change of abode. Major Grover was not to be
named to her as her custodian, or as being in any way connected
with the movement; as he designed that her first knowledge of her
felicity in that respect should be derived from himself, and under his
own roof. The ensign was to be accompanied informally by a few
men, sufficient to enforce his authority; but he was to make no
unnecessary exhibition of his force, which was not to accompany the
carriage on its return.
With these instructions, which were expected to insure both
success and comparative secresy, the inflated ensign set out upon his
expedition, and at an early hour in the forenoon alighted from his
carriage in front of the domicil of Jacobus Waldron, while his six
followers remained within easy hailing distance. The octogenarian
sat quietly smoking his pipe upon his front stoop, to which Midge
approached with a pompous air, and, pausing at the entrance,
notwithstanding there was no appearance of opposition to his ingress,
formally demanded admittance in the Queen's name. Jacobus did
not take down his pipe for many seconds, and was still pondering
what answer should be given to so ceremonious a request, when the
demand was peremptorily repeated.
Come in, den, in de Queen's name, ef you want to, young
man, he said, at length; de door is wite open; nobody will hurt
you.
Midge accordingly marched on to the stoop, and advancing to
the old man, said:
You are suspected of harboring under your roof Miss Blanche
Montaigne, a daughter of the Baron Montaigne, of New France, and
I have authority to require you to surrender her into my charge.
Dere is no such beeples in mine house, said Jacobus, shaking
his head.
We have the fullest proof that she is a resident of your house,
replied Midge, and if she is not quietly given up, I must at once
search the premises.
Dere is no such beeples, I tell you, exclaimed the old man,
waxing angry; dere is noboty but Sally, and Hans, and Doxy, and
Ruppy, and de two wenches, and de tog.
The ensign, unwilling to be trifled with, stepped to the outer
edge of the stoop, and waved his sword as a signal for his men to
advance.
It is folly to deny Miss Montaigne's presence, he said; we
know that she is here, and she cannot escape us; you will perceive
that I have authority for my acts, he continued, exhibiting his
warrant; AnneReginaby the grace, etc.,and there's the
seal, and there's the signatureCornbury.
The old man took the writ, and peered at it with much
earnestness
for some minutes, occasionally deluging it with an emission of
smoke, which concealed every trace of the paper from view, after
which he handed it calmly back to the ensign, remarking, as before:
Dere is no such beeples!
Well, sir, said the ensign, still reluctant to take any harsh
measures; here are my men; and although I had hoped to avoid
giving the lady any unnecessary alarm, I must do my duty; there
is not the least harm designed to your guest, and if you will
procure
me a moment's speech with her, I think I can show her the
necessity of a peaceable compliance with my ordersotherwise,
remember, sir, that you are guilty of concealing the Queen's enemies,
and may have to answer for it with your head.
I answer mit mine head, now, said Jacobus, shaking that
member violently, with a negative gesture; I answer nonono
dere is no Montaignes, nor no barons, nor no lady Blanches in
mine house, now den!
Come on, my men! exclaimed Midge, drawing his sword with
a nervous and excited air; let these two remain without, to guard
the doors, and see that no one escapes; the rest will follow me
forward, march! and the ensign led the way into the nearest
apartment, which proved to be the kitchen, where the venerable
partner of Mynheer Waldron sat knitting in a corner, and two female
slaves, desisting suddenly from their labors, stood shaking with fear
on the hearth.
Hey den! exclaimed the old lady, in a sharp key, and looking
up over her spectacles; what for do you come trainin' in my
house? isn't der room enough out doors for you, hey?
About nineteen years oldfive feet, six inches highslight in
figurevery fairblue eyesbrown hair in ringlets, said Midge,
reading from a memorandum in his hand, and then glancing
momentarily around the room; She isn't here, certainly, he
continued
:
and without condescending to give any reply to his
questioner
,
he passed on with his followers into another apartment.
The house was by no means a large one, and was soon explored
from cellar to attic; the grumbling Jacobus following close upon the
heels of his visiters, and reminding the disconcerted ensign, at every
turn, that he had predicted the result. No doors were fastened, no
places of concealment visible, and no attempt made in any way to
obstruct the search; yet neither Blanche nor Emily was found.
A buxom granddaughter of Mynheer Waldron was surprised at her
toilet, and although she was at once passed by, as not answering to
the description, Midge subsequently resolved to make more sure by
a closer scrutiny. But there was evidently nothing artificial about
the round red cheeks and flaxen hair of Doxy Waldron; and
although her plumpness might have owed something to her apparel,
there was no such thing as compressing five feet six inches of height
into the short squabby figure which stood trembling before the
soldiers.
Let me go if you please, said the frightened girlI'm only
Doxy; Miss Blanche Roselle, and Miss Emily, and cousin Henrich
Shut up your head, youngster! shut up your head! exclaimed
old Jacobus, in the Dutch language and in a loud voice, from the
back-ground, where he had been for some time pantomiming to the
girl, who under this invocation became suddenly mute; and,
notwithstanding
all the entreaties and threats of Midge, could not be
persuaded to say another word. The Dutch warning was sufficiently
intelligible to the ensign by its effects; and after menacing the old
man with the punishment of the laws, he resolved on another and
still more vigorous search, which was accordingly made, and with a
minuteness that could have overlooked nothing larger than a mouse.
Like the first, however, it was unsuccessful, and Mr. Ensign Midge
betook himself to his carriage, having first directed his men to return
to their quarters, by as many different roads as they could
conveniently
find.
CHAPTER XIII.
All the forest rings, and every neighboring place,
And there is not a hound, but falleth to the chase.
Drayton
.
A little
retrogression is necessary to explain the preceding chapter.
On the morning of the day in which the convaleseing Major Grover
tendered his valuable services to the government in obtaining a
hostage to be made of Baron Montaigne's heart-strings, Henrich
Huntington was reminded by the baying of hounds away over in
New Jersey that it was fine sporting weather, and that game of
some kind might be expected to be abroad. He had for a
considerable
time been a stranger to the woodlands, and an unusual longing
for the chase came upon him, as he stood looking forestward, and
listening to the familiar sounds which came faintly, yet distinct,
through the still morning air.
But if he had been far more undecided he could never have
resisted the invitation which he presently received from his friend
Bounder, who running up and laying his sharp, cold nose in his
master's hand, by way of attracting attention, looked wistfully into
his face, and then towards the woods, wagging his tail
meanwhile
,
and occasionally uttering a sort of half-suppressed yelp.
Bounder said, as plainly as dog could say, that he wanted to go and
bury his teeth in the flank of a stag, and that he was in very good
wind for that purpose, and that the scent would lie finely, and he
would do his duty dogfully.
Shall we go, Boundershall we go? said the young man,
musingly; and his companion, after proving his right to his name
by leaping from the ground, and making several seeming attempts
to effect a lodgment upon his master's shoulders, darted forward
about forty rods toward the woods, at his topmost speed, and was
back again in a twinkling, performing every variety of antics, and
answering the distant echoes with his voice.
Henrich entertained, of course, no suspicions of any impending
danger to Blanche, who, in the large household by which she was
now surrounded, had a sufficient guarantee against any repetition of
the lawless attack which she had so recently escaped. Still ignorant
of her true name and rank, he could have no conception of the new
danger to which she was soon to be exposed, and if it was not
altogether with a light heart that he went forth into the forest, it
was at least with no fear for the safety of his friend.
But if the day was a favorable one for hunting, it availed but little
to Henrich, whose vexed thoughts were themselves winding and
doubling in too many directions to admit of successfully following
up the track of the cunning fox, or the light-footed deer; and whose
repeated blunders in his sport were a matter of very apparent
surprise
,
and even of comment, in his way, to the disappointed Bounder.
He had spent several hours in ineffectual labors when he again met
the young Indian known by the name of Winny, of whom mention
has been made. Winny belonged to a small tribe of Indians, known
as the Wappenos, who may be considered the original Manhattanese,
but of whom few traces and no representatives have come down to
the present day. That they belonged to some subdivision of the
Five Nations, is probable rather from their locality, than from any
evidence that we have of their warlike character. They were on
terms of amity with the English, of whom they stood in no little
awe, and whose friendship they cultivated also with a view to a
traffic, trifling in amount, yet of much consideration to them. A
village, or collection of huts belonging to this tribe, was situated on
the western side of the island, several miles north of the city; but
there were also two or three isolated wigwams nearer the town, which
5*
frequently swarmed with tenants in the warmer months, but were
abandoned in winter for the advantage of contiguity and mutual
assistance.
Winny, who had come from this summer residence, and was going
in the direction of the Indian settlement when he encountered
Henrich
,
seemed in unusual haste, and manifested no degree of his
accustomed alacrity to converse or to give information about the
probable haunts of the game. This reserve was the more
remarkable
,
because at his last meeting with Huntington he had been
indebted to the latter for the privilege of drawing the bounty on the
slain wolf, which was a sum of great value to the savage. It was,
indeed, only a remembrance of this obligation that restrained him
from being still more unsocial, and from taking an abrupt leave of
his companion. Observing the Indian's reluctance to stop, Henrich
slightly changed his course and walked with quickened pace by his
side, still questioning him on matters pertaining to the chase, and
heedless that the other now gave still greater signs of dissatisfaction
than before.
Winny saw deer, he said at length, pointing towards the east
side of the island; going that waywith horns like that!
spreading the fingers of both hands.
You saw a stag of ten, and did not follow him! exclaimed
Henrich, with a look of incredulity.
The Indian saw that he was disbelieved, and scorning further
equivocation, he replied impatiently: The Panther is going to the
councilhe must go alone.
The council, Winny! said Henrich, who perceived by his
companion's air, and by the use of his symbolical name, that he was
in earnest; why this is the first I have heard of a council of the
Wappenos in a long time; you have not thirty warriors in your
tribe; why do you hold councils?
The Wappenos are few, replied the Indian; once they were
like the leaves; but they can punish the foe who comes alone in
their camp.
What does this mean? said Huntington, who began to
anticipate
one of those scenes of cruelty which were occasionally enacted
among the more powerful tribes, but which were of rare occurrence
in the neighborhood of the citywhat does this mean, Winny?
tell me plainlyremember that I am your friend.
Henreek is the friend of Winny, was the reply; the Panther
has no friend among the whites.
Nonsense! said Huntington, laughing; I am your friend, I
tell you, and the friend of your whole tribe, panthers, bears, and all;
did I not send you corn, when the winter was long and cold, and
the snow too deep for hunting?
You did, replied the savage, grasping the hand of the young
man; it is written in our heartsour children know it; listen,
Henreek, but be not like the mocking bird, to speak againlisten,
but bury my words in your breast.
Winny proceeded in this metaphorical strain to tell at some
length what may be better repeated in simpler language. A Huron
Indian, in disguise as a Mohawk, had been found the day before
skulking on the island, and seeking to evade observation. Failing in
this, he had at first succeeded, by his dress and air, in passing
himself
off for a Mohawk, and consequently a friend of the English, and
of the tribes in their alliance; but was soon detected by means of
some unutterable shibboleth in the language of his assumed tribe.
It was to decide the fate of this man that the council was called,
and as his sentence would probably be death by torture, the reason
of Winny's desire for secresy became apparent. The English
government had several times interposed to prevent similar deeds
of barbarity among the tribes on Long Island, and the savages had
become exceedingly jealous of an interference with what they
considered
almost their only remaining act of sovereignty. But the Indian
having become thus far communicative, was easily prevailed on to
allow Huntington to accompany him to the village. The popularity
of the young man among the Wappenos, and his own influence as
a son of a chief, would protect the Panther from any severe censure,
and if it became necessary for Henrich to withdraw, the secret,
Winny believed, would still be safe.
They were not long in reaching the settlement, which was
situated in a partial opening of the forest, where the trees were large
and sparsely set, and the ground was free from bushes. The
lodges, some twenty in number, stood at the distance of a few rods
from each other, on the sides of a sort of hollow square, if that may
be called such, which was in reality neither square nor hollow.
Within this arena a commotion was already visible, indicative of
some important movement: women were assembled in knots at the
doors, talking and gesticulating, some sitting and some standing,
while half clad children were running around in glee, stopping
occasionally to peep through the chinks of a closed and guarded
shanty, and holding up small bundles of fagots to the view of its
inmate, by way of a foreshadowing of his fate.
The warriors were assembled in and about the principal lodge,
wearing, in general, an air of great gravity; yet some of the
younger braves were giving way to occasional turns of merriment or
exultation, without reproof. The Panther and Henrich went directly
to this council-hall, where the latter was at first eyed with much
suspicion, but was soon generally recognised and welcomed.
He is our brotherhe is welcome, said the principal chief;
and the young men made room for him beside themselves on the
grass, while Bounder, after coursing the enclosure, and looking
curiously into several of the lodges, threw himself panting at his
side.
The council was soon opened within the wigwam, those entitled
to a voice in its proceedings ranging themselves decorously in order,
while those without awaited the result in silence. There was some
division of sentiment, and more than an hour elapsed before the
opinions were all delivered; but the result proved the predominance
of a sanguinary spirit among the judges. The Huron was sentenced
to run the gantlet, and, if he escaped that ordeal, to subsequent
torture and death. He was at once brought out upon the square to
receive intelligence of his doom, which he heard in silence, and with
the affectation of indifference usual to his race on such occasions;
but a close observer could easily detect in the forced compression of
his lips, and in the slight flaring of his nostrils, the signs of mental
emotion. He was a tall, well formed man, of about thirty years,
with features which would have been far from ugly, separate from
their mask of paint, and with an eye, more especially, which would
have redeemed a still greater disfigurement of face from being
wholly loathsome. Its iris, bright, black, and large, rolled around
its little orbit with a rapid motion, seeming to drink in everything
within the scope of its vision; while not only the head, but the
muscles of the face, remained unmoved.
Henrich had resolved to make an effort to prevent the threatened
tragedy, but he knew that the savages were jealous of their
prerogative
,
and that if he could succeed at all, it would be only by the
utmost tact. To interfere with the deliberations of the council would
give the greatest offence, and diminish the chance of his subsequent
influence. He even resolved not to object to the execution of the
first part of the sentence which was more formidable in sound than
in reality, and which never resulted fatally, to a man of the least
courage; it was intended, indeed, rather as an intimidation than a
punishment, although it often resulted in severe and sometimes in
mortal wounds. A view of the athletic, compact, sinewy frame of
the Huron convinced him that the latter would come off nearly
unscathed from the ordeal, and the very fact of his being also
doomed to the stake would prevent a desire on the part of his
captors
to terminate his life in the first instance. It was of course with
great reluctance that Huntington resolved to behold the approaching
spectacle, but believing that the best interests of the prisoner required
such a course, he determined to remain as yet a silent observer of
events.
The scene which ensued may be briefly described. The
Wappenos
,
men and women, and many of the larger children, armed
with knives, clubs, and sticks, of various kinds, ranged themselves in
two parallel rows, terminating at one end in front of a lodge, the
door of which stood open, and leaving between the lines a space of
about ten or twelve feet in width. All who chose were at liberty to
take a place in the ranks, and but few of the adults, excepting those
who were physically incapacitated, refused to avail themselves of the
privilege. There were indeed several squaws, who stood aloof,
mingling
,
as spectators, with the children, and the principal chief also
remained inactive, occupying a convenient post of observation at one
end of the line. Henrich was offered a club, and invited to take
part in the performance, and but for the irrepressible signs of
abhorrence
with which he declined, would doubtless have been
importuned
to comply.
When everything was ready, the Huron was brought forward and
unbound, his eye, meanwhile, running rapidly over the ranks, as if
estimating the danger and discovering the most perilous localities.
The task before him was to run through this alley, between these living
walls, in such manner and with such speed as he chose, but through
he must go, and while all his foes were privileged to inflict upon him
such blows as they could deal while he was passing, none was
permitted to stir out of his place in pursuit. No dexterity or feint
of the prisoner, and no manuvre, in the way of dodging or
doubling, were exceptionable; his only task was to reach the
opposite
end of the line with as much impunity as possible.
The signal was given and the Huron started like an arrow from
the string. The first dozen of his foes struck only the empty air in
his path, and the clubs of the next whizzed idly above his head. He
was now stooping to the earth, and now bounding in the air, at one
breath on one side of the line, and the next on the other, twisting,
turning, gliding, crawling, and almost defying the pursuit of the
eye, much more the hasty and ill-directed blows of his eager
enemies. About half way down the lane the ranks were chiefly
occupied by boys of from twelve to fifteen years, and having reached
this point with but little injury he paused a moment to take breath,
bearing meanwhile with little regard, the furious pummelling of the
children. In the interval beyond, were some of the most vigorous
and expert of his enemies, including the vigilant Panther; and
although, discerning their position at a glance, he started forward with
increased wariness and skill, it was not with a success equal to that
which had hitherto attended him. He received several severe
contusions
,
was once nearly stricken to the earth, and when he at length
reached the refuge lodge, was bleeding from a number of superficial
wounds.
A little noisy discussion next ensued among the Wappenos on
the subject of their respective successes and failures in their recent
pastime, which seemed to be regarded somewhat in the light in
which a game at cricket is viewed by the young men of civilized
life, after which active preparations were at once commenced for the
closing tragedy. Henrich drew curiously near to the Huron,
about whom the leaders of the savages had assembled, and
for the first time caught the eye of the prisoner, which, as it rested
for a moment upon his own, and then glanced hastily at the
growing
pyre without, had a mournful and appealing expression, sufficient
to counterbalance a thousand proofs of stoicism. The Indian clung
to life, he shrank from the awful change; he quailed before the
instruments of torture. Young, active, and vigorous, he was but
yesterday free as the mountain air, free to traverse the boundless
forests, and glide over lake and river, with his light canoe, with
half a century's lease of life stretching in bright perspective before
himand now, he was a captive in his enemy's camp, listening to
the sound of whetted weapons, preparing for his own immolation,
and recalling to memory by word and cadence the death-song of
his tribe.
Stimulated by the silent appeal of the Huron, Huntington at once
began the work of intercession; but it was only to meet with frigid
looks, and with answers of surprise and displeasure. The response,
indeed, was unanimous against clemency, and the Indians even
manifested
impatience at an interruption, which delayed their anticipated
sport; for, as Henrich became importunate, the wondering savages
had crowded around him, until, the work of preparation being
temporarily
abandoned, even the women and children had mingled with
the curious throng.
The words are said! exclaimed the senior chief, alluding to the
voice of the council; they are gone into the air, and cannot be
found againthe Huron must die!
A general murmur of approval followed this decision, in which,
as Henrich observed with foreboding, even his friend, the Panther,
joined. He next tried to effect a ransom; and although able to give
but little which could gratify the cupidity of so many, he was careful
to offer such things as would appeal most to their peculiar wants:
his rifle, a dozen canisters of powder and half as many kegs of the
enticing fire-water were offered, and, strange to say, were all refused.
Henrich knew nothing more that he could do. The dialect of the
Wappenos, in which he had spoken, possessed sufficient resemblance
to the language of the Hurons to be intelligible to the prisoner, as
was proved by the look of gratitude which the latter bestowed upon
his young friend; but there was at the same time an expression of
hopelessness in his features, which showed that he understood better
than his advocate the character of the enemies with whom he had
to deal.
Among those who had pressed to the front of the throng, sifted,
as it were, through the interstices, were some half-clad children,
among whom, at this juncture, a sudden quarrel ensued, for the
possession of something which had been found on the arena
recently traversed by the flying Huron, and which at once attracted
general attention. As it passed from hand to hand among the
Indians, it soon took shape, to the eyes of the astonished Henrich, as
a sealed letter, bearing a superscription; but how was his
amazement
increased, when at length obtaining possession of it in his turn,
he read the endorsement: To Father Ledra, or the Misses Roselle,
in the city and province of New York. He remained gazing long
and steadfastly at the writing, marvelling what new and unrevealed
mystery, in regard to Blanche, was about to be evolved; and on
again looking up he saw that the prisoner's eyes were fixed upon
him with an intelligent and steady gaze.
Does it speak to you? asked the senior chief, who with his
companions had closely observed Henrich's surprised air; does it
talk to our brother, and what are its words?
It speaks! replied Huntington, solemnly, and its words are
many; it says that the Huron was not upon the war-path when he
came into the camp of his enemy; that he did not come looking for
the scalps of the Wappenos.
Huh! exclaimed the chief, who, in common with his race,
entertained no conception of the art of conveying ideas by writing,
and looked upon written language, of which he had heard something
among the whites, as a production of magic; huh! he exclaimed,
sarcastically; ask it why then the Huron has come, if not for
scalps; is there no game in the forests of the north?
It says, replied Henrich, that far away by the bright lakes,
an old man weeps for his daughters, who are captives of your
English
father in New York; and that he will listen long for the feet of
the swift runner, and for his voice to tell him that his children are
yet alive.
He
will
listen long, replied the unmoved chieftain, if he waits
for the false Maqua, who came to Manahatta, with the face of a
Mohock, and the heart of a Hurondoes it say anything else?
It says nothing more, replied Henrich, sadly, yet earnestly; but
there is a voice from the Great Spirit, which speaks to you, old man,
and forbids this horrible sacrificewhich says, `Shed not innocent
blood:' which says that the happy hunting fields will be closed to
the cruel and revengeful man.
I do not hear it! answered the chief, looking upward for a
moment, and then turning slowly away; the words of our white
brother are too many: wise men speak but once.
Henrich was about to make a final appeal by largely increasing
his offered ransom, when he felt himself pulled suddenly by the
sleeve, and on looking down he saw a pair of glowing eyes fixed
intently upon him, and slowly receding at the same time into the
depths of the crowd. As he gazed, he gradually recognized the
features of an Indian, known as the Weasel, whom he had frequently
met in the city, and who now evidently desired to make some private
communication to him. He was celebrated among his brethren as
an orator; but was, in reality, a wordy, windy, sham patriot,
exceedingly
fond of intoxicating drinks, and indulging in his favorite
propensity to a shameless extent, whenever a favorable opportunity
occurred. As the general attention became at once engaged in the
renewed preparations for the Huron's death, Henrich found no
difficulty in following the Weasel and obtaining an interview with
him.
The Indian had a proposition to make, which, divested of its
parade of words, amounted to this; that his own heart was touched
by the condition of the unfortunate captive, that he remembered
with gratitude the former services of Henrich to his tribe in the
time of famine, and that he would undertake to bring about the
release of the Huron for the ransom which had been offered, and
for one additional keg of rum for his private benefit. Henrich
caught with avidity at this offer, improbable as it seemed of
fulfilment
.
But how, he said, can you do this? did you not give your
voice for the prisoner's death, and advocate it with a speech?
I did, answered the Indian; but my mind has turned over,
turning his hand, by way of illustrating his meaning; I will turn
my brothers' too.
The orator entered at once upon his task. He took his position
upon a slight eminence near the centre of the square, and
commencing
an energetic address, at once drew around him the gratified
savages, who, knowing what had been his views and vote in council,
anticipated only an inflammatory exhortation to persevere in their
design, and, perhaps, a suggestion of some new and ingenious
varieties of torture. The Weasel knew well the disappointment
which he was about to create; and he approached his subject
carefully
,
and from a remote position. Only gradually unfolding his
design, he fortified his premises by earnest and impressive appeals,
while his hearers were yet uncertain of the conclusion to which they
tended. He spoke of the famine from which they had suffered, and
described by word and gesture the hollow cheeks and shrivelled
limbs of themselves and their children; he told of their inability to
procure food, of their unwillingness to beg in the great city, of an
old warrior who had sung his death-song in his empty cabinand
finally brought down the house by a suddenly drawn picture of
the good Henrich appearing in their midst, with a sleigh-load of
yellow maize.
Look around you, he said, and you will see the tracks of his
horses, just where he stood but now, when you stopped your ears
to his prayers.
The mortified Wappenos showed that they felt the indirect taunt
of the orator, who still refrained from any avowal of his design:
when, at length, however, he declared it, he saved himself from the
charge of inconsistency by professing not to have known at the time
of giving his voice against the captive, that their benefactor desired
his release. He dwelt briefly upon the peculiar mission of the Huron,
as one which entitled him to clemency, and did not fail to dilate
temptingly upon the ransom which Henrich stood ready to give;
he spoke, indeed, of everything connected with the affair, with the
exception of his own promised counsel-fee, and on that subject, he
maintained a discreet silence. He closed his remarks with a forcible
and effective peroration, reminding his brethren that the council
doors were still open, and that they should be glad that the
opportunity
yet remained to retrace their steps, and wipe out the stain of
ingratitude from their character.
Henrich watched with much anxiety the countenances of the
auditors, and was rejoiced to see the signs of general relenting.
The judges, at the instigation of the Weasel, returned formally to
the lodge where they had sentenced the prisoner, and after a little
deliberation, revoked their former decision, with but a few dissenting
voices. Henrich received the tidings with the greatest exultation,
which he manifested by shaking hands with the whole court, and,
finally, with the Huron, to whom he had the pleasure of bringing
the first news of his freedom.
It was difficult to convince the captive that he was really
discharged
;
and it was not until in company with Huntington he
had left the camp of his enemies, that he could believe himself at
liberty. His delight was evidently extreme, although it was
manifested less in language than in looks and manner. He
resigned himself implicitly to Henrich's guidance, who returned to
him his lost packet, and undertook to conduct him at once to
the persons to whom it was addressed. It would have been an
easy matter at that moment to win from the confiding Huron the
whole secret of his errand, and its author, and thus to solve to some
extent, the mystery which enveloped Blanche; but Henrich was
incapable of taking such an advantage of his position. To induce
the savage to violate his trust, or to penetrate by any means a
secret which his friend was desirous to conceal, was an act repulsive
to his sense of duty; and although an unbounded curiosity
pervaded
his mind to know the origin and tendency of the Indian's
mission, he conducted him, unquestioned, to his own home. There
he at once obtained an interview with the ladies, introduced to
them his companion, as one who was seeking their presence, and
having learned that although much amazed, they were not afraid to
be left alone with the messenger, withdrew, and left the Huron to
tell his own story.
His forbearance and delicacy were rewarded by a speedy summons
to return to the ladies, and aid them with his counsel in a new and
important emergency.
CHAPTER XIV.
We are alone;
But how I should begin, or in what language
Speak the unwilling word of parting from you,
I am yet to learn.
Massinger
.
We
are compelled, Mr. Huntington, said Blanche, rising with
an excited air, as Henrich entered the room, to make you the
depositary of a few secrets, which, if they were ever important, will
cease to be so when we are gone.
Gone! answered Henrich, with astonishment,whither?by
what means? surely, Miss Roselle, you are not in earnest
We are summoned, replied Blanche, interrupting him, by one
who has the right to control our movements, and who doubtless has
properly provided for our safety. But I will explain all: you are
already acquainted with some of the circumstances connected with
our accidental arrival in this citythe shipwreck of the St. Cloud
the singular escape of one of her passengers, and the subsequent
banishment of our friend and protector, Father Ledra.
I know the whole sad story, said Henrich; the fugitive, of
whom you speak, was the haughty and powerful Baron Montaigne;
the friend and counsellor of Louis; the man by whose courage and
diplomacy with the Indian nations, the whole tottering government
of New France has long been upheldwhose craft and cruelty
have
Mr. Huntington is speaking of my father, rejoined Miss
Montaigne
,
with quiet dignity.
Amazement for a while held the young man silent; and when he
again spoke, it was with the apology that the occasion seemed to
require.
The picture is drawn by his enemies, he said, and we may
easily suppose that it is not impartial: I can believe nothing ill of
the father of Miss Blanche Montaigne.
The packet which we have received, continued Miss Montaigne,
I need scarcely say, is from him; but it has been prepared with
reference to the contingency of falling into other hands than ours,
and contains, therefore, no explicit information. A few words
without a signature, but in penmanship which is familiar to me,
instruct us to trust ourselves with implicit-confidence to the
protection
of the bearer,a Huron Chief, called the Lynx,and whom
we are to know as genuine by his knowledge of us. We have not
yet proved him; because feeling the importance of avoiding any
error on so vital a point, we dared not rely upon our own judgment
alone: Emily has frightened me with a horrible supposition that
the true messenger may have fallen into the hands of foes, who have
obtained his credentials, and now seek to decoy us into their
power.
Too much caution cannot be used where everything is at stake,
replied Henrich, with a saddened air; I think I have already
sufficient proof that the Indian is a Huronyet we will leave nothing
to conjecture; but how is he accompanied? where is his force? and
what are his means of conveyance? You surely will not confide
yourselves to the charge of a single man, however trustworthy?
It is not probable that we are required to do so, said Blanche;
but we know nothing as yetthe savage seemed suffering from
fatigue and hunger, and is now partaking of your grandfather's
hospitality; he will rejoin us in a few minutes, and we trust to you
to interrogate him as to all the particulars of his mission.
She had scarcely ceased speaking when the Huron stalked
silently into the room, and answering an invitation to be seated by
a graceful wave of the hand, remained standing erect and dignified,
and seemingly awaiting his expected examination. Henrich was
familiar with the abrupt and sententious style of colloquy used by
the Indians, and naturally adopted it in conversing with them; he
addressed the stranger in French, which the latter, like many of his
northern brethren, spoke with tolerable correctness.
My brother comes with a talking paper, he said; can he tell
us what it says?
It talks to
her
, answered the Huron, laying his hand lightly
on the head of Blanche, and to her, pointing to Emily, and to
an old man, with long white hairI do not see him: it talks to
them, not to me; I have listened, but cannot hear it.
Whose are its words? asked Henrich.
The Indian's countenance brightened and assumed a loftier
expression as he answered: they are the words of my cousin, the
great generalthe Baron Montaignethe King of the Hurons; and
this, he said, again touching the head of Blanchethis is his
daughter.
And this? asked Henrich, pointing towards Miss Roselle.
Is his sister's childI have saidI have but one tongue, and it
is not forked.
Yonr words are true, replied Henrich, we receive them into
our hearts; yet tell us of this Baron Montaigne: what is he like?
He is a great Brave, said the savage, with an air of unbounded
admirationbold as the grizzly bearquick as the elkwith
eagle's eyestall, large, straight as the oakI cannot speak
him.
It is enough! exclaimed Blanche, offering her hand frankly to
the Huronyou are our friend; tell me, she said, with an
affectionate
interest, which showed that desertion and neglect had not
chilled her filial lovetell me, is my father well?did hedid he
speak kindly of me?
The Indian answered only: He is well; and Blanche turned
aside to hide the gushing tears which told how bitterly she was
disappointed.
The remaining part of the messenger's story was soon told: he
was one of a company of seven, who had descended the lakes and
the Hudson river in canoes, and who, passing the few settlements
and exposed places always under cover of the night, had reached the
vicinity of New York without molestation. There had been, indeed,
no recent active hostilities between the French and English at the
time of the setting out of this expedition; and as far as Montaigne
could learn from his vigilant runners, there were no Indians on the
war-path, in that part of the territory of the Five Nations which it
would be necessary to traverse. These circumstances, in connexion
with the almost uninterrupted line of water communication for the
whole route, and the width of the river and lakes, which would
permit of avoiding an enemy on either side, were supposed to render
the proposed journey of the ladies reasonably safe, in an age and
country in which human life was never abundantly secure. It was
rather the hardships than the perils of the undertaking which formed
its chief objection; but these Miss Montaigne resolved cheerfully to
encounter, when once assured that her father deemed it prudent,
and that his agents were fully reliable.
But her surprise and curiosity were not a little excited when she
was informed by the Huron that the party was under the command
of one Count Carlton, a young French officer, and an intimate friend
of the baron, a piece of intelligence which went far to reconcile
Emily to the journey. To her imagination, which no remembrance
of past events could wholly correct, it began to assume the character
of a romantic enterprise, in which nothing was wanting to increase
its attraction but the certainty of being pursued by a party of those
delightful Mohawks, all of whom were to be slain by their gallant
champion, the young French count. The name fell ominously upon
the ear of Henrich, who already pained beyond expression at the
prospect of Blanche's departure, at once foresaw, with a lover's
6
instinct, the danger which threatened most to his happiness. Alive,
however, to every incident, he did not fail to observe that the Huron
spoke of his commanding officer with a scowl that seemed to indicate
displeasure, and that he did not designate him as a Brave, or apply
to him any of those terms by which the savage so freely expresses
his admiration of all noble qualities.
The count, with the remainder of his small detachment, of whom
four were French soldiers, and the other an Algonquin Indian, was
encamped in the forest about ten miles north of the city, where a
small creek, connecting with the river, afforded a safe hiding-place
for his boats. The Huron had left the encampment early on the
morning of the preceding day, and it became important that no
further delay should occur, lest Carlton should withdraw his men,
and abandon the expedition, under the impression that his
messenger
had fallen into the hands of the enemy. The Huron, indeed,
urged that they should depart on that very evening, and as Miss
Montaigne, though pale with emotion, did not hesitate to assent, the
bustle of a hurried preparation at once ensued, and before it was
yet sufficiently dark to set out, the ladies were both in readiness.
Henrich, whose aid was of course volunteered to accompany
them to the camp, had in the meantime procured a boat and
despatched it in charge of a slave to await the party on the shore
of the river, a little north of the city wall, but there was at the
same time something in the character of his arrangements which
indicated a view to some ulterior purpose. Miss Montaigne, who
had contemplated with dread a perilous night-walk through the
forest, was delighted at the-comparatively easy means of travel which
had been provided, and something like a gleam of cheerfulness began
to illumine her features, as the moment for departure approached.
It was in vain, however, that she sought to conceal her trepidation,
and she seemed to seek a re-assurance for her failing courage in the
language and bearing of Henrich. He would have rejoiced at the
lightest intimation from Blanche, that his services would be
acceptable
as one of her guard through the whole of her anticipated journey,
and only dared not make the offer, lest its refusal, founded on the
suspicion of his daring love, should involve, by implication, a
rejection
of his suit, and extinguish for ever the flickering light of hope,
which served now at least harmlessly to irradiate his heart. There
was something in the romantic character of his attachment which
admitted of his gathering bliss even from an acknowledged illusion,
as long as it did not transcend the limits of possibility, but he had
not courage to face the reality of a present and certain despair.
We look to you, Mr. Huntington, said Miss Montaigne, to
infuse a little courage into us before we part; confidence, you know,
is ever inspired by example, and you are really looking as if you
boded evil.
Accident had left them a moment alone, and Henrich replied with
a smileYou must allow me to be a little dismal at the prospect of
losing the companionship of yourself and your cousin and falling back
upon the Wappenos, and wolves for society. Your escort, I hope, is
safe; it is doubtless such as will best secure secresy and celerity of
movement; yet I could have wished it somewhat stronger.
Do you think there is much danger? asked Blanche, quickly.
With vigilance, prudence, and valor, on the part of your guard,
no; said Henrich, and we must presume they have been selected
for qualities like these; yet I would that you felt sufficiently insecure
to permit of my offering to enrol myself among your defenders.
Blanche slightly colored as she replied, We are already laden
with obligations to you that we cannot requite, and although I
cannot
deny that it would add greatly to my sense of security
It would! exclaimed Henrich, laughing; then say not
another word, Miss Montaigne; it is a charity to give occupation to
an idle man, and I have really nothing else in the world to do: I
think, too, that grandfather Waldron will gladly bew rid of me for a
few weeks.
You cannot blind me thus, Mr. Huntington, said Blanche,
to the magnitude of the favor which you offer, nor to the privations
and probable peril which it would cost you.
The school of danger is one in which I need a few lessons,
answered Henrich, gaily; and as to privations, he continued,
lowering his voice, to escape the ear of Miss Roselle, who re-entered
the room at that moment, Miss Montaigne's permission to
accompany
her will postpone for a while the only evil of that nature
which has any terrors for me.
Henrich withdrew from the apartment as he concluded speaking,
and proceeded to complete his preparations, not forgetting to
provide
for the liquidation of his debt to his forest friends, the payment
of which involved the loss of his favorite rifle. It became necessary
to procure a substitute for this weapon, and he was fortunate in
obtaining one of tried worth, which had acquired a wide celebrity,
even in less skilful hands than those by which it was in future to be
wielded. The party set out about nine o'clock in the evening,
accompanied by a few slaves, who transported to the boat some
light but necessary stores, and brought back intelligence to Mynheer
Waldron and his household that the travellers were safely embarked.
Leaving them to pursue their nocturnal voyage, we must precede
them to the camp of Count Carlton, and take a hasty survey of its
inmates and their condition.
CHAPTER XV.
What the dl should move me to undertake the recovery of this drum; being not
ignorant of the impossibility, and knowing I had no such purpose? I must give myself
some hurts, and say I got them in exploit.
Parolles in All's Well that Ends Well
.
Louis Carlton
had not failed in making good his resolution to
visit Castle Montaigne, on the invitation of its proprietor, extended
to him, as has been seen, when the baron was about visiting Europe.
He had not seen fit, however, to wait for the return of the latter,
believing that if delays were ordinarily dangerous, they were
peculiarly
so in the prosecution of such delicate missions as that on
which he was now bound. The baron was rich and powerful and
had an only daughter at home, whom he had fairly offered to the
countsuch, at least, was Carlton's understanding of the affair, and
Governor Vaudreuil might laugh his fill at the idea of his nephew
wedding a maiden upon whose escutcheon a bow and arrow might
properly be emblazoned; yet if the heiress was at all attractive in
person, he had resolved not to be driven by ridicule from his design.
In the
salons
of Paris, the descendant of a Huron prince might
expect rather to derive a lustre from her ancestry than to find it a
subject of reproach; and with Wealth and Beauty for auxiliaries,
and the advantage of the count's reputation, which, although a
little shattered, was still potent in his own estimation, he did not
doubt she would win the
clat
of the fashionable world. All his
fears had been that Myrtle would prove to partake too strongly of
the Indian characteristics of countenance and demeanor; but on
these points he was destined to be most agreeably disappointed.
He was welcomed at the castle, where he introduced himself as a
friend of the baron, and soon attained a degree of no little intimacy
with its inmates. His gay and pleasing manners were attractive to
Myrtle, and even won many a smile of approval from the reserved
and diffident baroness, while both were astonished to receive so
many marks of attention and kindness from a stranger of
distinguished
appearance. He became the companion of the daughter in
her rambles and sports, and put his invention to task in devising
new varieties of pastime for her amusement; and instead of finding,
as he had feared, only the glimmerings of beauty and grace in her
person, he was continually compelled to accord to her unstudied
charms the tribute of admiration.
The baroness, little accustomed to deference, beheld his courtesy
towards herself with ill-disguised astonishment; but his apparent
kindness to her child entirely won the heart of the Huron mother.
Myrtle knew not how to understand the addresses of the stranger;
but artless and truthful herself, she could think no ill of a man whose
whole endeavor seemed to be to contribute to her enjoyment.
Affairs at the castle were in this position, when the baron
returned, not a little pleased to believe that Carlton's eagerness
to meet Miss Montaigne had induced him to anticipate her arrival
by his visit. He hastened, therefore, to explain to his guest the
accident which had separated himself and his daughter, and which
had left the latter almost a prisoner in New York, while the very
extremity of the count's amazement alone prevented him from
betraying his own extraordinary mistake. That there was another
daughter of Montaigne, exclusively of European origin, was a fact,
which now for the first time became known to him; and he
shuddered
to think how nearly he had committed himself to the forest
maiden, while the favored child and prospective heiress, a lady of
unsullied birth, of rank, education, and perhaps even beauty, had
been indirectly offered to his alliance.
No time was to be lost in rectifying so gross an error; nor did
he feel the lightest scruple at deserting Myrtle, by reason of any
consequences which might ensue to her. If he had won her heart,
which the quick discernment of vanity plainly perceived, it had been
with no open profession of attachment; and he knew too well the
humility of the mother, and the timid modesty of the daughter, as
well as their ignorance of the conventional usages of civilized life, to
fear that they would ever make his conduct the subject of
complaint
or reproach. He became elated with his new anticipations;
and as he contemplated in perspective the sunny path of prosperity
which seemed to stretch far away in the future, he forgot his past
reverses, and gained an augmented sense of his own importance.
But it was with little pleasure he reflected that before Miss
Montaigne
could be converted into a bride she was to be rescued from
captivity; and while he waited to learn the baron's plans for
effecting
this object, the latter remained in daily expectation of an offer
from his guest to engage personally in the enterprise. Carlton
was a soldier only in name; he had seen no service, yet he had not
failed to make his martial reputation indirectly the subject of boast
before the baron, in whose estimation he knew that military talents
transcended every other quality. Of Indian warfare he had an
exceeding dread, and while affecting a soldier's contempt for every
danger, he could not divest his mind of the terror inspired by the
contemplation of ambuscades, bush fights, and midnight onsets
accompanied by the usual accessaries of savage war. He was in
short a coward, with a coward's usual bravado, but he soon found
that there was no middle course of action to pursue if he would
retain for a moment the confidence of Montaigne.
The baron disclosed to him his plan for the rescue of his daughter,
and the very flashing of his eye told the alarmed count that he
expected him not only to take command of the expedition, but to
accept the post as a most distinguished favor. Hesitation would
have been as disgraceful as refusal, and Carlton, practised in
dissimulation
,
promptly begged the command with every appearance of
earnestness, trusting to expedients for still escaping the danger, if
before the time for setting out he should not become satisfied that
it was really trivial.
Several weeks elapsed before the baron deemed it prudent for the
party to start, and during this interval, Carlton took every
opportunity
,
by indirect means, to gain a knowledge of the extent of the
perils to be encountered, resolving if they proved too alarming, to
avoid them by summoning himself suddenly back to Quebec or even
to Paris, if necessary, on business of the last importance. As such a
course, however, would be open to suspicion, and would doubtless
terminate his prospects of winning the hand of the heiress, it was
only to be resorted to in extremity, while, if the risk was but light,
he resolved to face it for the sake of the prize in view, which he
thought would be made doubly sure to him by his seeming valor.
The Lynx, with whom his opportunity to converse was not infrequent,
and who was to occupy a command second to himself in the party,
spoke with unfeigned contempt of the danger, and the soldiers, who
were detailed for this duty, not lacking the spirit of gasconade
incident
,
at that day, to their profession, were equally boastful of the
safety with which their object was to be accomplished.
The ultimate choice of the count has been seen, but the details of
his ill-disguised pusillanimity, during the descent to New York, as
they are not directly connected with the narrative, need not be
described. It was sufficient to win for him the scorn of the Huron
chief, but the spirit of discipline, which had been sedulously
inculcated
by Montaigne among his Indian allies, had induced the former
not only to forbear comment upon the conduct of his superior, but to
yield to him such a ready obedience as the count imagined could
only proceed from the utmost confidence in his own judgment and
military skill. His movements had, notwithstanding, been silently
influenced to a great extent by the Lynx, and it was owing to this
circumstance that he had succeeded in reaching the island of
Manhattan
in safety, although, of course, with wonderfully augmented
views of his own prowess and wisdom.
Whatever Count Carlton was in conceit and vanity at Castle
Montaigne
,
that he was in a quadrupled degree in his little cavernous
camp on the bank of the Hudson, where he became impatient of no
inconvenience more than of the deprivation of a fitting auditory for
the story of his achievements. Yet the prolonged absence of the
Huron gradually awakened his alarm, and when the shades of the
second evening were setting in without the return of the messenger,
his approhensions became extreme. If the Lynx was a prisoner, not
only was his whole design frustrated, but his own position could not
long be safe, for however incapable the Indian might be of betraying
his friends, the letter which he carried would reveal the fact that he
had coadjutors somewhere in the vicinity of the city.
But he would not entertain so unwelcome a belief, and having
sought counsel of no one, he little dreamed how great was the
probability
of such an event having occurred. He stood looking
gloomily from his sheltered retreat upon the adjacent river, and the
Algonquin, with quick watchful eye, loitered at his side, evidently
courting some encouragement to speak, when Carlton, forgetting his
self-sufficiency in his uneasiness, addressed him with seeming
carelessness
.
The Lynx is slow of foot, he said, or he has lost his way;
what think you, Anak?
The Lynx is a prisoner, replied the Indian, calmly.
A prisoner! responded the count, now thoroughly alarmed;
how can you know this? surely you do but guessthe Huron
would not easily be taken.
The sun has twice gone down since our brother left the camp,
the Algonquin answered, pointing to the west; he is switt as the
roe, the path of the bee is not straighter than hisyet he comes
not back.
But he waits for the ladies, Anak; they are not ready.
6*
Is there no night in the English city? does not the wind come
and go? why has his voice not been heard among us to say that all
is well? The Lynx has been takenyesterdayI have said.
Carlton turned pale at this confident assertion, which his opinion
of Indian sagacity would not permit him to disregard. With
childish
eagerness he turned to the soldiers, hoping to find something
in their suggestions which would weaken the force of the other's
suspicions, but in this he was disappointed.
If Anak, there, says the Lynx is caught, answered the most
voluble of the party, a tall, stout man, whose good-natured face
was scamed with long wound-like traces of the small-poxif Anak
says he is caught, then good bye to the Lynx, sir; I've known that
Algonquin five years, have fought by his side in twenty battles with
the Iroquois, have hunted with him, eaten with him, slept with him,
and never knew him out of his reckoning, but once, sir; he talks
but little, and gives fewer opinions, perhaps, than a lawyer, but when
he does speak, it is to the point.
And do you yourself think it probable that the Huron is a
prisoner? asked the count.
I do, if it please your honor, replied the soldier,the city is
close at hand, and the Lynx, if at liberty, would not have allowed a
night to pass without returning to camp, successful or otherwise
besides, sir, there is a sort of freemasonry among these savages, and
the Algonquin there
I know his views sufficiently already, said Carlton, nervously,
and turning to his other followers, he proceeded to canvass their
sentiments
on the subject with an earnestness quite disproportionate to
the value of the counsel received, for being entirely unused to such
an honor, they were chiefly solicitous how to acquit themselves in
speaking, and did not dare to dissent from the opinions already
delivered.
Carlton's grief at the failure of his expedition would have been
extreme had it not been merged in alarm for his personal safety. If
the Huron was a prisoner, as he now no longer doubted, the baron's
letter, he thought, was doubtless in the hands of the English
government
,
and a detachment must be already on their way from the city
in pursuit of himself and his party. So great was his trepidation
that he even fancied, momentarily, as the wind came sighing through
the forests, that he heard the rustling of an armed body,
approaching
his quarters. Dissembling his fears as best he could, he
announced with much gravity to his men that their views of the
fate of the Huron were entirely accordant with his own, but that he
had seen fit to consult them, instead of acting exclusively upon his
own convictions in a matter of so much moment, and concluded by
giving orders to get ready the boats for immediate departure.
Although accustomed to implicit obedience, the soldiers exchanged
looks of surprise for a moment, at this mandate. Their position was
so secure, and the prospect of any immediate attack so improbable,
that they could not understand the motives which prompted flight,
and the desertion of an ally, who might possibly yet return. Francis,
venturing to speak, with many apologies, and much circumlocution,
disclaimed intending to advise a departure, and the Indian,
emboldened by his example, offered to go in pursuit of his
companion
;
but Carlton, thoroughly panic-stricken, refused to listen to
any proposition. The boats were prepared, and the party embarked
at about ten in the evening, little imagining that their colleague,
completely successful in his quest, was at that moment less than two
leagues distant from them and rapidly approaching.
CHAPTER XVI.
Tis the middle watch of a summer's night
The earth is dark, but the heavens are bright;
Nought is seen in the vault on high,
But the moon, and the stars, and the cloudless sky,
And the flood which rolls its milky hue
A river of light on the welkin blue.
Drake's Calprit Fay
.
With
the low monotonous sound of dipping oars, and of the
trickling of water from their blades, did the boat of Henrich, under the
skilful guidance of the Huron, glide rapidly along the stream, keeping
close under the eastern shore, where the shadows of the forest
withheld
even the faint starlight from its path. The village of the
Wappenos in which the Lynx had so nearly terminated his career,
was situated near the river, a few miles south of the count's covert
quarters, and it became necessary for the voyagers on approaching
it, to diverge at a wide angle from their course to avoid discovery.
Not that Henrich entertained any fear of hostility from his allies
towards himself, or his present party, but he felt that he could not
answer for their pacific conduct towards Carlton's command, if he
should be unlucky enough to draw them upon the camp. There
was danger, too, if the singular departure of Henrich and his
companions
became known to the Wappenos, that some gossipping or
treacherous member of the tribe might divulge it in the city, and
bring pursuit upon them from that quarter, before they had attained
a distance, which would render it harmless. It was an easy matter
to gain the centre of the stream, and thus defy discovery from the
shore, and for a while, they had pursued their new course with a
confidence which relaxed the rules of vigilance, when the Lynx
suddenly ceased rowing, and assumed a listening attitude.
It is an echo, said Henrich, as the sound of dipping oars
reached them for a moment, and then suddenly ceased; we are
nearer to the western shore than I had supposed.
It is a boat, answered the Huron, pointing to the southwest,
where, at the distance of about a hundred yards, the outline of a
canoe could be faintly seen on the water; it is a boat, rowed by
two Iroquoisand the Indian, giving more of a shoreward
direction
to his skiff, resumed his progress, with a slightly increased
velocity, yet avoiding the appearance of flight.
Our friend must possess even more than the lynx's power of
vision, said Blanche, addressing Huntington in a low voice, and
dissembling her fears, if he can discern the occupants of that boat;
I have been called quick-sighted, and can scarcely see the shape of
the vessel itself.
It is not improbable that the Indian sees no more, replied
Henrich; but these wild foresters are trained to the active use of
all their faculties; some irregularity in the fall of the oars has told
him the canoe was not propelled by a single person, and it scarcely
requires even Indian sagacity to detect the difference between the
rowing of a white man and a savage.
You are at least ingenious in comprehending him, answered
Blanche; but did he not even designate the tribe to which the
strangers belonged?
Iroquois is a generic name for the whole confederacy of the
Five Nations, said Henrich; and there is little likelihood of
finding Indians in this region who do not belong to one or another
of its subdivisions; the word, in the mouth of the Huron, may
almost be considered synonymous with enemy.
The party had not proceeded far, before it became evident that
they were followed by the strangers, though in a manner that rather
indicated a desire to watch their movements than to commit any
immediate aggression; the pursuers maintaining a nearly uniform
distance from the skiff, which the Lynx found it difficult either to
increase or materially diminish. The very pauses of his boat were
promptly imitated by the other, as if it were but some distant
shadow of its predecessor, thrown back upon the wave.
This was an espionage not patiently to be endured, and, after a
few moments' consultation with Henrich, the Lynx again changed
his course, and rowed rapidly towards the shore, hoping, in the
obscurity of its deeper shadows, to elude further pursuit. But the
phantom canoe was still in their wake, with a celerity equal to their
own, and a silence that gave an air of singular mystery to its
movements
.
Henrich began to suspect that he was followed from the
city by some one authorized to require the return of Miss Montaigne
and her cousin, and that an Indian canoe, with its oarsmen, had
been employed to ascertain his route, and to pilot a more
formidable
foe upon his track; but whatever was the character of the
enemy, he did not exhibit a ready tact in detecting the designs of
the fugitives, who were permitted to enter the shadows at a distance
from the former, that at once buried them from sight.
The Lynx did not fail to take advantage of this error, by
changing
his course and increasing his speed, but still maintaining a
northerly direction, enjoining meanwhile the strictest silence upon
his companions, and handling his oars with a delicacy of motion that
seemed scarcely to create a sound. The skiff shot ahead beside the
high bank, and beneath the overhanging boughs, as nearly
noiseless
and invisible as anything of material mould could be; and the
closest attention could no longer detect any signs of pursuit. Half
an hour of silent progress brought it to the mouth of a small creek,
which, after a little examination, the Lynx pronounced to be the
one leading to the secret camp; and as the little bark glided into the
opening, embowered with interlacing trees from the opposing shores,
the whole party experienced a sense of relief.
We have probably had a very useless alarm, after all, said
Henrich, glad to dismiss his former suspicions; our followers were
doubtless only some belated hunters of the Wappenos, returning to
their village, and attracted by curiosity out of their course.
I shall be glad if it proves to be nothing worse, replied
Blanche, not altogether at ease, yet striving to maintain the
appearance
of equanimity; but you attribute a propensity to the red
men, from which they are usually considered exempt.
I know, answered Henrich, that the absence of curiosity
forms part of the poetical character of the Indian, yet I have ever
found them a meddling, gossipping race: on state occasions, indeed,
it is different; then, they put on their dignity, like a cloak, and like
some counting-house Christians on Sunday, assume all their cardinal
virtues for the occasion.
Which, like Sunday clothes, seem all the fresher for being
seldom worn, I suppose, said Blanche, laughing; you are severe
upon your forest friends.
Not at all, replied Huntington; they have many noble
qualities, to which you will always find me ready to do justice; but
the want of inquisitiveness is not one of them: is it not so, sachem?
he continued, addressing the HuronI speak of the Iroquois, of
course.
The Iroquois are dogs, answered the Lynx, giving but a
moment's heed to the question, and immediately returning to a
close scrutiny of the shore past which they were gliding; at
the next instant he uttered an ejaculation of pleasure, as his eye
rested upon some remembered landmark, and running the skiff into
a little nook, he leaped lightly upon the land, where he was at once
followed by his companions. A hill of no great height, but nearly
perpendicular, rose from the beach, and a slight indentation at its
base, the entrance of which was thickly studded with bushes, had
formed at once a refuge for Carlton's little band, and a place of
concealment for their boats. Into this recess the Lynx hastily
darted, and after a few minutes' absence, re-appeared with the
startling announcement that it was vacant.
The count has heard the foxes bark, he said, unable wholly to
repress his contempt; or the drumming bird has come too near;
he has gone, and brave men have gone with himit is bad!
The emotions with which this intelligence was received were
various and conflicting. The prospect of being compelled to
abandon their voyage and return to New York, was at first not
unwelcome to the ladies, whose courage was already well nigh
expended; but the reflection that the journey would thus be only
postponed, and not avoided, and the memory of her recent perils in
the city, combined to give preponderance to a feeling of regret in
the mind of Blanche. Some jealousy for the honor of her father's
messenger mingled with these thoughts, and she at once suggested
that Carlton might only have changed his quarters to some more
convenient or safe location in the vicinity, or that he had been
surprised and overpowered by an enemy.
These are possibilities, certainly, answered Henrich; and
only daylight, which is yet three hours distant, can reveal whether
they are probable: it is useless to search by this light, and
dangerous
to make signals; but if you are able to pass the remainder of
the night here
It is at least as easy as to return, Blanche replied; we should
be ill fitted for our journey if we shrunk from so slight an
inconvenience
;
a warm night in the open air is no great hardship, and yet
I could wish, for the very romance of the thing, that we had the
tents and hammocks, which the Lynx assures me were brought for
our use.
We will try what can be done by way of a substitute, said
Henrich, gaily; you have your cloaks, and you shall see that a
forest couch can easily be rigged by hands that are used to
expedients
:
as for the Lynx and myself, we shall have the honor of
being your sentinels.
So saying, he signified his wishes to the Huron, and the two,
raising the skiff from the water, transferred it within the cavernous
recess which has been described, where a quantity of light boughs
of pine and hemlock, carefully adjusted within it, constituted a bed
at once soft and elastic. The cloak of the young man was thrown
over the whole, and Blanche and Emily proceeded to examine their
novel resting-place; the latter protesting, in a doleful tone, that it
was altogether delightful, but that she was sure she could not sleep
a wink with that horrid screech-owl yelling from a neighboring
tree-top.
It sounds exactly like what I fancy an Indian war-cry to be,
she said, although I dare say it is very different, and I'm sure I
don't wonder if your count what's-his-name was afraid to stay here;
therethere, only listen, she continued, putting her hands to her
ears, and looking upwards, as the shrill unearthly sounds rang
through the airdon't you think he could be induced to go
away?
I fear not, answered Henrich, unable to repress a smile at the
words and manner of the speaker, we dare neither shoot nor shout
at him, and he is far above the reach of any missile sent from the
hand; try to consider him only a serenader; he is, I assure you, a
very small and harmless bird,less than a robin, and answers
better to the term
vox et prterea nihil
, than anything else
in nature.
I hope he will answer to nothing here, said Blanche; I am
sure I shall ask him no questionsI shall grow dreadfully nervous
myself, since Emily has reminded me of it; is it probable that he
will remain there long?
Until morning, undoubtedly, Henrich replied, when he will go
to sleeptherethere, that's an extra note, indeed; what say you,
Sachem, is there any way of getting rid of this bird-fiend?
The Indian uttered a low laugh, and raising his hands to his mouth,
emitted a succession of quick shrill sounds in imitation of a
nighthawk
,
which now in one quarter, and now in another, seemed to be
hovering over the trees. A quick redoubled scream of the owl,
striking the ear with painful acuteness, and then growing fainter
until it died away in the distance, attested the faithfulness of the
mimicry, and showed that the enemy was effectually dislodged.
That was well done, my brother! said Henrich, much pleased,
though less surprised than the ladies at the expedient,you must
teach me that note, some time; good bye to Mr. Vox; he has pressing
business in some other quarterand now, ladies, you perceive the
Lynx has taken his station for the night, beneath that elm tree;
mine is at the foot of this oak, where his Huron highness gives me
permission to sleep; you must take our bearings, as a sailor would
say, from your cot, and you'll know where to find us, if you should
be frightened in the night.
We will endeavor not to disturb the slumbers of so vigilant
a sentinel as you are like to prove, replied Blanchebut here,
Emily, give Sachem the second his blanket; he will certainly
need it on the ground, more than we in the boat, where we have
our own cloaks and shawls.
The reasonableness of this assertion was too apparent to admit of
contest, and Henrich, receiving his cloak, quietly disposed himself
to sleep, while the ladies, laughing not a little at their various
ineffectual attempts to gain a comfortable reclining position, finally
triumphed over all difficulties, and followed his example. One pair
of restless eyes alone remained open through the remaining hours of
the night, revolving in every direction from which an enemy could
possibly approach, with a vigilance that betokened the consciousness
of an important trust, and which was, perhaps, increased by the
unforgotten horrors of the gantlet and the stake.
CHAPTER XVII.
The meek-eyed morn appears, mother of dews,
At first faint glimmering in the dappled east;
Till far o'er ether spreads the wid'ning glow,
And from before the lustre of her face,
White break the clouds away.
Thomson's Seasons
.
Day
had fully dawned, and some crimson-tinted clouds were even
announcing that the sun was not far below the horizon, when
Henrich, awaking from sleep, bounded suddenly to his feet, alarmed
at the very profoundness of his repose, and at the conjectured evils
which might have occurred during its continuance. His first glance
was at the boat, where the closely enveloped figures of the ladies
were quietly reposing, and his next at the sentinel who remained
motionless at his post, with no signs of weariness or impatience.
Your watch has been undisturbed? he said, hastily
approaching
the Huron, and you have discovered no traces of the count
and his party; is it so?
It was with a look almost of affection that the Indian's eyes
encountered those of his young friend and deliverer, and for a
moment he seemed dwelling in memory upon the events of the
preceding day:
There has been no harm, he said; a wolf howled from the
hill, pointing to a projection of the bank near the sleepersand
a wild-cat leaped over the boat, but I clapped my hands, and they
ran away.
Is it possible? exclaimed Henrich, glancing at the ladies, that
they have been exposed to perils like these? they must not know
it, or they will even yet die of terror. But the count,learn you
aught of him?
He has gone home, replied the Huron, bitterly, pointing at the
same time to a tree at a little distance from where they stood; see,
the Algonquin has said it; my white brother can read!
Henrich was not usually disposed to doubt his scholarship in the
particular named, but he found himself not a little puzzled on
approaching the tree, to construe the simple tokens it contained, nor
was it without the aid of the Lynx that he fully comprehended
them.
Here is an arrow fixed in the bark, pointing to the north, he
said,that is plain enough; somebody has gone in that direction;
stay, here are six notches on it, one considerably in advance of the
others; that I suppose means that the whole party have gone,
consisting
of five men and their leader; but why does the arrow point
upward as well as northward? he said, addressing the Huron;
they certainly have not gone through the air.
They have gone a great way, answered the Lynx.
Ah, yes, I am dullthat signifies a distant destination very
plainly, Henrich replied, or rather muttered to himself; and it is
partly broken here in the middle, I suppose, to show that the object
of the expedition is defeated or abandoned?
Right, said the Huron; my brother can read the language
of the red men: does he see anything more?
The tree is blazed a little here on the north side with a hatchet,
replied Huntington, and there are a few rude marks, but I can
make nothing of them: here is a new moon down in one corner;
and there is something like a face, with a hand before it; if it is
designed for a likeness of your friend, I don't envy him his beauty.
My brother must go to school, said the Indian smiling,he
cannot read; see, the moon was setting when they started, and the
Algonquin was ashamed!
The symbols which have been described were of the coarsest
kind, and such as may have been prepared almost within the time
which has been consumed in reading the brief description of them;
yet, they preserved a general accuracy of outline that spoke well for
the artistical talents of the savage. That they reflected still more
credit upon his heart, need scarcely be said, since, being compelled
thus to desert a friend in the land of their common enemy, he
sought by these means to enable the other still to overtake and
rejoin his companions; and there was little doubt that every
halting-place
on his homeward journey would bear evidence of the same
generous design.
The moon was setting when they started, do you say? asked
Henrich; it must have been, then, but a few hours before our
arrival; if we had known it we might have overtaken them, and
might possibly do so, even yet.
The Huron had longed for this proposition, though he had but
little hopes that the ladies would accede to it; a love of truth,
however
,
would not permit him to hold out any false hopes of success;
the canoes, he said, were swifter than the skiff, and had already six
hours the start; but the count made many pauses, and lost much
time in frequently crossing the river at the least alarm.
But the sun is moving, while we stand still, he continued,
pointing to the eastern horizon, where the orb of day was just
beginning to appear,let the daughter of the great chief speak
the Lynx must obey.
You are right; no time must be lost, if we are to proceed,
answered Henrich; go waken them, and we will decide the question
with a full council board.
We will spare you that trouble, gentlemen, or sachems, exclaimed
the laughing voice of Blanche, at their side; we have been up
these three minutes, and Emily has even found a rivulet in the rocks,
in which she is making her ablutions, and of which I am to have the
second privilege; I dare say we shall have breakfast ready in a
trice: what would you please to order?
I do not know, really, said Henrich, a grilled screech-owl
might not be amiss, or a few frogs from the creek: if these cannot
be procured, we must try to content ourselves with the commoner
dainties of ham, bread, and pastry, with which my good grandmother
has so liberally supplied us.
Many thanks, then, for her kindness, Blanche replied; I really
supposed all our hopes of a meal depended upon finding Count
Carlton's larder: is anything yet learned in regard to his
movements?
Everything, answered Huntington; the Lynx has received a
letter from an Algonquin Indian who belonged to his company.
A letter from an Indian!how written?and by what post?
Surely you are jesting.
By this post, Henrich added, pointing to the tree at their side,
and if I have rightly followed the direction of your eyes, they have
already discovered it.
I see a broken arrow which seems to have been caught in the
crevices of the bark, the young lady answered with an earnest air:
if there is any meaning in it, tell me, I pray, without delay: are
our friends at hand?
I grieve to say they are gone, Miss Montaigne: they started last
evening for home, but two hours before our arrivalsee, here is the
proof.
Henrich proceeded to explain the various symbols before them to
the great astonishment of Blanche, whose extreme interest in the
information left her little thought for the ingenuity displayed in
conveying it.
And is it possible, Mr. Huntington, she said, that this
intelligence
,
which seems to be indebted to an active imagination for half
its meaning, can be relied oncan be the proper basis of any
action?
It is as reliable as ever were general orders under the
sign-manual
of the Baron Montaigne, answered the young man promptly;
I would venture my life on its accuracy; the Lynx has not thought
it necessary even to look for any corroborative testimony, and only
waits your decision as to your wishes.
What can I decide? what ought I to do? she asked, looking
imploringly, and with an alarmed air upon HuntingtonSurely,
surely we cannot continue our journey, with only yourself and the Lynx
for our protectors; nothing, indeed, but my father's injunctions
would have induced me to attempt it, even with the larger escort
which we anticipated. There can be but slight hope of overtaking
the count if we should follow him, and it only remains to return to
the city: what think you, Mr. Huntington, does not prudence
demand such a course, and have I not done all that duty requires
in trying to meet the wishes of my father?
You certainly have discharged your full duty, Miss Montaigne,
if I can correctly estimate your position, Henrich answered, and
prudence, as you say, forbids the thought of attempting to travel to
Castle Montaigne, with so slight a guard; yet I own that I speak
with the bias of a strong wish for your return to New York. The
Huron thinks there would be a chance of our overtaking his late
companions, but scarcely claims it, I believe, to be very probable.
Doubtless, we must return, said Blanche, yet we will leave
nothing in reason, undone; it is early, and the day will be long; if
you please, therefore, and the Lynx is willing
You
command
this company, Miss Montaigne, said Henrich,
smiling, please to speak in the imperative mood; no eastern despot
has a more willing slave than the Huron seems disposed to be to
you,and I, you know, am his brother.
You honor me overmuch. The Sultaness, then, if you will have
it so, will proceed in her barge up the river for the space of three or
four hours; if within that time no trace of our recusant subjects can
be found, we will return and abandon the search. The count, you
know, she continued, dropping her assumed air, may have
encamped on the shore, and may discover us from his hiding-place;
he may not think it prudent to travel by daylight so near the
English capital.
The plan of action being once settled, no time was lost in
carrying
it out; the boat was re-transferred to the creek, and, within
a few minutes, the whole company embarked, not a little elated with
the novelty and interest of the occasion. The morning was fine
and the air exhilarating, and there were many conspiring causes to
throw joy and gladness into young and confident hearts, buoyant
with a thousand indefinite yet brilliant hopes. They dropped
quietly down the glassy stream, and into the broad blue river,
greeted by the early song of birds, and catching the fragrance of a
thousand flowers; while the voice of the chirruping squirrel, and the
tapping of the busy woodpecker, and the far faint voice of the wary
crow, and now and then the crashing tread of some larger animal,
startled from his repose, told that the forests were alive with their
countless varieties of existence; aye, and all were happy, and were
proclaiming to the dull eye and ear of man, plainer than printed
tomes or sounding speech, the one great beneficent Author of
Nature.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Calm is the deep and purple sea,
Yea, smoother than the sand;
The waves that woltering wont to be,
Are stable like the land.
So silent is the cessile air
That every cry and call,
The hills, and dales, and forests fair
Again repeat them all.
Alexander Hume
.
Four
hours the voyagers proceeded northward, keeping a most
vigilant watch in every direction, not only for the party of which
they were in pursuit, but for the roving bands of Indians which
they had reason to fear they might encounter. The danger which
threatened from this source, though slight as yet, increased at every
mile's remove from the capital, for although the tribes who inhabited
or rather who hunted in the adjacent forests, were in alliance with
the English, the Huron guide would doubtless give character to the
whole party in their eyes if the travellers should be unfortunate
enough to be intercepted. No signs of human life, however, were
visible, and in vain was every eye pained with the intense effort to
discover, in the bright pathway of waters that seemed to extend
interminably northward, some trace of the object of their search.
I am afraid to penetrate further into these solitudes, exclaimed
Blanche at length, the stillness of death hangs over them, and the
echoes of our voices come back to us from shores that are half a
mile distant; what say you, Emily, shall we not return?
7
As you please, cousin Blanche, said Miss Roselle, fully
seconding
the wishes of Miss Montaigne, yet willing to gain credit for the
larger share of courage, I am only lady of the bed-chamber to
your royal highness, and as duty seems to be quite the watchword
here, I have made up my mind that it is mine either to be scalped,
or tomahawked at your bidding, without repining.
Ah, do not trifle, Emily; I am really alarmedsay, have we
not done all?
Our dutyyou would say again, interrupted Emilyyes
cousin Blanche, allall believe me, and works of supererogation
enough beside to constitute a capital for a canonized saint; Father
Ledra might envy us, and shall draw upon me for my share, if he
chooses, when we are once safe in Castle Montaigne.
Do not jest at the faith of our dear friend; whatever may be
its errors, his prayers rise daily for us, Emily, and there seems
something
of their influence in the gentleness of the fate which has thus far
attended us. We will return, she added, sadly, and with starting
tears; it will be a disappointment to my father, and he will
perhaps even blame me, but it cannot be avoided.
Blanche buried her face in her hands, and scarcely suppressed the
feelings which every allusion to her parent seemed to awaken; and
while the others remained silent from respect to her emotion, the
skiff was quietly turned about, and with no change in its steady,
monotonous motion, pursued its returning course. The hour was
about nine in the morning, the same morning and the same hour in
which Ensign Midge, baffled in his gallant enterprise of capturing a
prisoner of state, had carried back to Major Grover the tidings of
his discomfiture.
It was long past mid-day when the travellers reached the creek
from which they had set out in the morning; and Henrich and the
Lynx, who had taken alternate hours at the oars, were sufficiently
fatigued to look longingly at the cool landscape past which they
were gliding. The proximity of the city left little to fear from
hostile Indians, and a challenge from Blanche to stop for rest and a
lunch in the woods, was readily accepted. A favorable spot was
selected, and the vessel having been landed within the cover of
some bushes, its wearied occupants leaped gladly upon the shore,
the baskets were brought out, and while, at the command of Miss
Montaigne, the oarsmen extended themselves in the shade for
repose, the ladies proceeded to arrange the meal.
It becomes us, said Blanche, to see that the strength is not
uselessly expended which is required in our service; please to let
those dreadful guns point in the other direction, or we shall never get
past youthere, you may sleep now, if you choose, for the next
fifteen minutesnow, Emily, it is our turn to work.
A dinner that might have excited the envy of a modern pic-nic
party was speedily set out from the varied and liberal supplies of
Dame Waldron; a little eminence or knoll, garnished with wild
flowers, serving for the table, for which even a cloth of spotless
white was not wanting. Water was procured from the creek, and
everything was soon arranged with a delicacy and neatness that
seemed to impart an additional flavor to the viands; yet there were
appetites in waiting which scarcely required tempting; and the
companions, without distinction of caste, were soon actively employed
in appeasing them.
Many good things were disposed of, and some sparkling thoughts
were generated under their influence; but while the mirth of the
party was at its height, a sudden sound of oars, and of voices close
at hand, came distinctly to every ear, and elicited a quick but slight
ejaculation of alarm from the ladies. Henrich sprang
instantaneously
to his feet, grasping his gun as he rose, while the Lynx,
also seizing his weapon, threw himself as suddenly upon the ground,
and each remained a moment motionless, gazing towards the shore.
The sound continued, and came nearer, seeming to proceed from
the immediate margin of the river; but the bank, which was
somewhat
high, and was edged with bushes, concealed the speakers from
view, and rendered their voices indistinct to the listeners.
The Huron signified to his companions that they should remain
seated and silent while he crept to the shore and reconnoitred the
strangers; when, with the stealthy motion of a cat, slow and
noiseless
,
rustling no leaves, crackling not so much as the smallest stick
in his path, the Indian gained the bank, and buried his head in a
bush that overhung its edge. No portion of his person was suffered
to protrude through his leafy covert; but his eyes, brought nearly
to its outer side, rolled, sparkling, in every direction, like those of
the watchful snake, gleaming from the still grass at the unconscious
invader of his haunts.
Henrich's situation was one which gave him a partial view of the
Huron's face, and he watched it with the hope of gleaning from its
expression the earliest intelligence of the nature of the interruption;
but for some moments it gave no evidence of any discovery.
Suddenly
,
however, it lighted with animation, and, at the next moment,
a marked and extraordinary change came upon it; a look which, but
for the Lynx's known bravery, Henrich would have pronounced to
evince the most unequivocal fear. The Indian drew cautiously back,
and when his face came fully into the light, there was no longer room
for a doubt as to the character of the emotions it depicted; terror,
absolute and unqualified, such as a warrior may not exhibit, such as
the tortures and the stake in the Wappeno village had not inspired,
were plainly marked upon his features. So apparent was this, even
to Blanche and Emily, that each turned pale as they gazed upon
him, and for some moments after he had crept silently back to the
knoll, his companions waited in vain for him to speak and explain
the mystery.
What has my brother seen? whispered Henrich, at length,
disguising, as best he could, his own growing alarm; are the
Wappenos upon us? if so, we have but little cause to dread them
but perhaps they are Mohawks from the north?
The Huron shook his head, and laying down his gun with a
carelessness as to its position that seemed to evince no expectation
of requiring its aid, pointed steadily to the ground, and muttered
some unintelligible words in his own dialect.
Merciful Father! exclaimed Emily, grasping the arm of
Henrich
;
what does he mean? let us fly into the woods, quickquick
there is no time to lose.
Keep silence, Miss Roselle, I implore you, whispered Henrich,
with great equanimity, passing, at the same time, a cup of water
from the grassy table to Blanche, who stared at him with deathly
paleness; we must not stir or speak; an Indian's ears are like
the mole's, and the whole forest is but a whispering gallery to their
acute senses; once more I implore you, he continued, turning to
the Lynx, to tell us the cause of the alarm: what was it that you
saw?
The Huron again pointed to the ground, and whispered, What
you call himwith the pitchforkdown thereour good fathers at
the chapel have told ushe roasts the Iroquoissee!
A look of horror closed this explanation, as a rustling was heard
near the bank, and the white hair and black visage of Harry Bolt
emerged from the parted bushes, followed by his long, ungainly body.
A burst of laughter succeeded from Henrich, at once re-assuring
the alarmed ladies, and partly allaying the fears of the puzzled
Indian who continued to gaze with a bewildered air, alternately at
the approaching negro, and at his own now merry companions.
Harry was hatless and coatless, his brawny arms were bare to the
shoulders, and it was scarcely strange that the Lynx, who had never
seen an African, and had been taught by his spiritual guides at the
castle, not only the existence of the author of evil, but his frequent
personal appearance on the earth, had suspected his presence in so
strange an apparition; especially in the land of the Iroquois, where,
according to the Huron belief, he would have frequent
employment
.
Harry was followed at a little distance by a boy of his own color,
and seemed to be in a state of excitement not materially less than
that which had recently agitated the Indian.
Oh, massa Henrich! massa Henrich! he exclaimed, as he drew
near, with widely distended eyes, and upraised arms, oh
massa
Henrichmassa
Henrich!
What's the matter, Harry? said Henrich, laughing; speak out,
and have done with it, if you have anything to say; you have
frightened the Lynx enough already; I don't want to flatter you,
but he really mistook you for the devil!
Oh, no, no, Massa Lynch, said Harry, I ain't de debbil, but
he's comin', sartain; Gaffer Wallon send me to tell you, Massa
Henrich; oh golly, oh gosh!
What can the chattering baboon mean? exclaimed Huntington,
he hasn't come here for nothing, that's evident; here, you, Ruppy,
he continued, addressing the boy, do you know anything about
this? what did my grandfather send Harry here for?
I don't know, said the boy, more composedly, though with a
bashful airbut the house has been full of sojers, this morning,
ramsacking it all ober, sirand they cotched Miss Doxy and wuz
goin' to carry her off, kaze dey said it was Miss Mountain.
Yes, sir, chimed in the senior negro, and Gaffer 'fraid you
come back, or go too slow, and dey send a sloop arter you, or
sumpinoh golly, we look ebery where for you, and wuz jes goin'
back, when Ruppy, dare, seed your boat in de bushes.
It is some new device of that dreadful man, exclaimed Blanche,
with ashen lips, do you know, Harry, whether Major Grover was
with the soldiers?
No, mum, answered the boy, hastily, he wa'nt dareit was
General Midge, and he s'rounded de house, and drawed his sword,
and looked mighty grand.
Ensign Midge, said Henrich, is one of Grover's creatures, and
I fear it is as you suspect; they have evidently learned your name,
Miss Montaigne, for the boy seems to have heard it mentioned, and
this is some pretence of making you a prisoner of state; what did
you say they called Doxy, boy?
Dey called her Miss Mountain, sar; and she said she was ony
Doxy, and was goin' to tell ware you wuz, and Gaffer Wallon made
her shut up.
A thousand blessings on his venerable head! exclaimed
Huntingtonwe must not neglect his warning; Miss Montaigne,
the moment has come for an important decision; on either hand is
peril, and you must choose between them; a return to New York,
or a long, weary, dangerous journey, with, I grieve to say, a sadly
deficient guard.
I need no time for choice, exclaimed Blanche, with an
earnestness
that startled her hearers; I would trust myself this moment
in the camp of the Mohawks, rather than in the hands of that
fearful man; but you, Emily, I have no right to require to share
such perils; nor you, my friend; I will go with the Lynx alone, and
God, who protects the friendless, will be our shield.
It was with an air of lofty resolution that these words were
uttered, imparting to the beautiful features of the speaker, a new
and singular expression; whoever had beheld the marked
countenance
of the Baron Montaigne, and the eagle-like flashing of his
eye, could not fail to perceive the passing resemblancerevealed,
as it were, by the lightning flash of feelingbetwixt father and
child.
Do not believe, Miss Montaigne, replied Henrich, that I can
be induced to desert you; were I willing to do so, the world of
chivalry would cry shame on such an act; I approve, aye, applaud,
your choice, and am ready to share its perils; one more, therefore,
is added to your guardwhat say you, Harry Bolt, at making a
third?
Making what, massa Henrich? asked the negro.
Will you go with us to protect this lady, three hundred miles
up these rivers and lakes, to her father's house; there will be
hardship
and dangerperhaps death.
Massa Henrich, said the negro, I will go to de moon with
Missa Blanche: I will go to de land of de Hottenpots with her! I
cry half de way up here, fear de sojers cotch hershe make Jule
free, oh golly!
Henrich grasped the hand of the negro, and shook it as if they
had been brothers, while the tears poured like rain down the cheeks
of Miss Montaigne. We are three strong men, he said, and the
Lynx alone is a host in sagacity and skill; add to this that there is
some hope even yet of overtaking the count, and our cause is by no
means desperate; only one question more remains to be decided;
and Huntington turned to Miss Roselle as he spoke.
It is decided! said Emily, catching the contagious enthusiasm
of the momentI will go with my cousin, even to death.
If Miss Roselle was ever captious and trifling in the hour of
security
,
she yet possessed in her inner nature much of woman's
self-sacrificing
spirit; Blanche bestowed upon her a look of exceeding
tenderness; and when, at the next moment, Henrich turned to
converse aside with the negro, the cousins, for the first time, perhaps,
since childhood, were locked in a sisterly embrace.
Let us then lose no time, said Henrich; Ruppy can take back
Harry's boat, but we must guard against his prating; here, boy,
he continued, thrusting several pieces of silver coin into the lad's
hand, mind now what I say to you: you must not speak a word
in two days, excepting to grandfather Waldrondo you hear?
Yes, Massa, I won't tell
Tuttutthat isn't enoughif your mouth opens, out it will
come in some shape, I know; but you must not speak a word to a
living soul in two days, excepting to grandfatherwill you
promise?
Yes, Massa, I promise; I'll go to sleep, said the boy, grinning,
and then setting his lips closely together, and eyeing joyfully the
sparkling coin.
The party now proceeded at once to re-embark; and as they
approached the water, an ejaculation of pleasure from the Lynx was
heard, which proved to be occasioned by a sight of the boat in which
the negro had come up from the city: it was a long, light, and
narrow canoe, of moderate size, and admirably adapted for the
purpose
of the fugitives.
This is truly a windfall, exclaimed Henrich,whose is this,
Harry?but no matterif it were the Queen's I would take it in
such a cause: whose is it, I say?
It's mine, by jingo! answered Harry, triumphantly; I buy
him of Winny last spring to go fishin' on de Sound, and cotch him
half full de fust time: and dat's my gun, too, he added; don't
Massa Henrich remember how I shoot de turkey's tail off with him
last Christmas, at de shootin' match; and ole Gummel wouldn't let
me hab him, 'kaze I didn't draw bloodblast his old pictur!
All our fortunate stars seem to be in conjunction to-day, said
Henrich; I knew, indeed, that Harry never stirs abroad without
his riflebut the canoe is an unexpected treasure.
The necessary changes were hastily made, and within five minutes
the two boats were receding from each other.
Remember, Ruppy, you are to give my best love, and our
thanks to old Mr. Waldron, Blanche called out as the boats began
to separate.
The boy nodded.
Will you remember, Ruppy? she asked again, with much
earnestness, bending over the side of the boat, and looking back as
she spoke; and again the boy replied only with an affirmative
gesture of the head.
Why don't you speak, you ill-mannered fellow? asked Henrich,
angrily: do you hear what Miss Montaigne says to you?
7*
Ruppy bowed his head to his knees, but still kept his lips tightly
together; and then, by way of explaining his conduct, stopped
rowing, took the silver coins from his pocket, and held them up to
view.
All right! answered Henrich, laughing, and the travellers
proceeded
rapidly on their way.
CHAPTER XIX.
See he bears the line away,
Round him flies the snowy spray,
I have given him length and line,
One more struggle, he is mine.
Miss Landon
.
It
was with an air of confidence, which at times, before, had
seemed partly to desert him, that the Lynx had taken his seat in
the slender and graceful canoe, which springing forward in its path,
with an equable and noiseless motion, promised a very different rate
of progress from that to which the voyagers had hitherto been
confined
.
Taking the centre of the stream, and keeping a vigilant watch
on either shore, they maintained their way with a uniform speed,
and without molestation, until dark, when they paused for a few
hours of repose. Soon after midnight they resumed their course,
and by the time the risen sun of the ensuing morning was
brightening
the waters with its horizontal beams there were twenty good
leagues of land and river betwixt the fugitives and the city they had left.
Early in the day, they again stopped for rest and shelter from the
heat; and when, after a few hours, some friendly clouds had
obscured the burning sky, they again ventured forth. No time was
unnecessarily lost, and nothing that the strength, vigilance, and
valor, of three men, conscious of a most momentous charge, could
effect, was left undone to secure the safety and comfort of the ladies,
who in their turn manifested the utmost fortitude and resolution,
and a cheerful acquiescence in the many inconveniences and
privations
to which they were necessarily subjected.
On the second morning their provisions, which had been designed
as auxiliary to those of the count, rather than as an independent
supply, had become reduced to a small store, and under the vigorous
attacks of three strong and hard-working men, could not evidently
last for another day. It became therefore necessary to forage for
food, and as it was unsafe to fire a gun, lest it should attract hostile
notice, the uncertainty of procuring it caused no little anxiety.
Harry, however, was observed, as they stopped at mid-day, on a small
island, to eye various parts of the shore with much minuteness, and
finally announced, partly in reply to the discussions on this point,
and partly doubtless, in reference to what was passing in his own
mind, that he saw some ground which must contain plenty.
Plenty of what, Harry? asked Huntington, we shall scarcely
find corn or potatoes in this wilderness, I fear; there may be
artichokes and some other wild roots that are edible, but they will
not give much strength for work like ours.
No, no, massa Henrich, I don't mean nuffin like dat, said
Harry, helping to secure the canoe, I mean
worms!
Worms, Harry! exclaimed Henrich, you don't think we can
eat worms? I have heard, indeed, of your Hottenpots, as you call
them, or some other African tribe, doing such things, but
Look a-here, massa Henrich, answered the negro, springing
into the boat, and pulling out a small locker or drawer from one
end of the vesseldo you see dem?
Henrich's eyes followed the other, and fell upon a confused lot of
fishing tackle, lines, leads, hooks and buoys, which seemed to have
been thrown, promiscuously, into the drawer; the great value of
which in their present emergency, became strikingly apparent.
Harry Bolt, you are a jewel, he exclaimed, a crown-jewel!
how chanced you to bring these with you?
Why, you see, I spected to fish and shoot bofe goin' back
home, de oder arternoonlook dare, dat is my trollin' line, dat ketch
'em bass, when de boat goin' eber so fast.
I seeI see, and there's the Lynx, already, with an ashen stick,
that he is going to make into a bow, I'll be bound, in order to kill
game, without making a noise; alas! ladies, these men will carry
off all the honors, and leave me nothing that I can do for you!
`
Qui facit per alium, facit per se
,' replied Blanche, laughing,
if I may quote a favorite maxim of my father's; we are indebted
to you for both the negro and the Lynx; aye, for the very life of
the latter; he told us the whole thrilling story this morning.
And with a countenance more expressive of gratitude than any
I ever beheld, added Emilywhy, Mr. Huntington, had you left
us so long in ignorance of it?
Solely, I believe, because the exciting events of the last few
days have fully engrossed my attention, said Henrich; you would
have heard it from me, doubtless, very soon; indeed, you will
find me an adept at blowing my own trumpet, but it must be a
very gingerly twang that I give it in this instance when it is
considered
that all which my utmost efforts failed to effect, was procured
by a few frothy words from a vagrant Indian.
You certainly have a tact at decrying yourself, Blanche replied;
if you blow your own trumpet, you reverse it first, and give us
most diminutive notes.
When the travellers were again in readiness to start, the Huron
made his appearance equipped with an ashen bow, tightly strung,
and a small bundle of arrows, while Harry came to the boat
chuckling
over a pocket-full of squirming bait, which, with difficulty, he was
induced to transfer to some fitter receptacle. No sooner was the canoe
under way than his skill in trolling was put to trial, and for a long
hour an agglomerated mass of worms was towed through the water, to
the great chagrin of the negro, without effect. Now the vessel went
too fast, and now too slow; at one time the oars made too much
noise; then there was too much talking, and Harry's patience and
excuses were well nigh exhausted, when a sudden succession of
strange ejaculations gave notice of some change in the state of
affairs.
Hiphodaregolly! hold up a little, Massa Lynch,come
along here! wowuwah; stiddy, dis way, if it's all de same to
you;
the last words being uttered in answer to a lateral movement
of the fishnow den, he's comin',you eat my worms, will you?
hiphoohah! daredare he is, by Jingo! and a heavy fall in
the boat, followed by a brisk, flapping noise, announced the arrival
of the fish, which proved to be a bass of about three pounds weight.
No words can paint the exultation of the negro at this successful
result of his labors, and detecting with a sportsman's eye, Henrich's
eager interest in the scene, he at once offered him the line, which
the other as readily accepted.
But this is not a good bass-hook, Harry, he said, have you
none better than this? a little larger barb, and the point more in
this direction, on one side?
I got 'em, massa, said Harry, speaking from between his knees,
as he bent over his locker, but dey isn't so good, for sartain;
nothin' like a straight hook for bass.
A straight hook! exclaimed Henrich, laughing, that is
something
new, Harry; that must be a spear, I think; but never mind,
yes, ah, that's the thing exactly, he added, selecting one from a
paper which the negro held out, now we shall see whose hook is
the best.
So saying, Henrich proceeded to arrange the line with its new
pendant, and baiting it also after some peculiar notions of his own,
he tossed it upon the water, and for many minutes sat anxiously
watching the result. The interest in the sport had become general,
the Lynx alone who was at the oars, bending unremittingly to his
task, seeming not to participate in it. Nearly half an hour had
elapsed, when a nervous start of Henrich's whole frame, and a slow
steady overhand pull upon the line attracted every eye to the wake
of the boat, in which, floundering upon the very surface of the
water, and approaching, open-mouthed, towards the vessel, a fish of
apparently eight or ten pounds' weight was seen. At the next
instant, it darted suddenly down, and Henrich, distrusting the
strength of his line, suffered it to escape through his hands, for
several seconds, and not until the frightened fish had partly
exhausted its strength, did the angler again draw it to the surface.
A breathless silence prevailed in the boat; the Lynx had dropped
his oars, the negro, with bulging eyes, was leaning over the side of
the canoe, while Henrich, with every faculty alive to his sport,
seemed unconscious of anything besides.
He'm a bass, massaa bass! said Harry, as the struggling
captive came once more in view; I see him finsa ten pounder
but dare, dare, he's off!he's off! oh, de debbil take de crooked
hooks; I tell a-you so, massa Henrich!
Stop your yelping, Harry! exclaimed Henrich, angrily, and
rising to his feet, with his eyes still intently fixed on the line, which
he had again paid out, as the fish descended, he's not off, but I
see no way of getting him into the boat; he weighs fifteen pounds
if he weighs an ounce.
As Henrich stopped speaking, the bass came again almost to the
top of the water, and remained nearly stationary, his captor keeping
a tight line upon it, and both parties seeming undecided as to future
movements.
Try um, massa! said Harry, imploringlyony jis try um
he bery strong line.
Nonsense, Harryit would break like twine, I tell youand if
not, the hook certainly would.
As he spoke, a slight tipping of the boat attracted attention, and
the Lynx, scarcely plashing the water, was seen quietly swimming
from the bow of the canoe, in a direction to approach the fish from
behind, which half exhausted, still lay nearly motionless, and with
distended jaws, a few yards from the canoe. No sound gave
warning
of this new danger to the victim, and in another minute, the
long dark fingers of the Indian glided into the open gills of the
bass, which the Huron, with extended arms, raised entirely from the
river, maintaining himself meanwhile from sinking by the rapid
motion of the feet known to swimmers as treading water. Harry
sprang to the oars, and by a few dexterous movements threw the
canoe alongside of the Lynx, and at the next moment, the object of
their prolonged solicitude was floundering in the bottom of the boat.
The Indian followed, dripping like a drenched dog, yet excited to
actual laughter by his achievement, which received the hearty
plaudits of the whole company. The size of the fish, as nearly as
could be ascertained, rather exceeded than fell short of Huntington's
estimate; and Harry, gazing disconcertedly from it to his own
diminutive
prize, reluctantly conceded the merits of the crooked hook.
But the amusement of the party was interrupted at its height by
the startling announcement from the Huron that a canoe was visible
several miles to the north, and by his earnest injunctions to the
negro, who had possession of the oars, to pull rapidly for the shore,
springing meanwhile himself to the tiller, and giving the desired
direction to the boat. Every eye was strained to discover the object
of alarm, but without effect, and Henrich, watching the earnest
countenance of the Lynx, as the latter continued to gaze fixedly at
the distant vessel, awaited his further communications without
question. When their boat had approached within about thirty
yards of the eastern shore, so as to be invisible from any great
distance by reason of its dark background, the Lynx again changed
its course to the north, and enjoined the negro not to abate his
speed. He then rapidly explained his movements to Huntington;
asking his counsel, and disclaiming any design to control the
movements of his companions. To gain a position where,
themselves
being unseen, they could reconnoitre the stranger, was
however too clearly a matter of prudence to require debate; the
canoe might be one of Carlton's, and if so was to be pursued, it
might be an enemy's, and in that case was of course to be shunned.
It was travelling in the same direction with themselves, not far from
the middle of the river, and an hour's progress of the pursuers
brought it into the view of the whole party, and enabled the Lynx
to assert that it had three occupants. This announcement increased
the general hope that it might prove to be part of the count's
company, which, including himself, consisted of six, and was in two
boats; and as the voyagers were now approaching the more dangerous
part of their journey, the value of such a conjunction of forces could
not well be over estimated. While this probability was discussed
by Henrich and the ladies, the Indian gave confirmation to it by
pointing out another boat, with the same number of inmates, a little
in advance of its consort, but somewhat nearer the western shore,
from the shadows of which it was just emerging.
Then they are, indeed, our friends! exclaimed Blanche, with
animation, while a general joy pervaded the party; there can no
longer be a doubt: why should we not strike out at once into the
middle of the stream, where we may ourselves be discovered?
We must be more certain, replied Henrich, before making so
hazardous a movement; a mistake here may be fatal; but we shall
have farther tidings soon from the Lynx: see how his eyes are fixed:
you may be sure his oracular voice will be heard again ere long.
A short time elapsed in silence, during which the sunlight from
between some parting clouds fell upon the distant boats, and in the
next minute the rudder under the Huron's guidance turned suddenly
outward, throwing the bow of his vessel around towards the west,
while a smile of satisfaction played across his countenance.
Are you quite certain it is they? asked Henrich, anxiously, as
this decided movement was made.
The Lynx can see, was the brief reply.
Whom do you see, and what?
I see the Algonquinthe countand the soldiers: they are
sixthey are no moreis it not enough?
But the Indian's sagacity was slightly at fault; for when he had
brought his boat within the view of his distant friends, he had the
mortification of seeing them, instead of waiting for, or turning to
meet him, evidently proceeding on their course with increased speed.
He had not made allowance for the circumstance, that the sunlight
which revealed them so distinctly to him did not extend as far south
as his own position; and that, although the Algonquin's vision was
scarcely inferior to his own, he could probably distinguish nothing
beyond the fact that there was a boat with five occupants following
them. As there was nothing in this number which could identify
the latter as their friends, the others would, of course, suppose them
to be Iroquois, and would use their best efforts to widen the distance
between them. The Huron now perceived that he ought to have
remained in the marginal shadows of the river until he had attained
a proximity to his friends, which, on emerging into the light, would
distinctly reveal the character of his party.
There was no time, however, for vain regrets; the sun was within
a few hours of its setting, and the night might separate the parties
beyond the hope of uniting. An open chase would be probably
useless, and the Lynx, explaining his intentions in a few words to
Henrich, took a diagonal direction across the river, entirely to the
western shore, hoping thus to allay suspicion, and give to his party
the appearance of not being in pursuit. Having done this, he
resumed his way within a few minutes, keeping close to the land,
and being nearly certain that he was no longer observed by the
count's party. On the preceding day he had considerately prepared
a pair of rude paddles for the canoe, to be used in addition to the
oars when safety required extraordinary speed, and these were now
brought into service, although for a very different purpose from that
for which they had been designed. They were handled by Henrich
and the negro, the Huron himself taking the oars, while Blanche,
with a little occasional instruction, guided the helm. The increased
velocity thus obtained was very considerable; and, as the speed of
the other boats had perceptibly diminished, the distance between the
parties was reduced, when the sun touched the horizon, to about
half a mile.
It was unsafe to wait longer lest darkness should baffle their
design, and suddenly quitting their obscurity the pursuers again
darted out into the middle of the stream, when the Lynx, rising to
his feet, extended his arms in gestures of friendly salutation. But
it was without avail. The Algonquin was unfortunately in the forward
boat, which had turned a bend in the river and disappeared from
view, while the count and two of his men, who occupied the rear
canoe, saw nothing but hostile demonstrations in the movements of
their pursuers, and, following their companions, vanished also from
sight.
Although disheartened by these frequent disappointments, the
anxious voyagers did not intermit their efforts, and on reaching the
bend in the river had the satisfaction to perceive that the rear boat
of the fugitives, for such it is proper to call Carlton's company, was
less than a quarter of a mile distant from them. The sun, however,
was down, and in their haste to pass the intervening point, they had
done so at a proximity to the shore which did not give them the
full advantage even of the diminished light that remained. What
was their consternation, while now exultingly sure of success, to
behold one of the soldiers rise in the stern of his boat, and carefully
aim his carabine towards them! A moment of horrible suspense
ensued, during which the Lynx and Harry dropped to the bottom
of the boat; and Henrich, conscious that there was no time to induce
the ladies to follow their example, flung himself devotedly before
Blanche, interposing his body as a shield for her protection. It was
the work of an instanta flash and report succeeded, and the heroic
youth, staggering a few steps backwards, sank wounded to a seat.
The report of the weapon had not ceased vibrating on the ear,
when the Lynx again had possession of the oars, and by a few
lightning-like
strokes impelled the canoe to a place of safety near the
shore; having done which he sprang to the side of Henrich, about
whom the other inmates of the vessel were already assembled.
Speak to us, Mr. Huntington, for the love of Heaven, exclaimed
Blanche, kneeling before him with a face like marble; are you
are you badly hurt?
See to yourselves, he whispered earnestly,they will fire
again! do not heed meI am only scratched.
As he spoke, however, he fell into the arms of the Huron, who,
continuing to uphold him, directed Harry to bring the boat to
land.
He is dead! said Blanche, wildly, he is dead, Emily, and I
am the cause; oh, that we had never ventured upon this dreadful
journey!
He is not dead, replied Emily, seeking to give the
encouragement
she did not feelhe has only fainted; and stooping to the
brink of the river she dipped water with her hands, and threw it
upon his face, but without effect; is it not so? she continued,
addressing the Indian with tones of horrorsurely, surely he is
not dead?
We shall see, replied the Lynx, rising as the boat touched the
beach and gently lifting his friend, when Harry came to his aid and
they bore their comrade to the shore, and laid him upon the grass.
The motion revived him; he opened his eyes, smiled re-assuringly,
and asked for water, which was quickly brought.
Do not be alarmed for me, he said, as he observed the agonized
expression of his friends; I believe my wound is slight, but I am
losing some bloodit is in the left shoulder; leave me with the
Lynx and Harry; the sight may distress you, and the Indian is a
safe leech.
Less in compliance with this request, than for the purpose of
overcoming a tendency to faintness which she now became aware of,
Blanche stepped to the water's edge, followed by Emily, while the
Lynx proceeded gently to divest Henrich of his coat and waistcoat.
Having done this, he dexterously cut the sleeve from the patient's
shirt, and laid bare the wound, which proved to be in the upper
part of the arm, near the shoulder; and, although bleeding
profusely
,
the Indian at once pronounced it to be in no wise dangerous
either to life or limb.
This opinion, in which Huntington placed as much confidence as
if it had proceeded from a whole board of the medical faculty, he
caused Harry at once to communicate to the ladies, greatly to their
relief. The ball had, fortunately, passed out as well as in, and as bone
and artery were untouched, nothing, evidently, but good care was
needed to prevent serious consequences. Having carefully washed
the wound, and taken means to avoid any unnecessary effusion of
blood, the Lynx left Henrich in the charge of their companions, and
proceeded to cull from his great medicine chest, the forest, some
simple styptics with which to dress it. An hour, indeed, had not
passed from the time of landing before the wounded man, nearly
free from pain, and with but slightly diminished strength, was
moving
about among his friends, chatting gaily on the subject of his
accident.
There was really no occasion for fainting, he said; but one is
entitled, I suppose, to make something of an ado over his first
wound; and then, to feel the blood running pretty freely without
knowing exactly where it comes from, is rather startling; now, if
the Lynx had received that hurt, I dare say we should have known
nothing of it until we had stopped for the night, moored our boat,
and eaten our supper; when he might possibly have asked for a
patch or a bandage, like a child that has cut its finger; you must
really excuse me, ladies, and I will try to be shot with a better
grace next time.
CHAPTER XX.
Over weedy fragments
Thalaba went his way,
Cautious he trod, and felt
The dangerous ground before him with his bow.
The adder in her haunts disturbed,
Lanced at the intruding staff her arrowy tongue.
Southey
.
The
time which had been lost to the voyagers by the accident
last related was more than ordinarily precious. Every breath was
removing their unconscious friends farther from them, and
diminishing
the chances of a junction of the parties; for it could scarcely be
doubted that Carlton would travel without stopping during the
night which had commenced. The Huron, however, seemed never
without resource: he proposed, if his friends would spare him for
the night, to follow the count by land, seeming confident, not only
that he could overtake the boats, but that, having done so, he could
communicate with the Algonquin from the shore, by a signal which
the latter could not fail to comprehend.
The proposition seemed plausible, and after a little discussion was
generally approved. The safety of the party, depending at all
times more upon vigilance and the means of flight, than upon any
power of resistance, was not materially diminished by the temporary
withdrawal of the Indian, and a greater risk might properly have
been encountered for the vast advantage which it promised. The
twilight had entirely departed, but the moon, now several days old,
with a thousand glimmering stars, afforded a light, which the Lynx
pronounced more suitable for his purpose than any other; and
promising to return before sunrise he set out on his lonely journey.
He's a fool, dat Lynch is, said Harry, making his appearance
from a covert of bushes, which served as his kitchen, soon after the
Indian's departurewhy he no wait for supper, fore he go
trampoosing
'bout de country all night? dare's de little bass a-most done,
and part o' de oder; I clean 'em dreadful nice; ony smell; and the
grateful odor that came from the bushes fully justified the negro's
raptures.
Are you sure, Harry, asked Henrich, that your fire cannot be
seen from the outside?
Oh, yes, massa Henrich, de bush is mighty tick all around
more fear de Injuns smell 'em, golly! he said, taking another
relishing sniff.
Wearied and hungry, the travellers, indeed, were not backward
in doing justice to their forest cheer, and Harry Bolt, although
pertinaciously diligent in serving until Henrich and the ladies had
supped, acquitted himself afterwards at his meal as if he thought
the absence of the Lynx imposed upon him a double duty.
Count Carlton, in the meanwhile, was steadily pursuing his way,
congratulating himself on the heroic manner in which he had beaten
off a canoe-load of armed Iroquois, and anticipating the glowing
colors in which the achievement would shine, if he were fortunate
enough ever again to set foot in Castle Montaigne. Four hours after
his victory, he pressed unremittingly forward, not failing to remind
his men that if he left the enemy in possession of the battle-ground,
it was not of necessity, but quite as a matter of policy.
It was doubtless a chief who fell, Mallory, he said, insinuatingly,
to the man who had fired, judging by his dress and air, you
know?
Yes,certainly,there cannot be a doubt, replied the man,
speaking, as his officer had addressed him, in Frenchand I think
he was just preparing to fire when I peppered himhe was standing
up, you know.
Certainly, and then they flew so quickly to cover, which they
would not have done if it had been only a common man that was
killedah, yes, it was a chief.
But if Carlton triumphed, he was far from being at ease, for he
feared he should have a full fleet of boats upon him before he could
extricate himself from so dreadfully hostile a region. Some rest,
however brief, was absolutely necessary to his men, who had toiled
for many hours, and at about midnight he encamped upon an islet,
not greatly larger than his canoes, situated about a third of a mile
from the eastern shore. In this defensible position, he allotted two
hours to repose, and the Algonquin, who had not shared in the
brilliant engagement of the evening, was his sentinel.
Scarcely an hour later, the Lynx, rapidly threading the mazes of
the forest, arrived at a point on the main land about opposite to the
camp, whence he discovered the island and saw its adaptation to the
very purpose for which it had been used. Knowing, however, the
count's timidity, he scarcely indulged the hope that the latter had
stopped, and it was almost without checking his own progress, that
he placed his hands beside his mouth, and sent across the water a
long shrill cry, peculiar to a bird of the northern forest. The
Algonquin, like his friend, was awake to every sight and sound that
reached his senses, while journeying through a hostile land, but more
especially now, when he had reason to hope that his deserted
brother was following his lost companions, and seeking to rejoin
them. There was nothing preconcerted in the signal, but Anak did
not fail to recognise the sound as one which, familiar in his own
forests, he had not heard elsewhere since leaving home; he leaped,
therefore, to the conclusion that his friend was at hand, and
immediately
returned the call by one precisely similar. Delighted at this
unexpected result, the Lynx, to avoid any mistake, repeated the cry,
with some change of intonation, and again the answer came back
like an echo from the island.
The overjoyed sentinel hastened to communicate his discovery to
the count, who both astonished and gratified, at once despatched a
boat to the shore to bring off his ally, and in a short time the Huron
was in the camp, receiving the heartiest congratulations of his
friends. His story was soon told, to the inexpressible amazement of
his hearers, for although his words were addressed to the count, his
delighted companions, listening and questioning, had thronged,
unreproved, around him.
Carlton's dominant feeling was joy at the arrival of Miss
Montaigne, and in this emotion was merged, for the time, every
sense of shame and mortification which his own pusillanimity, in
contrast with the heroism of her real defenders, seemed calculated to
inspire. To return successful to Castle Montaigne, was the great
object of his ambition; this being done, he felt himself fully
competent
to guard his reputation, and appropriate to himself the principal
credit of the achievement. Success, he knew, would cancel all
errors, for no one would look critically into an affair which had
terminated with
clat
. His report to the baron, too, while it
vindicated
his own valor, and with ingenious coloring made cowardice pass
for prudence, he resolved should flatter his few followers by encomiums
on themselves into the fullest acquiescence with his story. Half of
them indeed, cajoled by his arts, might already be said both to see
and hear rather with the senses of their leader than with their own;
and if the Indians should prove more impracticable, they at least
were men of few words, who would be little apt to thwart his views.
As to the ladies, when did a Frenchman ever distrust his power to
fascinate and control the mind of Beauty; here, at least, his triumph
would be complete in every respect.
Such were the thoughts of Count Carlton, as, with rapid flight,
they embraced, even while the Lynx was speaking, the leading
features
8
of his new position and prospects. One circumstance alone
had not entered into his calculations, because he had not fully
comprehended
the Huron's story, and that was the presence of a young
American gentleman among the escort of the ladies.
You say there are a couple of negroes with you, sachem, eh?
he said, one of whom we have been unfortunate enough to shoot:
he is not mortally wounded, I hope?
The Lynx explained with some difficulty, yet failed to convey to
Carlton's mind any distinct idea of his companion, or of the nature
of his connexion with the party.
They will, doubtless, want our escort as far as Fort Albany, he
continued, when they shall be remunerated and dismissed; from
there they will easily find their way home.
No time was now lost in embarking, and seeking out, under the
guidance of the Huron, the retreat of his late companions. The
sun, indeed, was not risen when Henrich, who was the sentinel of
his party, perceived the returning canoes with emotions which he
did not care to analyze, but in which joy did not certainly
preponderate
.
He immediately communicated the intelligence to the
ladies, in whose extreme delight he found additional cause for
discontent
;
and when next he proceeded to the beach, to receive the
approaching party, it was only with a strong effort that he overcame
his feelings sufficiently to admit of his usual frank and open
deportment
.
Nothing could be more striking than the contrast in the
appearance
of Carlton and Huntington, as the first, seated in the leading
canoe, approached the shore, and the latter, standing at the water's
edge, with one hand resting lightly on his gun, waited to meet him.
The count was a man of about twenty-eight years, less in stature
than Henrich, but in figure equally faultless. His countenance,
dark, but not unhandsome, was marred by a sinister expression,
which, to a ready reader of the human visage, was as legible as
print, but which, softened by an attractive smile, was easily
overlooked
.
His eyes were perfectly black and very small, possessing,
of themselves, no other expression than that of acuteness and
cunning, while his forehead, large enough for beauty, yet not for
intellect, was shaded by clustering hair of the same raven hue.
There was an abiding air of conceit, not only in his face, but in
every movement of his person; and this it was, perhaps, more than
anything else, that constituted the repulsive part of his appearance,
and negatived, in a great degree, all his personal advantages.
Henrich's countenance approached to some of the nobler models of
Grecian manly beauty; and if it had a fault, it was the almost
feminine whiteness and texture of his skin. His expression was
placid and gentle, but there was a latent fire in his large blue eyes,
which kindled his countenance, at times, with a strange animation,
and gave token of unrevealed energies of character.
The eyes of the young men were riveted upon each other as the
boat drew near to land; surprise being plainly depicted upon
Carlton's
countenance, accompanied by a supercilious and authoritative
air, while on Henrich's a slight disturbance of his natural expression
scarcely hinted at the anxious feelings which had taken possession of
his breast. The count had not yet landed when he addressed
Huntington in a sharp, quick voice, with the inquiry whether he
spoke the French language, to which the latter, greatly to the
astonishment of the other, replied in the affirmative, giving at the
same time the best proof of his assertion, by the fluency and
well-modulated
accent of his words. He next demanded, whether the
ladies who were in his charge were safe, and where they were to be
found; and without further heed of Henrich, after receiving his
reply, stepped upon the shore and passed to their presence.
Miss Montaigne's education in her father's language had, of
course, not been neglected, and she was able to converse in it, not
only with facility, but with elegance, while even Emily had taken
pains to acquire some knowledge of a dialect, which would be so
necessary in her future abode. The count, therefore, found no
difficulty in introducing himself, which he did with much ease and
grace; and relating the commission bestowed upon him by Baron
Montaigne, inquired, with needless ceremony, whether the ladies
were willing to put themselves under his charge. To this Blanche,
of course, replied affirmatively, briefly explaining the causes which
had induced her to set out under a different escort, and not forgetting
to bespeak the count's favor for Mr. Huntington, a young gentleman
to whose good offices, as she pointedly remarked, she was indebted
for her rescue, and probably for the preservation of her life. Gall
and wormwood are usually considered somewhat bitter commodities,
but they would have been sweet to the Frenchman's taste, compared
with these first words from the beautiful lips of his expected bride.
He replied, however, with perfect complaisance; and on being more
directly introduced to Henrich by Miss Montaigne, extended his
hand to that young man with a condescending air, which seemed to
imply a sense of having fully remunerated, by such an act of grace,
all the services of the other.
A morning meal was now prepared from the ample stores of the
count, in which even the luxuries of fruit and wine were not wanting;
and after another hour devoted to the repose of the men, the whole
party prepared to re-embark. The larger of Carlton's canoes had
been fitted up with some attempt at elegance, for the accommodation
of its expected guests, and to this vessel he gave the more pretending
name of barge, a word common to the English and French
languages
.
It was, of course, to this boat that Blanche and Emily
were conducted by their new friend; and whatever reluctance the
former might have experienced at any seeming slight being thus
offered to Huntington, there seemed no means compatible with
maidenly delicacy of avoiding it. She could neither ask to continue
in Henrich's canoe, nor request his presence in the count's; but it
was enough for her generous friend that her eye met his with an
apologetic glance as she stepped into the barge, and that, unless
indeed an eager fancy had misled him, a slight suffusion of color
tinged, at the same moment, her beautiful cheeks.
There was food for hope, in these gentle tokens so unwittingly
bestowed, and Henrich took fresh courage under circumstances
which seemed far from favorable. She is at least grateful and
noble-hearted, he thought, as he turned to his deserted boat, she
cannot but know my aspirations, and she does not utterly discourage
them! What can she more? it is enoughif she loves me, she
may yet be mine, despite this haughty count.
Two of the soldiers propelled the barge, making its occupants,
five in number; a third was with the Indians in the Lynx's boat,
and the fourth, at the Huron's request, too openly made to admit of
its being refused, was permitted to assist in conducting Henrich's
canoe. Thus they proceeded on their way, with some vicissitudes
and alarms, but with no serious molestation, until about noon, when
the Indians having given notice that they were within a few leagues
of Fort Albany, they encamped in a dense wood to wait for the
night.
Admitted once more to the society of his friends, after his
seemingly
long exile, Henrich recovered his natural buoyant spirits which
imparted themselves by contagion to Blanche and Emily, who
passed from the ceremonious politeness which had marked their
deportment to the count, to the opposite extreme of unreserve and
hilarity. The dislike with which Carlton already regarded
Huntington
grew rapidly under such fostering influences into positive hatred;
and although the very excess of his
hauteur
prevented him from
manifesting his displeasure, he could not keep from his countenance
the shadows of those malign clouds which were passing across his
heart. This new offence was not, indeed, needed to produce a result
already predetermined by the count, but it gave zest to his
contemplated
act, and caused it, perhaps, to be invested with some added
aggravations.
It was with surprise, though without suspicion, when the time for
re-embarking arrived, that Henrich beheld some singular changes in
the order of departure. The barge was despatched first, and was
already
well under way before either of the other boats was permitted to
start; the Lynx's canoe was shoved from her moorings, and lay with
extended oars awaiting the signal to move, while, strangest of all,
the Lynx had taken the count's station in the barge, and the
latter stood alone upon the beach. He did not stand long, but
having watched the foremost vessel for some minutes, turned and
walked rapidly towards Henrich, whom he addressed with elaborate
politeness.
We shall pass Fort Albany, Mr. Huntington, before we again
halt; where you will be enabled to join your countrymen in safety; you
have my thanks and those of the ladies for your services and good
conduct, which shall be represented to General Montaigne.
Whatever
wages your man will accept, I shall be happy in behalf of the
baron to pay, having done which, I shall have the honor to bid you
farewell.
Henrich listened to these words with the utmost astonishment,
but he remembered some ominous looks of his companion, which he
had encountered during the afternoon, and suspected, without
seeming
to do so, the deeper meaning involved.
Count Carlton will excuse me, he said; I have no design of
withdrawing from Miss Montaigne's escort, or of ceasing to be one of
her defenders until she reaches Castle Montaigne; it was with this
intention that I left home.
If such is your desire, replied the Frenchman, I regret
extremely that I shall not be able to gratify it; I have no authority
to introduce strangers into Castle Montaigne, or its precincts,
especially from an enemy's borders.
You shall not have that responsibility, Sir Count, answered
Henrich promptly; I shall venture upon the French domains at
my own risk, and shall not trespass, I assure you, uninvited, on
Baron Montaigne's hospitality.
Mr. Huntington has certainly the right to invade his most
Christian Majesty's dominions, single-handed, if he desires, replied
Carlton, somewhat tartly, but he must not expect me to be
accessary
to such an enterprise. To be brief, sir, for time presses, you
will cease to be connected with my party, on reaching Fort
Albany.
I shall not cease to
accompany
it, sir, said Henrich, haughtily,
while Miss Montaigne forms one of its members, unless at her
bidding; I do not resign my charge so lightly.
The Frenchman's voice trembled with suppressed passion, when
he again spoke, but the remembrance that he was in the midst of
a hostile country, and that he was acting in direct contravention of
Miss Montaigne's wishes, tempered his language.
I am sorry to say, he responded, that you will even cease to
accompany it. The present number of my men and boats was fixed
after mature deliberation, as the one best calculated for the success
of my mission; to increase the number of the vessels one half, and
of men, by the addition of two, would be a wide departure from my
instructions, and I repeat it, cannot be permitted; you, yourself,
must perceive the additional risk it would cause of drawing an
enemy upon us.
Count Carlton, answered Henrich, if these objections have
really any weight, they can be obviated: I will dismiss my man
and boat opposite the fort, and will proceed in the Lynx's canoe;
otherwisethe river is a broad one, and I know of no one who has
the right to forbid my navigating it. For myself, I am confident
that the presence of myself and my man, even in a third boat, will
add to the safety of the ladies; and my continuing of your party
will, therefore, become a question of speed.
It may become a question of strength, young man, answered
Carlton in a low threatening voice.
It may, indeed, said Henrich, dauntlessly, and with irrepressible
wrath; we are but two to seven, and you may possibly succeed in
adding our murder to your already brilliant achievements; but we
are
two to seven, and, believe me, we will not fall alone.
Goaded to madness by treatment at once so unjust and despicable,
Henrich's whole soul breathed a spirit of the most perfect defiance;
he stood in the faint moonlight, proudly erect, with eyes that
flashed like meteors, unable for the moment to restrain the
ebullitions
of his rage. Yet the folly of his threatened defence
became apparent to him, even as he ceased speaking; for the safety
of Blanche was the paramount object of his consideration, and he
could, of course, engage in no actual contest with her defenders.
The threat, however, was not without its effect; the count, unused
to such an exhibition of feeling, stood for a moment awed by the
furious spirit which he had evoked; he looked hastily over his
shoulder to make sure that his men were within call, and then
turned to reply; the subdued tone of his voice and the mildness of
his language giving no token of the malevolence which now boiled
within his breast.
You are hasty, Mr. Huntington, he said,unnecessarily so,
I think: if you desire a seat in the Lynx's boat, you are entirely
welcome to it; but let us waste no more time, the barge is already
well advanced, and we must hasten to overtake her.
You grant all that I require, returned Henrich, now also
speaking
mildly, and fearing that he had exhibited an unwarranted
passion; while he hesitated, ingenuously considering whether any
retraction or explanation was proper in return for the concession of
the count, the latter again reminded him of the necessity of haste.
He accordingly explained the new state of affairs to Harry, whom
he furnished with money and instructed to proceed at once to
Albany, and remain there until some descending sloop should afford
him the means of returning in safety to New York. He also
enjoined upon the negro the strictest secresy in regard to everything
connected with the escape of Miss Montaigne; and giving him some
kindly messages to the venerable Jacobus, bade him a cordial
farewell
.
Huntington's gun and portmanteau were then quickly
transferred to the other canoe, which immediately started, followed
at some distance by the boat of the solitary African.
8*
CHAPTER XXI.
O monstrous treachery! can this be so:
That in alliance, amity, and oaths
There should be found such false dissembling guile?
First part of King Henry VI
.
Candor
is ever the victim of guile. Suspicious of no artifice,
Henrich had placed himself unreservedly in the power of an enemy,
to whose frigid heart relentings were as unwont as thaws amidst
polar ice. Making no attempt to overtake the barge, which
maintained
its advanced position of about half a mile, the count proceeded
slowly and cautiously on his way, following the Lynx's route, and
hugging the eastern shore as he approached the English settlement.
He spoke but seldom, and not at all to Huntington, who attributed
his reserve less to uncooled wrath than to the desire of maintaining
the silence necessary to their situation.
They passed Albany a little after midnight, slightly accelerating
their progress, as it was a vicinity of unusual danger; and this
might have been a sufficient reason for the count's proceeding yet
five weary hours longer without a halt, and without any
communication
with the forward boat. Yet it was thought strange, when at
sunrise he ordered the Algonquin to steer for the land, that no
word or signal was passed to the barge, nay, that the distance
between the vessels had been allowed materially to widen, and that
a time was chosen for stopping when the other boat was entirely out
of view. It was strange in seeming; but when Henrich caught the
eye of Carlton as they drew near the shore he read a picture of
malignant triumph in its flash, which revealed at once the whole
fearful secret. The grating of the keel upon the pebbled beach was
accompanied by the harsh, quick voice of the Frenchman, into which
a tone of defiant determination was thrown.
We leave you at last, Mr. Huntington, he said, and we shall
see whether my authority to control my own party is still to be
disputed.
It is impossible, exclaimed Henrich, in accents husky with
horror and wrath, that you can contemplate such an atrocity. I
am here at your bidding; your faith is pledged for my security;
reposing on that, I have parted with my attendant, and also with
the only means of safety in this wilderness, my boat.
It would be safe to leave so valorous a man in possession of
neither
,
replied Carlton; it is untrue that I have given you any
pledge; my little stratagem, indeed, was almost of your own
suggestion
.
I said that you were welcome to a seat in this boat; and,
indeed, so you were, most heartily; but I did not say, I believe, how
far your voyage in it should extend.
Count Carlton, this is
Enough,enough, sir; I have no disposition to argue the
matter
,
said Carlton, taking snuff with an air of perfect
nonchalance;
you will have ample time for vituperation on shore; he may rail,
you know, who loses. Joseph, assist the gentleman to the beach.
The man who was addressed seized the portmanteau of
Huntington
,
and bore it to the shore; and while the latter was again about
to remonstrate, the low voice of the Algonquin, who sat nearest him,
reached his ears; but scarcely a few rapid words of the Indian were
uttered, when he was interrupted by the stern glance of the officer.
Anak, however, undertook to intercede for the young man, but was
at once silenced by the count. I will hear nothing, he said; and
the man who speaks for him shall be put under arrest,we have
had words enough. Now, sir, are you ready?
Count Carlton, exclaimed Henrich, still unwilling to abandon a
hope that some returning sense of justice would actuate the latter,
I may not descend to entreaty, but let me appeal once more to
your sense of honor. You are
Young man, said Carlton, not unwilling to add the sting of
taunts, to his act, I have said that all words are useless; your
conduct
would justify me in far harsher measures, which I forbear in
consideration of some slight assistance you are said to have given the
Lynx in rescuing Miss Montaigne; but your presumption has more
than cancelled your services, and your actual mutiny, since being
attached to my company, is deserving of death; go, therefore, and
remember that you owe your life to my clemency.
I could commit no mutiny in disobeying orders to which I was
never subject; I claimed but the right to navigate this highway of
nature with my own boat and by my own hands. What are the
means by which you seek to prevent me? Let me say, that the
extreme resort to which you have alluded would have been far more
becoming an officer of the French army.
If you prefer such an alternative, you may, perhaps, even yet
succeed in procuring it, said the count; but I spare you. And
now, sir, once more I must remind you that I have no time for
argument
;
you can continue your remarks, if you please, upon the shore,
and will pardon us, I hope, if we should not feel ourselves at leisure
to remain your auditors.
Further expostulation was evidently useless, and Henrich passed
to the bow of the boat for the purpose of landing. In doing so, he
came close to the count, who was also standing, and paused for a
moment, confronting him, while a sudden pallor marked the
countenance
of the latter.
I go, said Huntington, but not without proclaiming you the
coward and villain which your acts have proved.
Saying so, he stepped to the shore.
You will tempt me to follow you with a brace of balls, if you
are not wary, said Carlton, breathing freer, as he saw that no
personal
violence was attempted. Push off, my boys!
I do not think you dare even do that! answered Henrich,
wrought to that desperation which sees no terror in death, and
drawing at the same time a pistol from his belt; he stood scarce six
feet from his adversary, as he spoke, and the latter, utterly cowed
by the words and manner of Huntington, forbore reply until the
moving boat had placed a distance of several additional yards
between
them.
You hold your life lightly, young man, he said, at length, while
the canoe continued to recede; it is well for you that others have
more regard for it.
Huntington made no response; he was incapable of descending to
mere vituperation, and the fervor of wrath was already giving way
to the painful consciousness of his position.
Carlton continued his voyage three additional hours, at the end of
which time his party were permitted to stop on the eastern shore for
repose. With smiling visage and unusual blandness of demeanor,
he here rejoined the ladies, and apologized for his temporary
separation
from them, alleging that the desire of occupying the post of
danger, in case of pursuit from the fort, had induced him to proceed
in the second boat; and that, his apprehensions of peril from that
source being now past, he should resume his former place.
Blanche and Emily gave no evidence of requiring to be appeased,
but replied, as usual, with politeness. They looked occasionally
down the river for Henrich's canoe, but supposing it to be at hand,
made no direct inquiry, until, their morning meal being in readiness,
they were invited, as usual, by the count, to partake of it.
You forget that our company are not yet all present, replied
Blanche, glancing again towards the river; Mr. Huntington will
think lightly of our civility, if we commence our meal before he
arrives.
You remind me of my omissions, returned Carlton; I forgot
to inform you that we have parted company with your friend, and
that I am charged with his adieux to yourself and Miss Roselle
His adieux! Mr. Huntington's adieux! exclaimed Blanche,
unguardedly, and with a look of utter astonishment, not unblended
with a bitterer feeling; you surely are jesting, Count Carlton; he
could not have left us without bidding us farewell in person.
I do not jest, the count replied, adding, with a sarcastic tone,
but if I had dreamed of the intelligence being so unpleasant to Miss
Montaigne, I would have divulged it less abruptly,
It is unpleasant, indeed, answered Blanche, to believe that
Mr. Huntington could have been capable of so much incivility;
perhaps, however, there is some explanation, and I have judged him
harshly.
There is an explanation, I believe, to the benefit of which he is
entitled, if any is necessary, responded Carlton. When we
embarked
,
last evening, he doubtless expected to see you again; he
was not, I believe, aware that we were so near Albany, which, as the
northernmost English settlement, and one which will afford him the
means of a safe return to his home, was, you will perceive, very
appropriately his stopping-place.
I am happy that he has grown so prudent, said Blanche,
smiling
,
and fearful that she had exhibited too deep an interest in the
event; we will proceed, if you please, to our meal.
Anxious to repair the error of a moment of surprise, Miss
Montaigne
preserved a forced vivacity of spirits during the remainder of
their stay upon shore, and it was not until they were once more
embarked
,
that she dared recur in thought to a subject which proved so
exciting to her mind. She had never analyzed her sentiments towards
Henrich, and knew little in reality, even at this moment, of their
true character; but whatever they might be, she was both mortified
and grieved at his conduct, which remained inexplicable, save by the
merest conjecture. Generous in her judgments, her vacillating
thoughts settled, at length, upon the conviction that she had given
him cause for serious offence, and she resolved not to add to his
wrongs by censuring his manly resentment. A still more painful
apprehension, which at times displaced her more settled opinion,
was, that the very wound which he had received in her defence,
aggravated by exposure and fatigue, had compelled him to desert
the party for the purpose of seeking medical aid in the settlement
which they had passed. Whichever of these views the adopted, it
was coupled with the conviction that she should never meet her
benefactor again, nor be able to repair her injustice towards him;
and this reflection, if not her only source of disquiet, was the only
one which her self-respect would allow her to recognise.
The last prolonged stage of the voyagers' journey had rendered a
corresponding proportion of rest necessary to them, and it was now
nearly noon when they again resumed their way. While they had
remained encamped, Carlton had been haunted by some vague fears
that Henrich might follow and overtake them still, if it were only to
make known his wrongs to those of the party who had so much
reason to be his friends. How such a useless feat could be
accomplished
,
even if Huntington had had the hardihood to undertake it,
he did not pause to reflect; for he had warily landed upon the
opposite shore from that on which he had deserted Henrich, and in
a place admitting of close seclusion from any distant view; but it
was only now, when his barge was again gliding rapidly forward,
that he became altogether free from apprehension.
His next stage was nearly as long as the one preceding, and was
made with equal rapidity; for he was resolved to incur no further
danger of re-union with his rival. Eight hours he proceeded with a
happy consciousness that not even an Indian pedestrian could have
made equal progress among the impediments of a pathless
wilderness
,
much less a man unused to forest life. It was only when
night had again descended upon the earth, that he ventured to take
such full repose as the wearied energies of his men required; he
encamped near the point where his route, leaving the Hudson,
entered an adjacent creek, and led eastward to Lake George; or to
give that beautiful sheet of water the benefit of all its names,
Christian
,
practical, and poetical, Lake Horicon, or the Lake of the Holy
Sacrament.
CHAPTER XXII.
O'er the glimmering wave he hied him,
Where the Burford reared her sail,
With three thousand ghosts beside him,
And in groans did Vernon hail.
Richard Glover
.
It
was near sunset on the day succeeding the events last related,
that the travellers, having gained Lake George in safety, were
passing near a prominent cape or headland on its eastern shore,
when the apparition of a solitary Indian, standing motionless upon
its summit, attracted general attention, and excited no little alarm.
He was evidently watching the approaching party; and, as his
elevated position exhibited his tall, manly figure in distinct relief
against the sky, it seemed to assume vaster proportions than those
of humanity, and awakened superstitious fears in some of the
beholders
.
It's such a sight as I have been looking for, said Mallory, in a
mysterious whisper to one of his fellow-soldiers; this is called the
haunted lake, and these high hills have been for ages the
burying-place
of the Indians: look closely and you'll see him fade into mist
in a moment, and float away.
After which, replied Francis, to whom these words had been
addressed, we may look for thunder and lightning, I suppose; it
may be as you say, but ghosts don't often carry guns, and yonder
fellow, if I am not mistaken, has one which might trouble us, even
at this distance, if he chose to use it.
It's mere vapor, I tell you, responded the other, more earnestly,
like their spirit canoes, which are often seen at midnight on these
very waters; why, when the great Iroquois chief, Whirlwind, was
killed, many years ago, in the first battle with the old Marquis
Vaudreuil
,
who was in his prime then, the sachem's body was carried
down this lake, by night, in a canoe, followed by not more than a
dozen real boats,for his men were cut up, and scattered, like
foxes in the forest; but, sir, those who saw it told me, with lips
whiter than yonder foam, there was a fleet of canoes in that
procession
which no man could number; it reached from shore to
shore, besides being miles in length, and every one was filled with
forms which held up wailing hands, and their sighs swelled into a
breeze that shook the lake till it rocked like a cradle: they were the
dead warriors of the nation for many generations.
It may be so, again responded Francis, more seriously; at
any rate, it won't do to make fun of Satan in his own territory; if
he sees fit to give these Iroquois ghosts a furlough, now and then, to
attend the funeral of a friend, why that's his business and none of
mine; but as to this gentleman on the hill
Holy mother!he's gone! interrupted Mallory, gazing with a
look of fear upon the spot so suddenly vacated,and as I told
you,into the air; I think it grows darker, and the wind comes
strangely here off the shorehark!was not that thunder?
It may be sothere has been a heavy cloud in the south-west
this last half hour.
Ayeayeever since
he
made his appearance; and, perhaps,
by this time he is on its back, guiding it down the lake, as if he had
bit and bridle upon it; thanks to St. Francis, we are not far from
shorebut what will that avail us? we may be in the middle of
the lake in a twinklingaye, and at the bottom of it, too.
If the phantom of the hill had anything to do with the storm
which was now springing up, it was a spirit of no little potency.
The cloud which Francis had pointed out, rose rapidly towards the
zenith, followed by successive layers of the same tenebrious hue,
which seemed to unfold themselves from some exhaustless treasury
beneath the horizon, and which expanded in every direction, with no
apparent diminution of their density. As the black canopy came
sailing northward the wave grew darker in its path, and the rippling
waters in the distance told that the wind was brushing their surface,
and waking them into life; the lightning began to dart in long
chain-like streaks across the sky, and the moaning thunder came
faintly as yet, but threateningly to the ear.
While Carlton, environed between two varieties of peril, hesitated
what course to pursue, the increasing fury of the storm scarcely left
him the privilege of a choice. The darkness almost of night was
gathering around him; the wind had become a gale, and was
violently
rocking his boats; the lake was rolling in long ridge-like
undulations; while the electrical flashes, prolonged and painfully
vivid, were followed, or rather accompanied by detonations, which
now in stunning cannon-like reports, and now in long bellowing
peals, shook the air with little intermission, and added an awful
sublimity
to the scene. The alarmed ladies implored to be taken to
the shore; and Carlton, scarcely less disconcerted, issued the
necessary orders for that purpose; but as the boats, guided with
difficulty, were progressing slowly towards the nearest beach, there
was the sound of a terrific explosion seemingly in their very path,
shaking the waters like an earthquake, and a towering oak, riven to
its base, fell quivering across the margin of the lake. Shrieks of
alarm arose from the ladies, and Mallory, dropping his oar, fell upon
his knees, calling on a hundred saints for help, and pointing at
intervals of his hasty prayers towards the hill.
I said it!I said it! St. Francis defend us! he's there again,
seesee, he's calling for another thunderbolt, and pointing
towards us: St. James and St. Peter,
orate pro nobis!
All eyes were turned towards the hill, where a singular sight,
indeed, was beheld, which, to the excited imagination of the
spectators
,
seemed almost to justify the fears of the soldier. The Indian
had re-appeared nearly at the spot which he had occupied when first
discovered, but he was no longer motionless as before; on the
contrary
,
he was making the most frantic gestures, throwing his arms
violently into the air, now singly and now together, and anon
pointing
towards the forest, nearly in the direction of the fallen tree. A
long, whistling call was at the same moment heard from the Lynx's
boat, which had been following the barge at a short remove; and,
on turning to learn its meaning, the count discovered that the canoe
had turned back, and was proceeding rapidly towards the centre of
the lake. Utterly bewildered by these strange events, he hesitated
what course to pursue; he was within thirty yards of the land, and
was drifting, by the action of the waves, rapidly nearer; the shrill
whistling continued from his friends, followed now by loud calls and
shouts; the gestures of the lone Indian grew more violent; and ere
he had decided aught, twenty Iroquois warriors sprang from a covert,
and rushed to the water's edge.
It was a moment of unmitigated horror. Francis and Mallory,
unordered, regained their oars, and brought the boat quickly around;
but several of the savages had rushed meanwhile into the shallow
water, with the view of seizing the vessel and forcing it to the land,
while others, with presented weapons, stood on the beach waiting
the issue of the attempt. There seemed no possible escape; the
count, whose hands alone were disengaged, appeared paralyzed with
fear, and unconscious that there were three loaded guns lying at his
feet; and, to add to the terror of the moment, the tall Indian on the
hill, who was now supposed to be the leader of the band, was seen
taking deliberate aim with his rifle, apparently towards the barge.
A flash and report succeeded; but instead of the shot harming the
fugitives, as they fully expected, the foremost savage was seen
suddenly
to leap upwards and fall back into the lake, crimsoning its
surface
with his blood. A howl of fury arose from his comrades, who
turned quickly around to look for their unknown enemy; but the
spot where he had stood was vacant, although the smoke of his gun
was yet curling around it. At the next instant a shot issued from
the Lynx's boat, which also proved fatal to one of the assailants, the
remainder of whom, finding themselves, as they supposed, between
two parties of their foes, hastened back to their cover, to plan some
safer mode of attack.
Ignorant how numerous or how near might be the party in their
rear, they were fortunately afraid to expend their fire upon the
retreating barge, the occupants of which could otherwise scarcely
have escaped complete destruction. Still, one of the few balls which
were discharged towards them slightly wounded Francis, and a second
pierced the boat scarcely a foot from where Carlton was crouching to
avoid the dreaded missiles. Blanche and Emily, being in the fore
part of the vessel, were partly sheltered by the oarsmen, by whose
advice they had taken a recumbent and comparatively unexposed
position. It was many minutes, however, before the boat attained
a safe offing, and occasional shots continued to be fired from the
shore, and returned by the Lynx and Algonquin; but the roughness
of the water and the dancing motion of the canoes, preventing any
distinct aim in either direction, rendered them innocuous.
The storm was still raging, although, in view of the greater peril,
it had been for some minutes nearly unnoticed by the voyagers;
but, like most sudden tempests, its fury was soon expended, and the
boats were enabled to effect a junction for the purpose of consultation
on future movements. The companions met, deeply impressed with
a sense of the danger they had so narrowly escaped, and of that
which still impended over them; for they were yet more than a
hundred miles from the southern line of the French territory, and
the war party which was now on their track was evidently of a most
formidable character.
How was it, asked Carlton of the Lynx, that you became
aware of the ambuscade at so timely a moment?
Did you not see him? responded the Huron; the Indian on
the hill, warning us to keep off the shore?
Ah, yes; I remember now that his gestures were those of
warning
,
though he seemed like some madman at the time, and he did
us vast service with his gun; but who can he be, and how is it that
he befriends us?
The Lynx replied that he might be some stray hunter from the
northa Huron, perhaps, or Algonquinand that if so, he would
doubtless join them before morning.
Night was fast closing in, and the anxious countenances of Blanche
and Emily showed that they looked forward to its events with the
most painful forebodings. Miss Montaigne experienced that fearful
sinking of the spirits which seems like a presentiment of calamity;
she had felt, ever since Huntington's departure, such utter loneliness
as the absence of one only congenial companion in the hour of
adversity
is calculated to produce; but now, when unwonted perils were
besetting her, how would her desolate heart have welcomed the
presence of one whose courage and hope were so exuberant and so
contagious, and whose single arm had seemed like a very host for
her defence. Bitter and irrepressible tears were Blanche's, welling
profusely from a heart which, whatever had been its previous lessons
of suffering, had now found in lowest depths a lower deep of
grief.
The consultation resulted in a decision to retrace their route and
proceed towards the south until the darkness should conceal their
movements, when they would resume their northward course,
scarcely expecting, however, thus to deceive an enemy to whom wiles
and artifices were the familiar events of life. Their chief hope
consisted
in the probability that their pursuers were unprovided with
boats; for, if such was the case, the voyagers could set them quite at
defiance during that part of their journey which was confined to the
lakes. But between the Horicon and Champlain was an interval of
several miles, which was to be traversed by means of a narrow creek,
and the passage would be rendered trebly perilous by the necessity
of vacating their canoes at several points and dragging them across
the shallow and unnavigable stream. The existence of this trap-like
locality was, of course, well known to the Iroquois warriors, and little
doubt could be entertained that they would seek to avail themselves
of its advantages.
It had been a question with the fugitives, for a moment, whether
they should not avoid an instant's loss of time, and set out openly
for the foot of the lake, with a view of outstripping their pursuers,
and passing the dangerous strait before the latter could reach it; but
it was believed that the contemplated
ruse
would render the enemy
sufficiently uncertain of their route to compel a division of his forces,
and thus render a conflict, if it could not be avoided, less unequal.
The night, too, was deepening so rapidly that little delay could be
occasioned by the experiment, and the darkness promised to be such
as to be a serious impediment to the foe in their march through the
woods. Acting upon the plan which had been concerted, the
travellers
proceeded southward about half an hour, at the end of which
time, the evening being sufficiently advanced to hide their
movements
,
they again changed their course, and rowed rapidly but
silently down the lake.
The boats kept near each other, and when they came opposite the
scene of their recent danger, the Lynx obtained permission to
approach
towards the shore and make an effort to bring off the
mysterious
hunter who had rendered them such signal service, and who, it
was thought, might have valuable intelligence to impart. Great
caution was necessary in this attempt, and the count indulged but
little hope of its success; not so, however, his oarsmen, who knew
more of Indian tactics.
He'll find him, sir,the Lynx will, said Francis, who, in times
of unusual excitement, expressed an occasional opinion without
reproof
;
he'll find him, sir, as if it were daylight; there's a sort of
free-masonry among them, sir, as I told you; by and by you'll hear
a whip-po-will, mayhap, or a tree-toad, or perhaps only a cricket's
chirp, and it will be answered on the shore,and there he is, sir,
and he'll plunge into the lake and swim out to the boat, croaking
now and then like a bull-frog, to show his course; ah, they're cute
fellows, these savages are, sir; there's a sort of free-masonry among
them, as I said, sir.
Francis's predictions did not prove to be incorrect; whatever had
been the means resorted to by the Lynx to accomplish his purpose,
he rejoined the barge in a short time accompanied by the stranger,
who proved, he said, to be a Huron hunter, known as the Beaver,
and who brought the alarming intelligence that the whole band of
the Iroquois had set out for the outlet of the lake. The haste and
excitement which this information occasioned left little time for
attention
to its bearer, who conversed only in an Indian dialect, and whom
the count did not, in consequence, personally question.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Through the trees fierce eyeballs glowed,
Dark human forms in moonshine showed,
Wild from their native wilderness,
With painted limbs and battle dress!
Whittier
.
A night
of excessive anxiety, of frequent alarms, and of the
most wearying labor at the oars, brought the travellers near the
northern extremity of the lake, not, as they had hoped, while it was
yet dark, but just as the grey twilight of morning was diffusing
itself over the landscape. A fearful uncertainty prevailed as to the
position of the enemy, and a dread that, having outstripped the
boats, they might be already in possession of the dangerous pass.
That they had followed, or preceded the voyagers, night-long, upon
the shore, like a pack of untiring wolves, no doubt was entertained.
It would have been hazardous, however, to lose, by inaction, their
probable advantage of precedence in the race, and it was resolved to
press forward with caution.
The canoe containing the Indians took the advance, and never
were eyes more faithfully used than were those of these vigilant
men, which seemed to pierce the very depths of the forest on every
side, overlooking nothing, and never, for an instant, relaxing their
scrutiny. But everything was quiet. They approached, and glided
silently into the creek, favored by its current, and hoping soon to
float freely upon the broad bosom of the lower lake. For a few
miles they proceeded rapidly, noiselessly, and uninterrupted; the
silver waters of the Champlain were already greeting, from afar,
9
their longing eyes, when the Lynx leaped suddenly from his boat
into the shallow water, followed by the Algonquin and the Beaver,
all of whom sprang to the shore with their weapons, imploring the
oarsmen, meanwhile, to quicken their speed. This sudden
movement
,
which had carried terror into every heart, was occasioned by
the discovery of the enemy, about half a mile behind, surmounting
a small eminence, and running rapidly towards the travellers. The
ladies, nearly swooning with fear, were still relieved to see that the
three brave men stationed themselves on the shore until the barge
had passed, and then followed the boats, thus covering their retreat
as best they could.
The speed of the vessels was at once greatly accelerated, both
because the leading one was relieved of a material portion of its
weight, and because there was no longer need of precautions to
avoid an ambuscade in front. The enemy were behind, and all that
was to be done was to press unremittingly forward with the hope of
reaching the lake, and attaining a safe offing before the pursuers
gained a proximity which would allow them to make a fatal use of
their weapons. The headlong velocity of the foe seemed, indeed, to
manifest a consciousness of this prospect of escape, and that their
only chance of overtaking the fugitives was the present rapidly
receding opportunity. The count, with pallid lips, begged the ladies
not to be alarmed, manifesting his own fears, meanwhile, by the
most earnest and ill-judged commands to the faithful oarsmen to
increase exertions, which seemed already like superhuman efforts of
activity and strength.
The Iroquois warriors had vanished from view after overcoming
the hill on which they had been discovered, and having not yet
re-appeared, their remoteness could only be matter of conjecture.
There was something awful in this uncertainty as to their position,
and in the thought that their stunning war-whoop might burst upon
the ears of the fugitives at any moment, and from any quarter.
The tortuous course of the creek, indeed, gave the enemy a material
advantage of distance; for they were able to ford the water at almost
any point, and thus preserve a comparatively straight line of march.
But the widening channel of the stream began to give token of the
immediate vicinity of the long coveted lake; and the boats, flying
still more rapidly forward, seemed to partake of the fear which
influenced their occupants, and to leap, with living impulse, across
the wave.
The creek, near its mouth, divided around a small island which
the canoes passed on the southern side, after which the leading one
stopped to take in the Indians, while the so called barge pressed on
and took the advance. In two minutes more both had emerged
from the creek into the lake, simultaneously with the outbreaking of
a prolonged yell from the foe, which seemed to be made up of all
the horrid noises that ever woke the echoes of Pandemonium. All
eyes were turned towards the forest, where, darting like shadows
past the trees, the dusky warriors were seen, scarcely a hundred
rods distant, on the margin of the creek. But the same moment
revealed another sight, more alarming to the three brave men, who
now virtually commanded the fugitive party, and who composed its
principal strength; a sight but for which they would have laughed
at the idle rage of their enemy, and sent back shouts of defiance to
the shore. A scream from the ladies, more vigilant than their
companion
,
told that they also perceived the new danger, and the words,
the boats! the boats! resounded suddenly on every side.
Three batteaux lay moored on the northern shore of the little
island, affording the Iroquois the means of pursuit in the water, which
the travellers could scarcely hope to elude: for the long war-boats
were provided with triple sets of oars; and, when fully manned,
could be impelled with nearly the speed of steam. It was evident
now that the enemy had been on a hunting excursion, from which
they had been diverted by the accidental discovery of the northern
party; that they belonged to some tribe dwelling about the southern
borders of the Champlain, was also probable, whence they had come
up to the neighborhood of the Horicon, to avail themselves of its
well-stocked forests of game.
A moment, nay but a very breath of hesitation marked the
conduct
of the Lynx, after which he ordered the oarsmen to row to the
batteaux: one of the men, trembling with terror, flatly refused, but
the word of mutiny was scarcely uttered, ere the gleaming knife of
the Huron was at his breast. The awed soldier saw only death on
either hand: imploring mercy, he quickly yielded, and with his
comrade, bent to the oars with a desperate earnestness that showed
the most excessive consternation. A dozen strokes brought the
canoe alongside the enemy's vessels, when the Lynx and his two
brave associates leaped, knife in hand, to the shore, and quickly
severing the bark withes which fastened the two nearer boats, pushed
them off the beach. They next darted to the third vessel with
a similar intent, but it had been drawn so far upon the shore, as to
defy their hasty efforts at removal. There was clearly no time to
call the soldiers to their aid, for the yelping pack, incited to new fury
by the sight, were making the woods ring with their rage, while
brake, bush, and brier, snapped and crackled in their pathway as
they rushed impetuously onward. Seizing, therefore, the oars of the
third vessel, and the bark bow-ropes of the two which they had
loosened, the Indians bounded back to their canoe, and bade the
oarsmen pull for their lives. The ropes of the captive boats were
intrusted to the Algonquin, while the Lynx and the Beaver seized
their rifles and sat ready to fire at the first exposure of a foe; the
barge having, meanwhile, attained a place of present safety, beyond
the reach of musket-shot from the land.
The necessity of towing the batteaux, of course greatly impeded
the canoe, and it was yet within thirty rods of the shore, when the
enemy arrived breathless on the beach, and flew severally to cover
behind the outermost trees. Well was it that they were breathless,
and that their excited nerves and trembling tendons prevented a
close or steady aim, for their guns were at once protruding from a
dozen points, and a volley of balls came hissing towards the seemingly
doomed party, whose utmost efforts had yet left them within the
dangerous vicinity. Foreseeing the coming storm, they had stooped
to the gunwale for shelter, but the hurtling missiles fell like hail in
their midst, wounding both the Algonquin and one of the soldiers,
and opening some dangerous seams in their little bark.
Shouting back defiance, the Lynx and Beaver leaped severally into
a batteau, and throwing themselves prostrate within, presented their
weapons towards the enemy, waiting for the moment when the latter
should expose themselves to view, by an attempt to reload. The
threat forced the cowardly assailants to seek a deeper cover until they
had re-charged their guns, with which, as it now became evident,
they were not all equippeda third, at least, of the party, having
only knives and hatchets, harmless, of course, at such a distance.
This division of the band, however, performed extra duty in swelling
the immelodious concert which rang through the forest arches at
intervals of a few seconds, and which came back in wailing echoes
from the far distant shores. The wound of the oarsman was slight,
and though eliciting many moans, did not disable him or induce
him to relinquish his task, while that of the Algonquin, though more
serious, was only proclaimed by the trickling current which ran down
his naked arm, adding another hue to its diversified colors.
The boats continued to recede, and before the foe were prepared
to fire a second round, full twenty rods were added to the distance
between the parties; the vigilant Lynx gave timely warning of the
renewed danger: every man was again prostrate, and the only injury
effected was that of boring a few holes in the batteaux, and making
a considerable rent in one of the leggins of the Beaver, a casualty at
which that brave warrior seemed singularly disconcerted, and which
he took evident pains to conceal.
The immediate peril was now considered past; another minute
placed the retreating boat beyond the reach of probable harm from the
shore: the leaks in the canoe were stopped, and, although another
volley was fired, the balls skipped with spent strength, idly along the
water. The canoe in a few minutes rejoined the barge, which was
awaiting its approach about a mile from the land, and the inmates
of which had watched with harrowing anxiety the recent perilous
adventure. Miss Montaigne eagerly inquired if any of the brave men
were killed or mortally wounded, for it had seemed impossible that
all should escape, and when informed that no serious harm was done,
she manifested the utmost delight. Impatient of the count's faint
commendation of his comrades, she assured the gratified Lynx that
his brilliant exploit should be faithfully reported to the Baron
Montaigne
,
and expressing her earnest thanks also to the Algonquin, she
requested them to make her language known to the heroic stranger
who had so efficiently aided them, and whose invaluable services to
the whole party on the preceding day should not, she said, be
overlooked
.
The Lynx uttered a few sentences in an Indian dialect to
the Beaver, who answered it by smiling and looking a moment at
Blanche with eyes that seemed eloquent of gratitude.
These, however, were the hasty occurrences of the first moment of
meeting, for the peril was still far too imminent to admit of wasting
time in inaction. No doubt was entertained that the enemy would
be in pursuit as soon as they could construct new oars for their
remaining batteau, a labor which would not detain them at the
farthest, beyond two hours, and as they could throw a dozen men
into this boat, who could relieve each other, by turns, in rowing,
their lost time would speedily be retrieved. A hasty consultation of
the fugitives resulted, therefore, in the resolution to destroy all their
boats, excepting one of the prizes, which, when their party was
consolidated
,
would be fully manned, and would offer the most probable
means of successful flight. The necessary changes were speedily
made, and the three vessels, including the decorated barge, having
been shattered and rendered useless by the active tomahawks of the
Indians, were left drifting in fragments on the wave, while the long
batteau impelled by six strong oarsmen leaped forward with a most
encouraging velocity. For many hours everything promised success;
the day wore on until the sun had attained half its meridian altitude,
and yet not the faintest trace of pursuit could be perceived.
The relieved travellers were beginning to congratulate themselves
on being entirely rid of their adversaries, when a small spot made its
appearance on the southern horizon of sky and water, which grew
gradually in size, and soon took shape as the dreaded batteau. The
enemy was again on the track, blood-hound like, untiring, unyielding,
prepared for the deathly combat, prepared to hunt their expected
prey with vindictive ferocity, by night and by day, through the long
wilderness of water which yet lay extended between them and their
coveted home; prepared to send their frequent war-cry over lake
and land, until the peopled forests should send forth their roving
bands to assist in securing the common foe.
The prospect of the fugitives, indeed, grew suddenly dark, they
evidently could not long maintain their advance of a vessel, the
oarsmen of which, by frequent changes, were continually fresh at their
work, and which had already given such ample proof of its superior
speed. If they could keep out of reach of the enemy's guns until
evening, their escape might possibly be effected, but the night was
yet eight hours distant, and the batteau was coming down like the
wind, in their path. Frequent consultations between the Lynx and the
Algonquin manifested their uneasiness, and communicated additional
alarm to their companions, and the ladies, disheartened by the
oft-recurring
danger, scarcely disguised their growing despondency.
The Beaver alone seemed entirely at ease, and labored silently at
his oar, without appearing to partake of the excitement which
prevailed
around him. His post was at one of the aft oars, and nearest
to the count and the ladies. Blanche, indeed, was directly in front
of him, and sought, from time to time, to gain courage by a perusal
of his composed features, which, whether they betokened stoicism or
hope, seemed gradually to impart a portion of their equanimity to
her mind.
By mid-day the enemy had approached to within a mile of the
chase, and the imminence of the danger could no longer be
disguised
.
The disparity in the numbers of the two parties would not
of itself have been sufficient to cause the brave defenders of Miss
Montaigne to seek to avoid the engagement, but the personal peril to
which a contest must expose Blanche and her cousin, and the great
danger of drawing other foes upon them by the tumult of a fight,
impelled them to practise the better part of valor while it was
possible so to do. Carlton scarcely assumed longer to control the
actions of the party; the Lynx's suggestions, which usually included
the concurring opinions of the Algonquin and the Beaver, met with
a complaisant acquiescence at his hands, although accompanied by
some feeble manifestations of a conceit which fear had not fully
paralyzed
.
Anxious now, however, to anticipate what he thought must
be the inevitable decision of his dusky council, and thus be able to
claim one important movement as his own, he said, after a long,
earnest
look at the foe,
I think we must soon take to the shore, and fight them from a
cover; here they can choose their own distance, and have every
advantage of us. What says the Lynx?
The Huron differed from his superior. If we land, they will
land, he said; they are twelve,we are three; these, he
continued
,
pointing to the soldiers, would be children at a bush-fight;
here they are brave men.
The Algonquin, who was next appealed to, seemed undecided; he
only answered, Wait and see; while the Beaver, whose opinion
was asked by the Lynx, at Carlton's request, replied promptly to his
querist, in an Indian tongue, but in many more sentences than
seemed necessary to convey the few ideas which the Huron gave as
the substance of his sentiments.
He says, `fear nothing, and go on!' said the Lynx.
Thus overruled, the count, whose anxiety for safety overcame all
other considerations, quietly acceded to the voice of the majority.
The confident air of the strange hunter continued to attract attention,
and Blanche still found herself frequently gazing at his calm
countenance
,
to glean from it the signs of hope which she could not
elsewhere
discern. When the pursuers had approached within about
two thirds of a mile, he relinquished his oar and again muttered a
few words to the Lynx.
What says he? eagerly asked the count, who had begun to
regard the stranger with singular awe and deference.
He says, `let the men rest; let the boat stand still,' replied the
Huron, ceasing his labors as he spoke; the other oarsmen followed
his example, and the batteau stopped, while Carlton, lost in wonder,
made no reply.
The Beaver looked for some moments at the approaching vessel
without comment; its occupants had raised a shout as they saw the
pause of their enemy, who, they doubtless supposed, had stopped
from exhaustion, and towards whom they now rushed with increasing
velocity. Scarcely half a mile soon separated them from the
fugitives
,
and anon this distance was reduced to little more than a third;
yet still the Indian gazed calmly and unmoved.
For Heaven's sake, do not let us wait longer, exclaimed Emily;
I shall die of terror, if we stay here.
The Beaver raised his gun as she spoke, and after taking a
careful aim for a few seconds, lowered it, as if in doubt.
It is folly to fire yet! exclaimed the count, who was used to the
imperfect weapons of that age; it is but a waste of lead.
The stranger, unheeding, again drew up his piece, and this time
his eye lighted with a vivid glow, that seemed to proclaim success;
he fired, and a quick, violent commotion in the enemy's boat told the
effect. The vigilant Lynx pronounced it most assuredly fatal; he
had even seen the victim bound upwards and fall, and then remain
prostrate and struggling. The enemy sent back a yell of wrath, and
rushed forward with new impetus to bring the fugitives within the
more limited range of their own weapons. A few minutes would
9*
have sufficed for this purpose, if the latter had remained stationary;
and probably, at their now furious rate of progress, a quarter of an
hour would have effected it, despite the utmost efforts of their
adversaries
.
But no sooner had the Beaver discharged his piece than
he bade the Lynx proceed with haste; and, while the now refreshed
oarsmen resumed their task, he quickly reloaded his gun. Again, at
his bidding, they stopped, and again the fatal weapon poured forth
its fearful missile, bringing back the very death-screech of its victim
to their ears.
Keep them there!
said the marksman to his friend; and again
the boat rushed onwards, while the undaunted Iroquois, yelling with
insane rage, discharged a useless volley and continued their mad
career.
Unwilling to increase their danger by adding to the necessary
noise of the contest, the Lynx and Algonquin refrained with
difficulty
from sending forth derisive and defiant shouts to their
antagonists
;
but they chanted their low taunts to their moving oars, and
sang, in improvised verse, the praises of the mountain hunter and
his enchanted gun. The count, too, was lavish, for once, of
commendation
of their gallant champion, on whom every eye rested with
admiration, and whose words and gestures became a law to regulate
their movements.
A third time did the stranger hold up his finger as a signal to
stop the boat; and as the long, slender tube was once more pointed
portentously southward, the frightened Iroquois were seen to crouch
on every side, several even leaping into the water, to escape the
winged messenger of death. The effect of the shot could not be
accurately ascertained, the foe having probably learned more
discretion
than to reveal their loss; but as the ball did not strike the
water, it was supposed to have found a human target. Another
volley was instantly returned from the enemy, and, to the utter
consternation
of the fugitives, the Lynx bounded suddenly upwards and
fell prostrate in the boat, while a prolonged shout of triumph arose
from the pursuers, making the very forest ring with its reverberating
notes. A horror, intense and awful, fell upon the little party, who
had supposed themselves as yet entirely beyond the reach of their
antagonists' weapons, and who saw in this fearful event what seemed
but the beginning of a tragedy which could end only with their
lives. The count and several of the men sprang to the side of the
Huron, and Blanche, utterly appalled at the sight, with difficulty
refrained from swooning, when the trembling voice of Emily was
heard at her side.
Look at the Beaver, she said; the cold, heartless wretch!
Blanche's eyes turned to the stranger, who, heedless of his friend's
misfortune, was reloading his rifle with the utmost composure,
and not only so, but his whole countenance was wreathed into a
smile of merriment, that seemed an extraordinary illustration of
savage stoicism. There was little, however, that was remarkable in
the Indian's conduct; he had seen the spent balls of the enemy
leaping like skipped stones across the water, and sinking into the
lake at a furlong's distance, and he knew full well the feint of his
ally, which, to the general delight of the party, was at the next
moment
proclaimed from the opposite end of the boat. The shrewd
Huron, exulting inexpressibly in the presence of the extraordinary
weapon and its wielder, which were doing such manifest execution,
had feared nothing except that the enemy might turn back
disheartened
,
before their numbers had been so effectually thinned as to
prevent future danger from their pursuit, and, to give Indian nature
its due, before either his revenge was appeased, or his love of martial
glory sufficiently gratified. It was therefore only as a lure that he
had practised this dissimulation, and he was now compelled to use
the utmost caution in reasserting his existence, venturing to resume
his erect position only when well shielded by his comrades from
distant observation, and laughing, meanwhile, with much glee, at
the success of his trick.
The commotion had not yet subsided, when the marksman once
more signified that he was in readiness; the boat was restored to
perfect stillness, and every eye was fixed on the distant foe, to watch
the effect of the shot. But the enemy had grown wary, and,
following
the example of the few who had before found safety in such a
resort, they now leaped, like water-rats, over the edge of the batteau,
leaving but a single man in the vessel. They had gone, however, in
a mass, and the quick eye of the hunter was upon them, their gliding
forms and the commoved wave forming together a wide mark, into
the centre of which fell the hurtling lead. Two quivering arms
upthrown
,
clutching vainly at the void air, and then descending slowly,
strugglingly, graspingly, to the surface, told the result. The
survivors
climbed quickly back to their posts, but consternation
pervaded
their ranks; no weapon was raised; no oar was moved;
irresolution and indecision seemed to mark their conduct. Three of
their number were slain, and the magical weapon which no ingenuity
could elude, was again in course of preparation for its fearful work.
No subsequent success could atone to them for such slaughter; for
an Indian's victory is scarcely considered worthy of the name, unless
achieved without loss, or with a damage vastly disproportionate to
that of his foe. Their inaction, however, was but momentary;
another futile discharge of their guns succeeded, and then their
darting
oars were suddenly put in motion; but it was no longer in pursuit.
A retreat, inglorious and cowardly, was commenced, and severe,
indeed, was the prudential self-denial which restrained the victors'
shout of acclamation at the sight.
Follow them! follow the Iroquois dogs! exclaimed the Lynx,
forgetting, in his excitement, that he was not in command.
Follow them! cried the Algonquin; don't let them off so!
And the eager looks of the Beaver and the soldiers, as their eyes
turned to the count, proclaimed a similar wish.
Ohahyescertainly, follow them by all means! exclaimed
Carlton, in a tone of irresolution quite at variance with his words;
yesdecidedly; but don't go too near, boys!
Ah, no, no; let them go, if they will, in the name of mercy, said
Blanche, appealing to the count, and horror-stricken at the sight she
had beheld; let them go, for their sake and ours; the blood of
these fierce men is warmed by the strife, and they will surely bring
more danger upon us.
Yes, certainly, said the count; that is to say, we will see, you
know, presently.
A few words from the Lynx, however, satisfied Miss Montaigne
that her forest friends were not acting unwisely; the enemy, he
said, would come back with the night, as silent as its shadows, unless
now more fully chastised; the charmed gun would then be no
defence
,
and the foe might even succeed in finding allies to aid them;
nothing, indeed, was more certain than that their present flight was
only preparatory to some safer attack.
The chase, indeed, was begun with zeal, and was kept up until
the Beaver had thrice again discharged his weapon, although only
once with any evident effect, the desperate efforts of the enemy
having
soon removed them beyond reach. The voyagers then resumed
their way, congratulating themselves greatly on their present escape,
yet not a little uneasy in anticipation of the future, for the retreating
foe had not failed to fill the air with the most appalling cries, which
seemed to threaten vengeance in some shape upon their conquerors.
CHAPTER XXIV.
Up the rude crags, whose giant masses throw
Eternal shadows o'er the glen below;
And by the fall, whose many-tinctured spray
Half in a mist of radiance vells its way,
He holds his venturous track.
Mrs. Hemans
.
The Abencerrage
.
Once
more must we briefly retrograde, to take up a dangling end
of our narrative, and secure it to the main body of facts. It would
be idle to seek to depict the emotions of the deserted Henrich, as
from the bank of the Hudson, and on the edge of a limitless forest,
he watched the rapidly receding boat of the perfidious count.
When he recovered his equanimity, he remembered, as we
suddenly
recall by day some forgotten passage of a dream, the few
words which had been addressed to him in the boat by the
Algonquin
Indian:
Follow until we stop, and answer when you hear the
corn-bird's call
. They had made but slight impression on him at the
time, and even now seemed little worthy of heed; he might
possibly
,
by extraordinary exertions, keep for a few hours within view of
the voyagers, but there could be no hope of being permitted to rejoin
them; for although both the Indians seemed disposed to favor him,
he well knew that neither of them would dare to openly oppose
their leader. Every mile's remove from Albany also increased the
difficulty and danger of retracing his route to that city; yet he did
not for a moment hesitate to follow the advice of the savage.
Were the chance a thousand times less, he said, it shall not be
lost through doubt or inaction of mine.
He started courageously upon his journey, keeping near the shore,
and for a short time was able to keep the count's boat within view.
It was, however, only by the most exhausting efforts that he was
enabled to do so, for his route led through a dense and pathless
wood, where the uneven ground, the thick, tangled underbrush, and
the low sweeping boughs, with their profuse foliage, were so many
impediments to speed. His fatigue, indeed, became such, before he
had proceeded a mile, as to render his undertaking nearly hopeless;
for he felt certain that the count would not soon land, and if he kept
even three hours afloat, his gain over the pedestrian would be far
more than the latter could probably overcome during the halting of
the party. In addition to these discouragements, another more
formidable still, presented itself to his mind; he had been left upon
the western shore, and Carlton now kept a little east of the centre of
the river, apparently with the design to land upon that side of the
stream, and thus prevent all possibility of being overtaken by his
injured rival.
Disheartened by the seeming inutility of his efforts, which he still
resolved not to intermit, Henrich had paused for a moment's repose
when he heard with much alarm, the distinct sound of approaching
oars. As he retreated hastily into the forest to avoid this new
danger, his chafed spirit grew desperate under the thronging
disasters
which beset him; for he seemed to be ascending the very
stairway of grief, where each successive trouble proved but the
stepping stone to another, higher and more insurmountable. But
words cannot portray his utter astonishment and delight, when, on
attaining a safe post of observation, he discovered, approaching from
the south, Harry's canoe, with its sable owner, apparently well nigh
exhausted, yet tugging lustily at the oars, and diligently scanning
the western shore, as if in search of some lost object. Bounding to
the beach, Henrich shouted and beckoned to the negro, who,
seemingly
no less surprised and pleased than himself, came hastily to the
land.
Why, Harry, exclaimed Huntington, still scarcely crediting his
eyes, what, in the name of the seven wonders, has brought you
here?
Golly, Massa! said Harry, panting with fatigue, I been
looking
for dat are Albany all de way, and can't find um; I tink I must
be e'enamost dare now, any how!
Almost there! why, Harry, you are twenty good miles past it
but you have made a most fortunate mistake for me, if you are
willing to continue your journey a few hours longer.
Sartain, I will! replied the negro, looking back with a puzzled
air over the route he had traversed; but it's mighty strange! I
'member taking leetle nap while I was rowin', and dat must been
de time when dat Albany slip past me. I 'member nowbut it's
mighty strange, dat is, gosh!
Henrich jumped into the canoe, and taking the oars, bade the
wearied negro compose himself to rest as best he could, an
injunction
which the latter complied with by curling himself up in the aft
part of the boat, with his head resting upon the gunwale, where he
was soon giving audible evidence of the soundness of his slumbers.
Huntington labored with the assiduity of hope and courage, keeping
close to the western shore, and soon caught a glimpse of the count's
boat some miles in advance, and near the centre of the river.
Maintaining
a distance from it which barely kept it within the limits of
exerted vision, but which would not be likely to betray himself,
unsought
,
to view, he followed until the count landed, which, as has
been seen, he did upon the eastern shore, at about ten o'clock in the
morning. He then quickly crossed the river, and kept along the
opposite shore until he arrived within less than a mile of the
encampment
,
where he also stopped, and having concealed his canoe,
ascended the bank with Harry. There he selected a hiding-place
near the river, and waited, although with but little hope, for some
signal from his friends.
An hour, magnified into two, by anxiety and suspense, passed
without
the expected token, and the shadows of despair were fast settling
around his heart, when the faint yet distinct caw of the crow reached
his ears, descending, as it seemed, through the air from some far
height, and sounding much too natural to admit of the belief that it
was an imitated note. Henrich gazed in every direction to discover
the tantalizing bird which was mocking his misery, and saw, perched
on a leafless tree, on the opposite shore, what for a moment seemed
the object of his search, but while he looked, the fowl spread its
wide wings, and dropping lazily upon the buoyant air, sailed
majestically
off, revealing the proportions and movements of the grey
forest eagle.
At the same moment, nearer, clearer, and more distinctly than
before, came the welcome sound, and no longer doubting that his
friends were at hand, he responded imperfectly to the signal, and
approaching the quarter whence it seemed to proceed, had the
unspeakable
pleasure, in a few minutes, of grasping the hand of his
faithful friend the Lynx. The words of the Indian were few and
hasty, and his air was more authoritative than that which had
formerly marked him; he wasted no time in condolence or
denunciation
,
but briefly signifying that the Algonquin had informed him of
everything which had taken place in the morning, inquired if Henrich
still desired to go to Castle Montaigne.
I do, replied Huntington, but how is it possible? and if not
so, why has Anak imposed upon me this toilsome and perilous
journey?
The Algonquin is wise, answered the Lynx; my brother shall
see it; let us go, for everything is ready, and the time is short.
What is it that you will do? asked Henrich, following as he
spoke; I know the count will never willingly retractwill you
compel him to do so?
My brother! replied the Huron, I am a chief, and the
Algonquin
is a chief's brother, and a great Bravebut we should both
hang from the corner of the castle walls if we should disobey our
leader.
How is it then, asked Henrich, with indignation, that you, who
are of right an independent prince, thus consent to be the slave of a
foreign nobleman?
My brother is wrong, said the Huron, we are our own
masters
the
King of the Hurons has never made women of us: we do
not wear petticoats.
You came, then, voluntarily upon this journey out of your love
for the baron: you might have remained at home, and will be again
free when you return, but having placed yourself for the time under
the count's orders, are fully bound by themis it so?
It is rightthe baron is a great Brave!
The Huron seemed disposed to be no further communicative, but
led the way in silence into the depths of the forest, and, at the
distance
of about sixty rods from the shore, entered a thicket, which
nearly impenetrable at its edges, grew thinner as they advanced.
Henrich followed unquestioning, until his guide stopped in a small
open space, sheltered on all sides from observation, and here to his
increasing surprise, he found the Algonquin, evidently awaiting their
approach. Beside the latter, on the ground lay a small bundle,
compactly tied, the envelope of which, as well as the strings which
held it together, was of deer-skin: this he now quickly unrolled,
revealing a flash of gaudy colors to the eye, which, at a second glance,
took shape as a broidered and beaded kirtle, leggins, moccasins, and
belt, with other articles of Indian apparel; shells containing several
varieties of paint, were also among the contents of the pack, and as
these were severally opened to view, Huntington no longer doubted
the design of his companions.
We will make an Indian of our brother, said the Lynx, smiling
what does he say? Will he be a Huron Brave?
Most certainly, replied Henrich, with exultation, for he felt
confident of the ability of his friends to effect an impenetrable
disguise, and saw at once how inappreciable might be its value to
himbut whose are these garments? and how is it that you
procure them in this wilderness?
The Lynx hastily explained that it was the apparel in which he
himself had started from home, and that his present Mohawk dress,
although prepared before setting out, had only been assumed on
approaching the Iroquois territory. It was not the proper raiment
of the Lynx, as a chief, but a sort of uniform common to the
warriors
of his tribe, and possessed no distinctive feature which could
lead to its identification; yet to avoid all suspicion, and make
assurance doubly sure, the savages, with ready tact, made a few
striking alterations in the principal garments, by changing in some
places the beads and painted feathers, and in others, removing them
altogether.
The clothes were soon adjusted on their new wearer, whom they
nearly fitted, and then the equally necessary, but more repulsive
operation of painting the exposed parts of the body was commenced.
This was, of course, something beyond the ordinary decoration of
colors which the Indian uses, for here a groundwork was necessary to
assimilate the general hue of the skin to that of the red man, after
which the fancy tints were applied. The hair was shortened and
being matted closely to the head, received its share of dark paint, and
when all was done, the savages, satisfied with their work, pronounced
the transformation complete, and assured Henrich that the most
skilful eye even among their own people could not detect the
deception
.
Overlooking nothing, they next repainted the stock of his gun,
and bestowed upon it a liberal supply of dents and bruises to prevent
any danger of detection from that source, while his discarded
garments
the Lynx carefully enveloped in the deer skin covering, and
took charge of for their owner's future use.
Having completed these arrangements, the sagacious Huron again
bade his friend follow him, and led the way still farther into the
forest, while the Algonquin, fearing the count's displeasure for too
prolonged an absence, hastened back to the camp. The others
proceeded eastward about forty rods to a hill, where the Indian,
pointing over an intervening plain to another eminence about six
miles distant in the northeast, said:
When my brother stands on that ridge, he will see the lake of
the Holy Sacrament: it is far on the other sidebut a strong man
can walk to it before the sun will setdoes my brother fear to go?
I fear nothing, replied Henrich.
The Indian turned, and pointing to the northwest, with a waving,
sinuous motion of his hand, said: The river winds and twists like
a serpentit is a long way before we turn towards the lake, and we
shall not see it until to-morrow's sun is in the west; when we come,
we shall pass near the eastern shore: my brother must be somewhere
on the hills: we shall see himI have said.
The point which the travellers had attained in their long journey
was about twenty miles north of the forty-third parallel of latitude,
being near the centre of a remarkable bend in the river, which,
crooked to a charm, for the next thirty miles towards its source,
presents upon the map somewhat the appearance of a curling
whipcord
,
thrown casually upon the ground. The route of the voyagers
led up the river about twenty miles to a creek which, linking several
Liliputian lakes in its course, extends eastward a dozen miles or more
to the Horicon, while Henrich's pedestrain route, striking the lake at
a considerable distance from its source, was less than a third of the
space to be traversed by the boats. Having received his instructions
and promised a careful compliance with them, Henrich parted from
his companion and slowly retraced his steps towards the spot where
he had left the negro and the canoe, deeply engrossed in the
reflections to which his singular situation was calculated to give rise.
Harry, meanwhile, had waited impatiently on the lake shore for
his return, and looking anxiously from time to time into the forest,
was startled at length, by the strange and formidable figure which
he saw approaching:
Jingo! he exclaimed, who be dat?dat aint de Lynch, nor
de Gollyquin; blazes! who be he? he must be some Irrysquaw as
dey call 'em and want-a my scallap, but he cant hab 'em, and Harry
deliberately brought his gun to bear upon the supposed enemy, still
continuing his soliloquy as he tried to perfect his aim, which the
intervening trees somewhat hindered, and waiting for a little nearer
approach of the stranger: he most a too fine looking fellow to shoot
down like a bearbut he
must
comehe no see me, and de first
ting he knows, he wont know nottinggolly, old gun! you nebber
did sich a job as dis ere aforedis aint no turkeynow den, look
sharp and you shall hab good cleanin' up to-morrow.
The negro, indeed, had grown nervous, with the prospect, for the
first time in his life, of shedding human blood, and being certain that
he was unseen, waited longer than was really necessary for the
accomplishment of his object. He had killed a bird at thrice the
distance, and a bounding deer still more remote, but Henrich, by one
of those minute events, the consequences of which, so vastly
disproportionate to their seeming cause, indicate the unseen agency
of Providence, became aware at this instant of his danger. A
misstep
caused him to stumble, and on recovering himself and looking
up, his eye fell upon Harry and his presented weapon, just in time
to allow of his springing, Indian-like, behind a tree for safety. He
at once understood the negro's very natural mistake, and shouted to
him from his shelter, without daring to look forth: Harry!
Harry! don't fireit's IHarryI say, Harry!
Nonoyou don't Harry me, old fellow! said the negro,
stepping cautiously out on one side, with his gun still levelled, and
trying to get a view of Huntington, who was compelled to retreat
warily around the treewhat a fool I was not to shoot when I hab
sich a good chanceonly let me git anudder once, and I show him!
Harry Bolt! Harry Bolt! shouted Huntington, now fully
alarmed, and presenting his own weapon towards his assailant
don't fire, for Heaven's sakeIt's I, I tell you, Henrich Huntington:
stand still, or I shall be obliged to shoot youit's I, Harry!
Oh! it's you, is it? said Harry, comprehending, in his
excitement
,
only the last words of the other, and retreating in his turn
behind a tree, to avoid the expected shot'spose it
is
youso is
dis ere
me
what den? now you jes show your red pate round dat
treedat's allelse you stay dare till Mass Henrich come back and
den we hab you on bofe sides.
Harry, you fool! you idiot! you dolt! Harry, I say!
Golly, but he must
know
me! said Harryand den he talk
good English too, for an Indian.
Don't you know your friend Henrich Huntington? asked the
seeming savage, but without daring to expose the smallest part of his
body.
'Course I do, answered the other, keeping equally close behind
his cover, and still unsuspicious of the true state of the casehe's
coming pretty soon, so you better s'render!
He's here, I tell you againI am Henrich myself!
You're a lying Injun! replied the other, indignantlyI know
your tricks: Mass Henrich is a white gempleman, and you are a red
and black sabbage!
But the Lynx has dressed me up, and painted me, Harry!
said Huntington, soothinglythese are his clothesseeput
down your gun and I will put mine down, and then come and
examine me.
Harry peered cautiously from his tree, and seemed slightly
staggered: I believe you liar and tief, he saidbut put-a-down
your gun and I put-a-mine down: I aint afraid of you on a
rough-and
tumble fight, any how!
Henrich placed his weapon on the ground and the negro did the
same, and both advanced a step.
Habn't you got a knife, you scaramouch you? asked Harry,
suspiciously.
No, Harry, said Huntington, but I have a pistolshall I lay
it down?
Sartain, put em downoh you dybollical debbilyou bin
kill-a Mass Henrich, and stole his pistol: I'll tear you into a tousen
pieces.
Now, Harry, listen! said Henrich, laughingwhich do you
think is the best to catch a bass with, a straight hook or a crooked
one?
This fortunate reference to the sport of a preceding day at once
fully dispelled the negro's illusion: he darted quickly to his friend's
side, exclaiming:
Oh Massa Henrich, I know you now, and dat your voice, too,
for sartainoh Mass Henrich! oh jingo! blazes! golly! oh
gosh!
Mass Henrich, 'spose I
hab
shoot you! and the nearly frantic negro
danced around his friend, now seizing one arm, and now the other,
and manifesting the utmost terror at the appalling thought. It was
several minutes before the faithful fellow could recover his
equanimity
,
and when his trepidation had subsided, his mind passed to
the opposite mood of merriment at Henrich's strange appearance.
Ah dat Lynchdat Lynch! What a genus he be! he said, feeling
of kirtle, belt, and moccasins in turn, and chuckling with hysterical
laughterand he smash-a your splennid gun, too, what send a
ball most to Skamkatkybut nebber mind; it wont hurt itoh dat
Lynchoh dat Lynch!
But Huntington had no time to lose, and it was with much regret
that he now prepared again to part with his faithful servitor, who
begged earnestly to be allowed to accompany him, or at least to
follow the route of the boats in his canoe. There were obvious
reasons, however, why this request could not be complied with, and
exacting a promise from Harry to make no such attempt, but to
return at once to Albany, he again bade him farewell, and set out
on his lonely journey through the forest. His route had been too
distinctly pointed out by the sagacious Huron to admit of his
mistaking it, and he succeeded, with little difficulty, in attaining the
shore of Lake George on the same evening, where he found a safe
shelter, and, what his fatigue had fully earned, a night's refreshing
rest.
On the morrow, he sought the highest land, in the immediate
vicinity of the shore, and while maintaining an unremitting watch
for enemies, he also kept a vigilant look-out towards the south for the
expected voyagers. His success not only in rejoining them, but in
detecting and assisting to defeat an ambuscade which had been laid
for their destruction, has been already fully recorded.
CHAPTER XXV.
Ye've trailed me through the forest;
Ye've tracked me o'er the stream;
And, struggling through the everglade,
Your bristling bayonets gleam.
G. W.
Patten
.
It
was about mid-day when Count Carlton's engagement, if such
it may be called, with the Iroquois, had terminated, and when the
voyagers, relieved from apprehension of immediate danger, resumed
their route with comparatively light hearts. To Miss Montaigne,
however, returned none of that buoyancy of spirit which, despite
privation
and peril, had marked her conduct during the first few days
of the journey. That repeated alarms and a still abiding uneasiness
as to the future had in part produced her depression was doubtless
true; yet her unbidden thoughts were continually recurring to the
singular conduct of Huntington, and were ferreting out
remembrances
of imagined wrongs, which had impelled one, usually so
kind and just-judging, to an act that implied evident displeasure
towards herself.
Ever self-censuring, she could dwell upon this subject only with
pain, for she held in vivid remembrance all the weighty favors she
had received from him, as well as his generous and unpresuming
deportment, which ever indicated a fear of seeming to claim a
requital
at her hands. That she had wounded so noble a spirit, had
driven him from her presence, had for ever closed the way to
explanation
,
and to returning sympathy and friendship, seemed to her now
10
distressed heart a depth of ingratitude and unkindness, for which it
would be vain to seek a parallel.
Beyond this limit, her thoughts took no definite shape; her
sentiments
towards Huntington may, perhaps, at times, have been
imbued
with a glow beyond the genial warmth of friendship; but if so,
she knew it not. Love, indeed, is not infrequently an unrecognized
inmate of the heart, overlooked, for a while, or mistaken, by its
inexperienced
entertainer, for some kindred emotion, and only discovered
at length, too late to be dislodged. Blanche did not seek to trace
her feelings to their source; and if ever for a moment she had
regarded
Henrich as a suitor, the thought had been repressed by the
conviction that there was an unbridged gulf betwixt them, across
which Hope might gaze, but could not pass.
The Lynx had not erred in believing that the Iroquois warriors
were not effectually repulsed; they had vanished, indeed, from view,
and so long did they continue invisible, that hopes were entertained
of their having abandoned their costly enterprise; but they were
again discovered, about the middle of the afternoon, scarcely two
miles distant, skirting the western shore of the lake, and skulking
beneath its shadows. They had retreated with a succession of
wailing
yells and screeches, which were supposed at the time to be less
in lamentation for their loss than with a view to invoke aid from the
neighboring forests; and their present pertinacious pursuit was
attributed to the hope of finding such assistance. They were now,
fortunately, silent, believing themselves undiscovered, and it was the
policy of the fugitives to let them remain deceived, lest they should
recommence their dangerous cries.
But not many minutes had elapsed when a noise issued from their
midst, different in its character from any which they had heretofore
made; it was a prolonged, shrill call, seeming to proceed from a
single voice, and the batteau at the same moment shot out from the
shadows into a place where it could be more distinctly seen. The
objects which had occasioned this movement had at the same
moment
caught the attention of the Huron, who, with forced calmness,
now pointed them out to his comrades, recalling all their abated
terror, and adding tenfold to its intensity. Three long canoes,
containing
in the aggregate not less than thirty men, were doubling a
distant promontory in the northwest, and approaching in a direction
which would directly intersect the path of the count's party; they
were yet several miles distant, and could not be seen with
distinctness
;
but they were supposed to be a war party, returning from an
expedition, and travelling to their home, somewhere on the eastern
shore of the lake.
The most utter consternation prevailed among the travellers, and
the course of the boat was instantaneously changed, by the Lynx, to
the east, in the direction of a cluster of small islands, which lay
about a mile and a half distant.
We can only fly, he said, in answer to the eager inquiries of
his leader, as to the extent of the danger; if they have not seen us,
we may possibly escape.
It was the first time that the Huron had spoken discouragingly,
and the count trembled as he replied:
Why do you say `possibly?' the night is not far distant, and
they are yet several miles from us; the danger cannot be great.
It is great! responded the Indian; I have said! they are
manywe are fewsee!
As he ceased speaking, he pointed towards the Iroquois batteau,
which was now proceeding rapidly outward, seemingly with a view
to overtake the fugitives, or at least, hound-like, to track them closely
until the other vessels should come up. They repeated their calls,
which, as far as could be judged, were ineffectual in attracting the
attention of the strangers, and this seemed the only encouraging
feature
in the affair. But even this was of short duration; for, finding
other means insufficient, the pursuers fired a salute of half a dozen
guns, following it up by a prolonged war-cry, which at once
produced
an effect; the canoes stopped for a moment, and came
together
;
and when they resumed their progress, it was clearly with
increased speed and in a diverging direction from each other, as if to
make sure of keeping the chase within view. So great, indeed, was
their velocity, compared with that of the count, whose wearied
oarsmen
had toiled ever since the preceding evening, that it became
almost doubtful whether the latter would be even able to attain the
refuge of an island before their allied enemies would overtake them.
When the design of the strangers became fully apparent, an
ominous silence prevailed for awhile in the retreating batteau, broken
at length by the hysterical sobbings of Emily and the low mournful
voice of Blanche in attempted encouragement. It was the intention
of the Lynx to land on the smallest of the islets, hoping that possibly
one might be found sufficiently minute to be capable of defence even
by his little corps, until some opportunity of escape should offer.
He was disappointed, however, on drawing near the group, to find
none that was suitable for his purpose: the only one which seemed
even temporarily defensible was situated near the centre of the cluster,
and was separated on the south from a sister isle, by scarcely sixty
rods of water. To this refuge, therefore, the retreating party fled,
wearied and dispirited, while even its stoical warriors entertained
but little hope beyond that of selling their lives dearly, and
performing
the journey to the spirit-land in company with a portion, at least,
of their invaders.
The isle of which they had taken possession was much too large
for their safety, being nearly a third of a mile in length, and about
forty rods in width, and would involve the necessity of a division of
their small force to protect its several parts. The batteau, indeed,
containing the first detachment of the enemy, came rapidly up and
took possession as had been anticipated of the nearest island on the
south, while the course of the canoes indicated an intention of landing
upon another, which lay considerably north of that occupied by the
count's party. It was the longest if not the largest of the group,
extending more than a mile north and south, and approaching to
within a little less than half that distance of the territory occupied by
the besieged party. The strangers passed to the north of this large
island, and came down on its eastern side, remaining unobserved
until they had effected a landing near its southern border, and
encamped in the woods.
Thus were the unhappy travellers surrounded as it were by
enemies, who waited only for the approaching night to attack them
from every quarter, and from whose vigilant
surveillance
there was
no prospect of escape. The count, the Algonquin, and three of the
soldiers took their station on the south coast, while the remainder of
the force, three in number, were stationed at the opposite extremity
of the land; the Lynx being invested with full power to act in his
section of the little realm, as circumstances should require, without
communicating with his principal. For the ladies a fitting place was
selected about midway between the posts.
It was about the hour of four in the afternoon when these
arrangements were completed, and there remained a brief interval
of suspense to be passed before the dreadful crisis should arrive, the
probable issue of which was too appalling to be contemplated. Miss
Montaigne and Emily remained for a while in the shelter which had
been provided for them, but finding the burden of their fears too
heavy to bear alone, they strolled together towards the place where
the Lynx and his two companions were on guard, and begged that
they might be allowed to remain near their protectors. To this, of
course, the Huron readily assented, and while Emily, exhausted,
sought a seat at a little distance from her cousin, the latter remained
standing near the Indian and his comrades.
You are not accustomed easily to despair, she said at length;
why is it that you think there is so little hope of escape? The
shore is not far distant.
There are four boats ready to follow when we start, replied the
Lynxwe are safer here.
But the night may favor uswe may fly unseen
If the Manitou should hang his mantle on the moon, we may,
said the Huron, pointing to the orb of night, which, although faintly
visible as yet, amid the day's superior beams, was climbing a sky
singularly clear and cloudless, save in the far north, where a high
piled cloud, towering like ocean canvass, navigated the calm expanse
alone, but answered, alas, to no mortal hail, and settled slowly towards
the horizon.
Blanche remained motionless, her lips only moving, and her eyes
fixed upon the firmament; a pause of some minutes succeeded, which
was at length broken by the low voice of the Indian:
The Lynx is sorry, he said, looking mournfully at the young
lady, and impressed seemingly with the idea that he was in some
degree responsible for the pending calamityhe is very sadbut
men must not weep; he did what he couldhe has acted like a
chief; is it not so? what does the Dove-eye say?
You have done everything that a brave man could do, replied
Blanche emphaticallysurely you have no cause to reproach
yourself.
He
will never know it! replied the Indian bitterlythe King of
the Hurons will say that the Lynx was not a Brave.
That will he not! answered Blanche, my father will never do
you injustice; besides, there is one who will proclaim your worth to
the world; thank Heaven that he is not here in this hour of peril!
Thank Heaven that he is!
exclaimed a low voice at her side;
to share every peril of Miss Montaigneto shield her, if it is the
will of Heavento die for her, if it is not!
To the air, to the water, to the surrounding woods, did Blanche,
bewildered and terrified, look for the speaker, as this familiar and
heart-welcomed voice fell upon her ear; but not to the dark and
motionless
figure, which stood scarcely a dozen feet distant from her on
the other side of the Huron chief. So entirely void of suspicion was
she as to the individuality of the Beaver, as an Indian hunter, that
she could quite as easily have suspected the Lynx as him, to be the
disguised Henrich. Seeing no one but the supposed Indian, for
the Lynx, with ready tact, had stepped aside, withdrawing also the
soldier, she doubted the faithfulness of her senses, and believed that
her excited imagination had in some way misled her.
Did any one speak to me, but now, in English? she said,
using that language; or does my mind wander?
As she spoke, the Beaver advanced a few steps, and stood before
her; his calm eyes fixed upon her countenance, for the first time,
with no downcast look to conceal their hue. Miss Montaigne,
he said, I am Henrich Huntington, happy, even in this hour of
gloom, to convince you that I have been no recreant to my trust.
Speechless with amazement, with alarm, with delight, Blanche
listened to these words, while the flitting color went and came on
her cheeks, like the shadows of flying clouds upon a summer
landscape
.
Her breath was short and hurriedher parted lips moved
without voice, and her whole frame shook with her irrepressible
emotion.
Is it, indeed, so? she said, at length, faintly, and with ashen
face, resting one trembling hand upon a tree for support, and
frankly extending the other to her friend: Is it you, Henrich?
Oh, I am very glad to see you, and yet I cannot bid you welcome
in this dreadful hour.
Huntington seized the hand of Miss Montaigne, and ere he
relinquished, pressed it lightly to his lips. I ask no better
welcome
,
he said, as Blanche hastily, yet unreprovingly withdrew the
imprisoned member from his grasp.
This is no time for idle compliments, she said, quickly; tell
me why this disguise? And yet I should not ask, since in it you
have once, aye, twice already, saved our lives.
Enough for the present, Miss Montaigne, that it was necessary;
without it I could not have been with you; keep my secret, and
above all, from the count.
You have had injustice and suffering, she replied, hastily.
Oh, how much do we owe you! how much have we misjudged
you! But tell me,for hope never seems to desert you,is our
situation altogether desperate? Speak frankly to me; I can bear
the worst and ought to hear it.
I should do wrong not to confess to you, Miss Montaigne, he
replied, that the danger is very great. The Lynx, who is most
familiar with Indian warfare, thinks, if the soldiers do their duty, we
may take a quarter, or, perhaps, even a third of our enemies with
us into the other world, and thus fall with glory, but scarcely hints
of any other hope.
How dreadful to indulge such revengeful wishes at such an
hour! exclaimed Blanche, tremulously. And the Algonquin
what says he?
Mallory, who has come from the other company on an errand
of inquiry, reports that he is reserved and taciturn, and chants to
himself at intervalsthe sign is bad!
Alas, yes! it is his death-song! answered Miss Montaigne;
he himself told us of the custom.
We have viewed the worst side of the picture, continued
Henrich
.
We should sin not to remember that there is a Power
which saves alike `by many or by few.' He can preserve us, we
know; and if such is not His purpose, that purpose still is best.
You speak nobly, Mr. Huntington, and as created man should
ever speak of the dealings of The Infinite; we are in His hands,
and in this solemn hour should confide fully in Him; yet it is
difficult
for weak human nature to view closely and calmly that
mysterious
change which awaits it; above all, she said, suddenly
raising
her voice, with emotion, when it comes with such attendant
horrors!
Do not quite despair! replied Henrich, soothingly. We
may not look for miracles, and yet there may be means and
agencies
at work for us, of which we have no knowledge. I do not
wish to excite unfounded hopes, but a thought has occurred to me,
which has in it a raya faint ray of light; we know that all of our
first pursuers are savages, and from them we can hope nothing; but
there may beit is barely possiblesome subordinate English
officer
in command of, or in company with the other division, who
would have sufficient influence to save our lives, and cause us to be
regarded as prisoners of war; at least, if we could communicate
with him, and capitulate, before the onslaught commences, and
before
the savages become excited in battle.
Alas! how many remote contingencies are these! So faint a
hope serves only more fully to reveal our despairyet you may be
right; do not let me discourage you from any effort.
Henrich at once proceeded to counsel with the Lynx, while
Blanche, being so permitted, went to inform her cousin of the
presence
of Huntington, in the disguise of the Beaver; tidings which
aroused Emily from her stupor of fear and grief, and infused a new
though indefinite hope into her spirit.
10*
CHAPTER XXVI.
Many a peril have I past,
Nor know I why this next appears the last;
Yet so my heart forebodes.
Byron
.
The
Huron heard his friend's remarks in silence, but gave little
confirmation to his views; he had seen nothing to induce him to
suppose there were any other than Indians among either of the
attacking parties, and he had no belief, if there were, that any terms
could be made which would compromise the savages' right to deal
with their prisoners after their usual custom. For himself and the
Algonquin, he knew, he said, there could be no hope, and they
could hardly be expected to be parties to a capitulation which did
not include them in its protection. They were willing to die; the
spirit-land of their fathers was open to them; they would enter it
gloriously; they would fall like chiefs and great braves, and would
never be taken prisoners, and roasted like cowards, at a stake.
Such was the substance of the Lynx's emphatic reply, and so wrapt
was he in the thoughts he had uttered that it was some moments
before Henrich could again attract his attention to his own remarks.
When he had succeeded in doing so, he repelled, with indignation,
any design on the part of himself or the ladies, to seek exclusively
their own safety, assured the Indian that if any treaty was effected,
it should be one which included the whole party in its provisions,
and reminding him that it was the part of a great warrior never to
remit his efforts for life, begged him to reflect whether he could
devise any means to open a negotiation with the enemy. No one,
of course, would undertake the hazardous errand of bearing a flag
to a savage foe, nor could the only boat of the prisoners be risked
on such an embassy, and nothing remained but to attempt to send,
by some means, a written message to the opposing camp.
The Huron, incapable of opposing his friend, however hopeless of
the result, undertook to find some mode of locomotion for a talking
paper, if Henrich would prepare one, and they set simultaneously
about their tasks, thus combining the ingenuity of civilized and
savage life, where either alone would have been insufficient to effect
their purpose.
The pocket-book of Huntington furnished from its miscellaneous
contents a scrap of paper, on which he wrote, in pencil, the
following
words:
We are travellers; three of us are English citizensthe
remainder
are French and their allies. Will our lives be protected if we
surrender ourselves prisoners? We are well armed. To any
officer or gentleman in command of the enemy.
The Lynx, meanwhile, procured a piece of bark about eighteen
inches in length, and six or eight inches wide, which he speedily
fashioned, with his hunting knife, into the shape of a boat; a
miniature
mast arose from its centre, slitted to receive the trimmed leaves
which formed its lower sails, while the letter itself, fastened securely
above them, constituted a top-gallant-royal to the little vessel. A
fixed rudder, the result of much careful calculation, was added, and
the little messenger, freighted with many hopes, was set afloat,
watched by the tearful eyes of Blanche and Emily, and awakening
alternate hopes and fears, as it now slightly diverged from its
expected route, and now pressed gallantly forward on its way.
The wind was blowing lightly from the south-west, and there was
great danger that the boat might pass eastward of the island,
notwithstanding
the accurate adjustment of the tiller, to prevent such a
result. Now plunging and dipping before some passing flaw, now
darting suddenly forward, and, anon, stopping trembling and veering,
as if bewildered and uncertain of its course, it still soon attained
a position about midway between the islands, without any material
deviation from its route. Thence it proceeded with a steady and
uniform progress towards the opposing shore, evidently attracting
the attention of the enemy long before it reached the beach, one of
whom was seen to dart out from his shelter, and seizing the toy,
bear it back to the woods.
The excitement incident to this experiment had temporarily
relieved
the minds of those engaged in it from the oppressive sense of
their danger, which now returned with overwhelming force. The
effort which they had just made began to seem almost absurd, even
in the eyes of its originator, and when five minutes of suspense had
ensued,minutes by the chronometer, but hours by the mental
measurement of the prisoners,a settled conviction fastened upon
their minds that the season of hope was past.
It was surely most cruel of uncle, said Emily, first breaking
the mournful silence which had for some minutes prevailed, to
expose
us to such perils! Oh! why did he not rather leave us in
New York until this dreadful war was ended?
Do not blame him, Emily, replied Blanche, with a beseeching
look; he did not, indeed he did not, know the danger. The
Lynx will tell you that for months there has been no hostile party
in these parts; that the theatre of war was at other and remote
points when he set out from home; and in proof of this, remember
how very far we have come in safety.
Only to be murdered at the last! sobbed Emily, bitterly;
oh, it was cruelcruelcruel! Think not that I cannot forgive
him, but it is folly to seek to justify his acts.
Emily, dear cousin, do not talk thus; indeed he is not in fault;
mine rather is the blame, and it is a fearful responsibility to feel at
such a time! Ah! would that you had returned when I besought
you to do so. Can you forgive me, EmilyHenrich?
Nay, we have nothing to forgive
you
, cousin Blanche,
answered
Emily, hastily; while Huntington replied to the question
only with a look of gentle reproach.
You will not admit it, I know, said Blanche, and I thank
you for your forbearance; but, alas! what avails now either censure
or exculpation on such a point? We all did what we then
believed right: let us think, rather, of more serious matters.
During this conversation, the Lynx remained standing on the
margin
of the water, looking upon that part of the distant island where
the little boat had disappeared, with a singular steadiness of gaze,
when it is remembered that he had expressed an entire want of
confidence
in the experiment. But his views had undergone somewhat
of a change. Why was it, he mentally inquired, that the good
Manitou had sent the little bark so unerringly on its course, unless
to effect some good end? The slightest change in the force or
direction of the breeze might have either sent it wide of its
mark, or whelmed it in the turbulent waters, yet it had pressed
gallantly
forward, uninterrupted, to its intended goal. Besides this,
there was something so incomprehensible to his untutored mind in
the art of conveying ideas by writing, that he fully expected the
talking paper would, in some way, succeed in making itself
understood
by those to whom it was sent, whether they were civilized or
savage, and that a response of some kind would be made, either
amicable or hostile.
About ten minutes elapsed while he thus gazed, when a quick
ejaculation from his lips, and his upward-pointing arm, directed the
attention of his companions to an arrow, shot with seeming defiance
towards them from the enemy's camp. It rose to a considerable
height, and describing a wide curve, fell into the water thirty rods
from where the little party were standing, but scarcely had it struck
the wave before the venturous Huron had plunged into the lake,
and was swimming rapidly towards it. That his quick eye had
discerned
something unusual in the missile was evident by his actions,
and his astonished companions watched breathlessly his progress;
no attempt was made to fire upon him by the enemy, and in a few
minutes he returned to the shore bearing the weapon in his mouth.
Henrich ran to meet him, and trembled with the intensity of his
emotions as he discovered a slip of paper secured in the feathery
haft; eagerly seizing the desired, yet dreaded document, he read
the following words, which were written in French:
I cannot read your message; you must surrender, or I cannot
answer for your lives; we are thirty-five strong, French and
Hurons.
God of mercy! exclaimed Blanche, they are our friends!
They are probably searching for us!
My father has sent them!
As she spoke, she glanced gratefully upwards, leaving in beautiful
ambiguity the meaning of her closing sentence.
There was indeed every reason to believe that Miss Montaigne's
conjectures were correct, and so unbounded was the transport of
delight
which prevailed among the little party, that for a while they
were incapable of taking the necessary means of ascertaining the
certainty of their new and exciting hopes. But Henrich, at length,
prepared another note in the French language, as follows:
If you are a French party, we are your friends; this is Count
Carlton's command, and is the escort of Miss Montaigne. Attested
by the
totum
of the Lynx, a Huron Chief, who is with us.
Underneath these lines, the Lynx drew a rough sketch of his
namesake of the forest, as also of a hand, extended in amity, and
the paper was at once transmitted by the same mode of conveyance
by which the other had arrived, for although the arrow must fall
far short of the opposing shore, attention would now be fixed upon
it and it could readily be procured by the other party. A boat
indeed was sent out without hesitation, almost before the weapon
had touched the water, no fear seeming to be evinced by its occupant
of any evil during the implied armistice that was now existing.
No sooner had this new document reached the northern camp
than its effect became visible in the most extraordinary commotion:
the whole party rushed to the beach, uttering prolonged shouts,
flinging up their arms and running rapidly about. In a few minutes
the boats were got out, and the whole company embarked and set
out for the smaller island, while Blanche and Emily, divested of their
last fear, scarcely refrained from fainting with the excess of their
delight. Mutual congratulations were exchanged, and the Lynx was
about to despatch a messenger to bear the joyous tidings to the
count, when the latter was seen rapidly approaching in the distance.
The shouts had reached his ears and leaving his companions to guard
the southern post he hastened across the island, half dead with
affright, and anxious to learn the extent of the new calamity. As he
came near the northern shore, he caught sight of the approaching
batteaux, which were now midway between the islands, and the
crowded occupants of which were still making the air ring with their
vociferous cries. He rushed up to the Lynx and Beaver, who, as
they were standing as usual, gun in hand, he supposed were
preparing to fire upon their invaders, and exclaimed to the former:
Ah! this is horrible! thrice horrible! but do not fire; it will
only exasperate themthey are too many; perhaps they will be
merciful.
They are our friends! replied the Huron.
Yesyestell them we are their friends, replied Carlton,
whose terror prevented him from comprehending the imperfect
French of the Indianyes, yes, tell them we are harmless
travellers with ladies, and that we do not want to hurt themnor
norto have them hurt us, will you? he added eagerly.
They are our friends! repeated the Lynx, quietly.
Ah
misericorde!
exclaimed the count, still unheeding the words
of the otherah ladies, this will be sad for you, too; you had
better hideit is very dreadful: ah, how fast they comehow fast
they come: don't forget to tell them we are their friends, and that
we can ransom ourselves with a whole boat-load of moneyand they
shall have my watch, too, andandall that I have about me:
don't you think you had better begin to speaksee how near they
are
They are
Ah, I am sorry we killed those poor fellows this morning: that
will make them very fierce I fearbut it was the Beaver, yes, aha!
it was the Beaver did ittell them so, you know, and if they must
kill somebody, they had better kill him, of course, for these Indians
are more used to such things.
So rapid and earnest had been the count's language that it would
have been difficult for any one to check its impetuous course: the
calm, dignified Indian, too courteous to interrupt, would have waited
for the torrent of words to flow by, before replying, if it had lasted
an hour.
These are our friends, he now said, once more, scarcely
concealing
his contemptsee! they are our brothers! they have come to
help us!
What? what? exclaimed Carlton, our friends? Is it true,
my dear friend? Is it really true? Are we really, really safe?
I have said, replied the Lynx, coldly.
Ah, this is most delightful then! he added, breathing freely,
and advancing nearer to the ladiesah, ladies! do you hear?
you are safe; these are the Lynx's friends; do not be alarmed: in
a few minutes you will have the pleasure of seeing us exterminate
those fiends on the other island: keep up good courageyou are
quite safe, I assure you.
The batteaux had now approached to within sixty yards of the
shore, and the Lynx, advanced to the water's edge, was already
conversing with some of their inmates; in another minute the whole
party were on the beach, crowding around the Huron, and
manifesting
the most lively joy at meeting him.
Their leader was a French sergeant, named Grill, who at once
advanced to Carlton, and modestly resigned his command into the
hands of his superior officer, expressing, at the same time, his great
pleasure at having discovered his mistake in time to prevent serious
consequences. The Baron Montaigne, he said, had become uneasy at
the prolonged absence of the party, and had despatched him with
instructions to proceed as far as the head of the upper lake, if
necessary
,
in search of them. Their own safety, he said, required that
they should destroy or capture any small parties of the enemy whom
they might encounter, lest intelligence of their expedition should get
abroad, and their return be intercepted. This was the reason of
their having pursued the count in a hostile manner, being prevented
from once suspecting his true character by his change of the canoes
in which he had left home for batteaux, and by his quick flight.
But how is it, he added, that your number is so largely
increased? Your boats seemed to contain eight or ten each!
Is it possible that you do not yet understand? replied the
count, earnestlyI have but one boat: the others are Iroquois;
they were in pursuit of us when you came in sight: they mistook
you, as we did, for their friends, fired a salute to attract your notice,
and are even now on an adjoining island, kept at bay by a few of
our men!
What a tissue of blunders is this! replied the sergeant: I
mistook the firing for a warning from one of your boats to the other
to give notice of our approach: we had not seen you until then,
when you both seemed to fly in the same direction and we pursued;
but we will have
them
at any rate, that is to say, he added in a
less animated tone, I must beg pardon for forgetting that I am no
longer in command.
Oh, take them! yes, take them, of course, said the count
that is just what I was saying to the ladiessurround themcut
them downshow no quarter!
Do I understand that your honor allows me to command an
expedition against them with my own men? inquired Grill, eagerly,
and fearful he was in error: we can do it up in a few minutes, sir,
and your men must all be fatigued with duty; we are all fresh, quite
fresh, I assure you, sir.
Yescertainlyof course, answered Carlton; I give you the
command; we
are
a little fatigued, all of us.
The Lynx is not tired, said that personage, who had approached
during the colloquy, and stood listening to it.
Very well, you may go if you choose, said Carlton, taking snuff,
and seeming a little disconcerted.
And the Beaver? added the Huron, answering an animated
look from his friend, who, since the count's return, had again been
struck dumb.
We cannot spare all our guard, interposed Blanchelet the
Beaver and the soldiers remain with us, I pray; there certainly are
enough without them.
Enough, enough, certainly, too many if the count pleases, said
the sergeant.
Very well, answered Carltonlet the Beaver and the soldiers
remain; go now, and see that you give us a good account of them.
Let me implore, said Blanche, addressing the countthat
there be no useless waste of life: they are human beings, and let us
remember what were our feelings a few minutes since in view of such
destruction as now threatens them. We have received mercy, let us
impart it. It is the law of civilized warfare, the world over, to spare
the foe who surrenders; instruct the men, I beseech you, Count
Carlton, not to kill the prisoners.
Carlton informed the sergeant that he might consider Miss
Montaigne's request as an order, and directed him to communicate
it to his men, whereupon the party hastened at once to their boats,
and set out on their errand; a messenger having been first despatched
to the Algonquin to inform him of the changed state of affairs, and
to request him to co-operate with the attack in any way that his
position would permit.
But a short time elapsed before the sound of guns was heard in a
southerly direction, followed by shouts and the varied cries that
attend an Indian battle, and in less than an hour the canoes returned
accompanied by the captured batteau, with seven of the Iroquois as
prisoners. Three only had been killed, and the victory had been
achieved without the loss of a man to the Hurons, although a few
of both parties had been wounded.
The captives were guarded on both sides by the attendant canoes,
and their hands were also bound together at the wrist, yet their
leader, a large powerful man, succeeded in drawing his arms apart
as they drew near the island, and, determined to make an effort for
the life which he supposed forfeited, he plunged suddenly into the
water, and sank, like lead, beneath the boats. Twenty guns were
instantly presented to await his approach to the surface, and every
eye was scanning the water to watch the place of his reappearance;
more than a minute elapsed, when the shout, there he is! was
heard, and a head was seen thirty rods distant towards the eastern
shore, partly protruding above the wave. An irregular discharge
succeeded, but with the first report of a gun the Indian again
disappeared, and the volley proved harmless. Exhaustion, however,
evidently forbade his continuance beneath the water, and he almost
immediately rose a second time, when the Lynx, mindful of the
Beaver's accurate aim, called to him to fire at the fugitive.
Nononofor mercy's sake, let the poor fellow goit is too
horrible! exclaimed Blanche, who with Henrich and the count,
stood watching the scene from the beach.
Fire! shouted Carlton, gesticulating to the disguised Henrich
fireI command you; Miss Montaigne will have the goodness not
to interfere: Fire! he repeated, himself raising the Beaver's gun, and
pointing with his finger to the swimmer.
Henrich, who could no longer affect to misunderstand his orders,
glanced expressively at Blanche, and levelled his gun towards the
Iroquois, making the prisoners tremble for their now seemingly
doomed comrade, for too well they knew the fatal marksman and
his weapon, and they could not repress an exclamation of relief and
exultation as the dreaded ball was seen to strike the water about
three feet distant from their friend. Carlton looked angrily at the
mute stranger, but a grateful smile from Blanche met his eye,
convincing
him that she comprehended his forbearance, which, indeed,
had been no less in compliance with his own sympathies for the
fugitive than with her wishes.
The confusion was now a little abated, and a boat was sent in
pursuit, but as the swimmer, having fully recovered his breath, soon
went down again and took care to change his direction while
beneath the water, it was no easy matter to follow his course, and
after several hair-breadth escapes from the shots of his pursuers, he
finally succeeded in gaining the land, and making good his escape
in the forest.
Carlton resumed his voyage on the same evening, rejoicing in the
security which his increased numbers imparted, exulting in his
victory
over the Iroquois, and believing himself altogether a hero after
Mars' own fashioning. Never did returning general enter the gates
of world-ruling Rome, after desolating some distant nation, and
adding
a new province to the empire, with a loftier sense of his
achievements
than that with which the self-satisfied Gaul now embarked
for Castle Montaigne. He resolved to lose no time by delay, and
not again to jeopard the glory which he had acquired. Nightlong
he travelled, and at meridian of the ensuing day the converging
shores of the lake were seen closing around its northern extremity;
the blue waters of the Sorelle gleamed in the distance, and soon the
vessels were gliding upon its tranquil surface.
A few hours later the rejoicing voyagers beheld the rugged
turrets
of Castle Montaigne gleaming through the thinned forests, and
saw a welcoming
cortge
thronging to the river's bank, to hail their
approach. The woodlands rang with acclamations as the coming
vessels were seen to contain the prominent objects of solicitude, the
Baron's daughter and niece, the Lynx, the Algonquin, and the
Count; even Montaigne himself, forced from his usual coldness,
pressing forward into the very water to grasp the hand of his
sobbing
daughter, and imprint an unexpected kiss upon her cheek. In
the background the timid Myrtle was seen peering with innocent
and wondering face at the strangers, clinging with one hand to the
dusky baroness, and seeming like a rose beside its root.
Carlton saw her, and trembled.
CHAPTER XXVII.
Good sir, I do in friendship counsel you
To leave this place: albeit, you have deserved
High commendation, true applause, and love,
Yet such is now the duke's condition,
That he misconstrues all that you have done.
Shak. As You Like It
.
If
the Baron Montaigne was not a little delighted at the safe
arrival of his daughter, he was scarcely less so with the reflection
that her rescue had been achieved by the count, upon whom he now
looked as her affianced husband. The exploit in a military point
of view also gratified his vanity; and renewing the remembrance
of his own masterly escape, afforded him a double source of
triumph.
You have done most nobly, sir count, he said, when on the
same evening they conversed alone on the subject; you have
snatched Blanche from the very paws of the British lion: you tell
me there was an attempt to arrest her as a prisoner of state?
Yes, sir, replied Carlton, who had heard the story repeated:
yes, sir, on the very morning after my messenger, the Lynx,
brought her out of the city; I had warned him to lose no time; I
had told him of the danger; I had instructed him to hasten back
to the camp, and he came off with her in the night, sir; yes, sir, the
next morning would have been too late: yes, sir,yes, out of the
very paws of the lionit is a very pretty thought.
They reached your camp, then, the same night, I presume,
remarked Montaigne.
Aanot precisely: we had started forward a little, finding
our position not quite safe, and left word for them to follow: they
overtook us.
Yesyes said the baron, wonderingly.
Yesout of the paws of the Lionvery pretty, indeedyes,
that's precisely where she was, added Carlton, anxious to divert the
dangerous attack of minute questions.
They had discovered her name and rank, it seems; perhaps
they had even heard of this affair of Seabury, which would, of course,
exasperate them; but no matter: she is safe at home now, thanks to
your vigilance and valor, my friend, and we may now snap our
fingers at our Southern foes. The details of your report I will
receive at some other time, when we are both less excited and more
at leisure.
So strong had been the baron's prepossessions in favor of the
count, created by his pleasing manners, and by the Marquis
Vaudreuil's
representations, and so fully had this impression been
confirmed
by the success of the recent expedition, that it would have
been no easy matter to change or shake his views. Nor was any
such labor directly attempted. Rumors, indeed, were soon afloat,
well calculated to wither the laurels of the hero, and to transfer the
whole weight of his honors to other hands, leaving to him the
inglorious substitute of ridicule and contempt; but they did not
reach the ears of Montaigne, precisely because there was no one
whose peculiar duty it was to bear them, or who was willing to
communicate unwelcome tidings to a haughty and opinionated man.
The general voice had, indeed, accorded the credit of once saving
the party from destruction, and again from a most hazardous
engagement with the Iroquois, to the mysterious hunter who had
joined them on the way; and even Carlton was compelled to
acquiesce in this statement, after some futile attempts to evade its
force.
The Lynx and Algonquin tarried but briefly at the castle on the
day of their arrival, being prompted, both by their domestic and
clannish feelings, to mingle first with their own people, and enjoy a
breathing spell of repose, where they could recount their
achievements
,
and exhibit the baron's munificent presents in proof of his
approbation. They preferred to leave to Blanche the task of
unmasking her pretended champion at such time and place as she
should deem fit, little imagining how wide an interval separated the
parent and child, unbridged by any familiar or confidential
intercourse
.
Besides this, the extreme respect paid to rank in that age
had secured to the count a strong party among the adherents of
Montaigne, both civilized and savage, and the four soldiers who had
formed part of his command were entirely subservient to him; so
that, fixed already in the baron's prepossessions, and propped by
such accessaries, he who attempted rashly to shake his position, might
only succeed in jeoparding his own.
The disguised Henrich accompanied the Lynx to his quarters,
being warned by his friend that it might be unsafe to expose himself
at once to the wrath of the count, and the easily excited suspicions
of Montaigne, during the plentitude of the former's power and
influence. It would, at least, the Indian urged, be prudent to
withdraw for a few days, until the sentiments of the baron could be
sounded, and until Carlton had unwittingly accorded to Huntington,
in his assumed character, that credit for his achievements which he
would never concede to an acknowledged enemy. Henrich readily
anticipated the character of the charges which would be likely to be
adduced against him by a man to whom he had thrown defiance but
a few days previous, and how apt a listener Montaigne would prove
to any accusation involving the crimes of insubordination or mutiny
against his own delegated authority. If these offences, exaggerated
by a malignant ingenuity, should not be deemed sufficient to annul
the debt of gratitude due to the chivalrous youth, there was yet
another, in his conjectured aspiration for the hand of Miss Montaigne,
which would more than cancel the whole remaining score of credit.
Blanche, indeed, understood Huntington's withdrawal from the
precincts of the castle to be only for the purpose of a
re-transforma-tion
to his proper semblance, and that he would on the ensuing day,
at the farthest, return, accompanied by his Indian friends, to receive
the meed of applause which was so justly his due, and to become her
father's honored guest for whatever time he chose to continue his
abode in New France. She knew nothing of his quarrel with
Carlton, or of the great reason which he had to dread the count's
resentment, and if she had at all suspected the views and
apprehensions
which actuated him in departing with the Lynx, a sense of
justice would have impelled her to fly to her father, reveal the whole
story, and secure, at least, his protection and hospitality for her
friend.
It was an unhappy error growing out of a singularly complex
state of influences and the want of opportunity for counsel or concert
of action between the pretended Beaver and those who were
cognisant of his real character. Had the latter at once declared the
whole story of Henrich's heroism, and his wrongs, and promptly and
unitedly denounced the count's injustice and cowardice, there would
have been some reason to hope that the baron might prove a just
and impartial listener; but delay and indecision weakened their
cause, and proportionably strengthened that of their common
adversary.
If other excuse is wanting for Blanche's remissness, it will be
found in the sense of maidenly delicacy which forbade her
manifesting
too deep an interest in Henrich, and in the exciting emotions
incident to an arrival at her new home, and a first interview with
those near yet dreaded relatives who had so long occupied a
prominent position in her thoughts.
The Baroness Montaigne was a woman of about forty years, of
tall and comely figure, and with a countenance which only its olive
hue would prevent an European taste from pronouncing handsome.
Her features were nearly regular, and her face was entirely void of
11
that inelegant prominence of the cheek bones, so common to her
race, while in her well shaped mouth, with its unimpaired treasures,
in her black eyes and hair, and in her smooth broad forehead there
was much to attract admiration. She was dressed neatly, in the
fashion of the age, spoke the French language intelligibly, although
with many inaccuracies, and but for a subdued and timid demeanor,
would have manifested no little dignity of deportment.
Blanche was both astonished and relieved to find her so little
repulsive in appearance: she addressed her with frankness and
courtesy, expressed a sincere pleasure at meeting her, and was by her
presented, in turn, to Myrtle, who, standing like a startled fawn at
her side, seemed only to restrain herself by an effort from running
away. If Miss Montaigne had been pleased before, she was now
unspeakably delighted; Myrtle, whose striking charms, both of
face and figure, have been described, was dressed in white, and wore
a few simple ornaments, and her soft black eyes were moist with
emotion, and her glossy raven hair, hanging in natural curls, trembled
around her cheek and neck and shoulders, as she received in silence
the sisterly kiss of Blanche.
What were the forest maiden's thoughts in that moment of
agitation it would not be difficult to conjecture. She had never
before seen a European lady, and she knew, as she gazed at her fair
relative, that her own more sombre charms were in every way outshone.
The entire novelty to her perceptions, of that variety of beauty
which she now beheld, added to its value in her estimation; a
white transparent skin, tinted with roseate rays which seemed rather
to shine through than to dwell upon its surface; eyes of blue,
eloquent with a thousand varying expressions; soft silken hair,
which seemed to change its hue with the changing light, and yet
was ever beautiful, these were strange and enchanting charms to
Myrtle, who possessed an apt appreciation of elegance, and under
other circumstances, would never have wearied of gazing upon
them.
But they were associated now with mournful thoughts, for she
had long looked forward to Blanche's coming with a sad
presentiment
that she was to prove her successful rival for the affections of
one who however unworthy of regard, did not seem so to her. She
had seen only the bright and dazzling side of Carlton's character, and,
despite her already bitter experience, would not believe in its dark
reverse. Was he faithless to her? She had erred in ever supposing
that he regarded her other than as the playmate of a daythe
little sister of his future brilliant bride. What madness indeed in
her to compete with the magnificent Blanche, for the heart of a
man of taste, talents, and fashion! Alas it was but a delusion, into
which, in her simplicity and ignorance she had fallen, and from
which, now only, she was fully though roughly awakened.
Such were Myrtle's thoughts, and little need be the wonder that
it was with no light or buoyant spirits that she received the greetings
of Miss Montaigne. But she entertained no unkindly feelings
towards her: she had hoped, unconsciously, guilelessly, that Blanche
might not prove to be endowed with extraordinary personal
attractions
,
but this hope had vanished, and with it, for the time, almost
every other. She knew that her father designed his elder daughter
for the bride of Carlton, for she had listened with mournful heart to
his own declarations of such a purpose, and had heard with forced
calmness, and even with smiles, the often repeated details of his
plans and expectations in regard to it.
Miss Montaigne, meanwhile, most fortunately for her own peace
of mind suspected nothing of Myrtle's sentiments either towards the
count or herself. She gazed upon the sweet sad face of her sister,
and thought it was seclusion and solitude alone which had given her
an air and habit of melancholy, for she did not reflect that when
positive grief withholds its leaden load from the heart, there is an
internal melody and beauty ever upspringing from its mysterious
depths, imparting to all things their harmony and brightness. How
deep and intricate a thing is that human heart! How little can the
eye discover upon its faithless dialthe faceof its inner workings,
of those subtle and involved emotions, which, ever impervious to
another's gaze, often defy even its own analyzation! Worlds of
wearying misapprehensions, of groundless suspicions, and tangled
errors of every kind lie hidden in its darkened vaultsbut, thanks to
Heaven! worlds, too, of generous and gentle affections, of unknown
truth, and charity, and love, viewless to man, but plainly visible
to Him who formed its labyrinthine halls.
Ignorance of Myrtle's sentiments was not the only immunity
which Miss Montaigne unconsciously enjoyed, and of which she was
soon to be deprived, for she was equally unaware of any serious
design on the part of her father to bestow her own hand upon
Carlton. Of the count's wishes in that respect she was not wholly
unsuspicious, for he had found time, even amidst the excitement and
perils of their voyage, to pay such marked addresses to his fair
charge as scarcely admitted of misconstruction. These, however, she
supposed, if sincere, would soon reach a point which would admit
of their suppression, little imagining that they were to be supported
by the full weight of parental sanction and authority, nay, that
her whole change from her trans-Atlantic life to the western world
had been made with a direct reference to this very event.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
She is peevish, sullen, froward,
Proud, disobedient, stubborn, lacking duty;
Neither regarding that she is my child,
Nor fearing me as if I were her father.
Shak. Two Gentlemen of Verona
.
A few
days sufficed to enlighten Blanche in regard to her
situation
;
for the baron was a man direct in all his movements, seeking
no subterfuges, and who had been too long supreme in his little
forest-realm to fear opposition to his designs. There were reasons,
too, connected with his schemes for political advancement, which
induced him, not only to desire an alliance with Carlton, but that it
should take place immediately; for it would connect him more
intimately with the Marquis Vaudreuil, whose growing age and
infirmities induced him to contemplate resigning his office as Viceroy
of New France, and whose long and valuable services to his country
almost entitled him to name a successor to his post. The count's
direct influence at court, also, it was supposed, would not be
inconsiderable
,
especially when he had returned to Paris with his fair
bride, and with the reputation, magnified tenfold by rumor, of
having
rescued her from captivity, by a series of exploits unexcelled in
the annals of chivalry.
You are thrice fortunate, my Blanche, said the baron, when, a
few days after the return of the party, he conversed with his daughter,
alone; you have not only triumphed over the English and the
Iroquois, but if I can read signs aright, you have achieved still another
victory, scarcely less important: Count Carlton has not left you in
ignorance, I presume, of an admiration which he has already freely
expressed to me.
Blanche slightly colored as she replied: The count, like most of
his countrymen, deals much in compliments, and Emily and myself
have, I believe, no reason to complain of not having received our
share at his hands.
I am much deceived if he is not prepared to offer you the
highest compliment which a gentleman can pay to a lady, answered
Montaigne; and must congratulate you on such a prospect; I
need not, of course, remind you that his proposals will do us great
honor, and that you will be able, at your wish, to exchange this no
doubt dreaded wilderness for the gaieties of Parisian life.
I have no such ambition, I assure you, my father, replied
Blanche, with a serious air; the wilderness has no terrors for me,
nor Paris any temptations; I have long been separated from you,
and should be unfilial, indeed, to wish so soon again to leave you.
That shall you not, if such is your desire, my child, responded
the baron, with a gleam of kindness inspired by her remark, and by
the elevated position in which he was already accustoming himself
to view her; the Countess Carlton shall always find a home here
while she desires ityet I do not doubt you will at least gladly visit
Paris for a wedding trip.
You misunderstand me still, answered Blanche, with a sweet
smile; for as yet she knew nothing of the iron will of her parent,
nor of the unbending strength of his resolution; it would be folly
to refuse an offer before it is made, but if you are really cognizant of
any such design of the count, I beg you will dissuade him from
it; it will save him some mortification, and me much
embarrassment
.
What is it that you mean? exclaimed the baron, severely, and
with vast astonishment,but I perceiveI perceiveyou wish to
avoid a personal eclaircissement and to have it all arranged between
your lover and myself; you are right, after all; it is the more
dignified
way, and not unusual among people of rank.
Why will you misunderstand mefather? replied Blanche,
hesitatingly
,
yet rising, and advancing a step nearer to him as she spoke;
I do not like Count Carlton: I have given him no encouragement,
and wish to be spared from openly refusing him; I repeat I do not
like him, and never shall.
Montaigne's countenance no longer expressed surprise, or anger,
or any violent emotion; the cold serenity of command had settled
upon his features, and for aught of feeling evinced, they might have
been marble lips which now replied to the young lady:
You are unfortunate, he said, in not fancying a man, who
within a fortnight at the farthest, will be your husband.
So saying, he withdrew, once more the stern and stately man
whom Blanche had beheld at the hotel in Ostend, all the slight
relentings of his gelid heart again congealed, and betokening that its
winter was finally set in.
Miss Montaigne stood for a moment awed by the words and
manner of the baron, and nearly bewildered by her conflicting
emotions
.
She had hailed with ecstasy the first traits of seeming
tenderness which he had exhibited towards her, had treasured the
memory of his welcoming kiss on the day of her arrival, and had
begun to look forward with fond hope to a full return of that
affection
,
which she still entertained for himthe result of early instruction,
and of habitually exercised duty, through the long years of her
secluded life. This dream was suddenly dispelled; these hopes
were dashed, and her own perhaps unnecessary rashness had checked
this flowing stream of kindness. Pained chiefly by this reflection,
she scarcely thought of the real danger which impended over her;
for she still did not believe that her father was capable of a resort to
coercion to obtain her assent to a marriage with the count, although
she well knew the facilities for despotic power which he possessed.
But, as she reflected, her misgivings increased. Neither
Huntington
nor the Lynx had yet returned to the castle, and their delay,
which had before been simply a matter of wonder, now created
serious uneasiness. She feared that her father, of whose discernment
she had the most exalted idea, had already penetrated Henrich's
disguise, and even his sentiments towards herself; and that this
discovery had been followed by the summary banishment of her
friend from the country. If she dismissed these apprehensions, she
yet reflected with sad forebodings on the probable reception
Huntington
would meet, upon his arrival, which might be hourly expected.
How inopportune was the time for his coming! How surely would
her father's suspicions be at once aroused and his ire excited!
Herself laboring under his disfavor, she felt painfully conscious that
any representations which she could make in Henrich's behalf would
be comparatively ineffectual, and that even their Indian friends in
lauding their young ally must proclaim their own insubordination,
which alone had placed him in a condition to aid them, and thus
materially lessen their influence with Montaigne. She even thought
with shame that their delay in re-appearing at the castle might be
occasioned by a pusillanimous fear of her father's censure for the
clandestine act which had enabled Huntington, unknown to the
count, to continue a member of his party; and in whatever light she
viewed the subject, she saw the deepest cause for regret that there
had been any delay in an explanation, the hazard of which, whatever
it might have been at the time of their arrival, was now tenfold
increased.
The baron, meanwhile, had passed from the presence of his
daughter directly to that of Carlton, whom, with no circumlocution,
he informed both of Blanche's sentiments, and of his own intentions
to disregard them; inquiring at the same time if Carlton was
conscious of any cause which could have produced so unexpected a
result. The chagrined count was not backward in alleging a reason
which, while it salved his wounded vanity, would, he well knew,
strengthen the baron's resolution.
Prepossessions, my lord baron, prepossessions are the trouble,
he said: and I regret to say, for a very unworthy object. I had
forborne, out of regard to your feelings, to mention to you, that a
young man, who evidently had the presumption to consider himself
a suitor of Miss Montaigne, accompanied her from New York to
myacamp, and continued with us as far as Albany; even there,
I with difficulty succeeded in dismissing him, after the most
mutinous
language and conduct towards me. I anticipate your question,
he continued, observing the signs of wrath which had gathered upon
the baron's brow; but I did not punish him with death, in
consideration
of some services which he was said to have rendered the
ladies and the Lynx in escaping from the city.
Perhaps you were right, responded Montaigne; and yet I
could wish it had been otherwise. You amaze me beyond expression!
Could my daughter have so far forgotten herself?
Nay, I do not say that she had given him encouragement,
answered Carlton: but she seemed fond of his societyconversed
frequently with him, and probably fancies, since his departure, that
she has an affection for him.
Montaigne seemed much disturbed by this intelligence, into which
he inquired with great minuteness, and afterwards, as his companion
had expected, not only reiterated his resolution as to Blanche's
marriage with the count, but expressed a determination that the
nuptials should be solemnized with very little delay.
She is a minor, he said, and more immature in judgment than
in years; I have the legal and moral right to dispose of her in
marriage, and believe me, sir count, I shall exercise it without
scruple or remorse.
Exactly so, replied Carlton; Indeed your parental
responsibility
for her welfare requires that you should enforce her compliance
with what your riper wisdom approves; itahreally becomes a
sort of moral obligation which you are not at liberty to evade,
although it may be a little unpleasant.
10*
Not a whit unpleasant, believe me, sir count, responded
Montaigne: I have spent my life in overcoming obstacles, of one
kind and another, and never feel more at ease than when one of
these familiar phantoms is blockading my path; I glory in obstacles,
sir, and since Blanche is disposed to rebel, I only regret that she has
not a little more force of will, that the pleasure of subduing it might
be the greater.
I fear
Fear nothing! retorted the baron, emphatically; go, and
propose to her, but with no school-boy cant of sentiment; speak
your admiration briefly and like a soldier, and tell her that you have
my consent to pay your addresses to her. She is prepared for
your proposition.
CHAPTER XXIX.
Now thy beauty is proposed my fee,
My proud heart sues, and prompts my tongue to speak.
Teach not thy lips such scorn.
Shaks. Richard III
.
Carlton
lost no time in obtaining an interview with Miss
Montaigne, still flattering himself that her objections to him were
only feigned, or that they would readily yield to his assiduous
addresses. He approached his subject with but little delay, yet with
an unqualified conceit of manner, comporting but ludicrously with
the idea of homage to his lady love. His habitual fear of
compromising
his personal dignity proved indeed a sort of check-string
to the excesses of a native politeness, and produced an awkward
mlange
of ardor and reserve.
Blanche took the first opportunity which was offered by any
decisive language of her lover to express to him politely her
declension of his suit; but the count did himself the honor to hope
that Miss Montaigne's views would undergo a changethatin
shortshe did not mean decidedly totothat is to say
Decidedly, sir count! replied Blanche, it is best to be plain in
the outset; I am obliged to you for your good opinion, but cannot
reciprocate the sentiments you profess to feel.
Profess
to feel! exclaimed the count, suddenly inspired with
the hope that Miss Montaigne's coldness resulted only from uncertainty
as to the genuineness of his attachment
profess
to feel! you doubt
me, my angel! that is to sayMiss Montaigne; I feel all that
I profess and a thousand timesthat isa considerable more.
It is immaterial, Count Carlton, Blanche replied: I did not
mean to question your sincerity
But you will relent? you will
Never, sir count, let me say it now, once for allneverunder
any possible concurrence of circumstances of which the imagination
can conceive.
The count took snuff and wondered what degree of force of will
the Baron Montaigne would desire his daughter to possess; he gazed
at her a moment, and added with a changed manner which
proclaimed
a conscious security of position, and the cool insolence of his
heart:
You are animated, Miss Montaigne! I like to see it; it adds to
your charms; you are a cherub, and will soon be a
countess
;
the baron and myself indeed have long agreed upon
a union of ourour houses; he has prepared me for these
eccentricities; I do not take them amiss; farewell, Miss Montaigne:
I shall have the pleasure soon of calling you by a different title
and then we will laugh at these little pleasantries.
The suitor reported to the baron the result of his mission, and
expressed his fears that the young lady's resolution could not be
shaken.
We will not make the attempt;we can manage to dispense
with her assent; she owes her being to meto you its
preservation
;
it were marvellous, indeed, if we had not the right to control
her in a matter so essential to her welfare, said the baron, seemingly
arguing against some latent misgivings.
Yescertainly, it would be very singular indeed, that would!
She shall have but little time for reflection; promptness is ever
one of the elements of success, and in a matter like this, may be
highly essential; had she been less wilful the wedding should not
have been hastened, but, as it is, a week from to-day, if you please,
sir count, she shall be your bride.
Certainly, sir, you make me very happy, and I will do my best,
meanwhile, to overcome her objections; if I should be unfortunate
enough to fail, may I inquire how it is you propose to proceed?
Inquire nothing, and doubt nothing, Count Carlton; only
discharge your own duty and believe me, that yonder chapel, which
yesterday resounded with the
Te Deum
of the priests for your safe
return, shall, at the set time, hear your nuptial benediction spoken.
It would be strange, indeed, he continued, after a pause, speaking
rather in soliloquy, than as if addressing his companion; it would
be strange, indeed, if among all the cowled priests who eat of my
bread, there were none who could be depended on in an emergency.
Our superannuated Father Parez is at least reliable, for he is well
nigh blind, and the very brother of the adder in deafness; he will
go mechanically through any priestly function that may be designated,
only place the parties before him, and signify to him whether it is a
wedding, a christening, or a funeral, and it will be sung through,
despite any interruption less than a cannonading.
Ah yes, Father ParezI know his reverencehe mistook me
this morning for the Lynx, and when I shouted my salutations in his
ear, in the very best of French, he thanked me, and said he did not
understand the Huron languageha! ha! yes, he's the very man.
And his marriage certificate will be equal to the pope's, added
Montaignetherefore, I say again, fear nothing, for rather than be
thwarted in this measure, I would bestow Blanche upon you after
the custom of the nation, of which, as you are aware, I am now the
principal chief. There is a thing, you must know, which cob-web
spinning lawyers call the
lex loci contractu
they put it into His
Majesty's gracious noddle, and made my Indian
cara sposa
a
baroness
;
the marquis has told you the story of course; and as it is a
law of which I have had the benefit, the baron smiled bitterly at
the word, it is but fair that you should have it also, if needed.
You are a most potent monarch in your way, my lord baron,
replied Carlton, gleefully; Prospero in his haunted isle, was a pigmy
to you; I rely on you with perfect confidence.
You may do so, sir count, and believe me, that, a week from
to-day, Blanche shall be your bride.
The baron's excitement prevented him from observing that the
door of his room had opened before he uttered the last sentence, and
that the moccasined Lynx had entered with his usual noiseless
tread.
How is this? he said sternly, why do you intrude thus upon
our privacy? But, I am wrong; he comes ever thus, like a shadow,
and has never been reproved; if there is fault, therefore, it is mine.
Is not this my cousin, the King of the Hurons? said the Indian
gravely.
It isit is, said the baron; I was hasty, the Lynx is welcome;
why has he not brought his valiant friend, the Beaver, with him;
there are piled presents awaiting his return.
The Beaver shall come; my cousin shall see him, replied the
Indian, departing as he spoke, as silently as he had approached.
Encouraged by the manner in which Montaigne had spoken of
the disguised Henrich, the Indian had concluded that it was a
favorable moment to produce his friend, and to make the long
deferred explanation. He had heard, but scarcely heeded the baron's
promise to bestow Blanche on the count as his bride, for the intelligence
was not new to his mind, rumor having long predicted the alliance,
although no suspicion was entertained of its being in opposition to
the lady's wishes. Sagacious as was the Lynx on other points, he
was quite at fault in all the signs which mark affection between young
hearts; the trail of Cupid was invisible to his eyes; and he had
failed to discover the daring love of Henrich for the beautiful
companion
of his travels. If it had been otherwise, and above all, if he
had suspected the baron's knowledge of such an attachment, his
reason, soberer than the lover's, would have anticipated no friendly
reception of Huntington by Montaigne, and he would have been
spared the bitter disappointment to which he was destined.
Bitter, indeed, it was, both for him and the ingenuous youth. Not
that Henrich had been unwise enough to anticipate a very cordial
welcome, or insane enough to hope to supplant his titled rival in the
regard of the baron; but he had expected common justice and
gratitude, and hospitality, and for everything beyond, he was willing
to wait the revealings of time and truth. He had begun to feel
confident of an interest in the heart of Blanche, and although he
knew that a thousand influences would be brought to bear upon her
mind in favor of the count, he still hoped on, vaguely and indefinitely,
as the desolate will ever hope.
As he approached the castle, clad once more in his proper apparel,
the appalled count discerned him in the distance, and a sudden
perception of the
ruse
which had been practised upon him, filled his
heart with rage and mortification. He kept, however, warily aloof
from the visiter, convinced that he had already planted a petard in
his path to which his own steps must now ensure a destructive
explosion. He did not greatly overrate the effect of the suspicions
which he had excited in the baron's breast, and little more is perhaps
essential to be related of the interview which ensued. The ghosts
of past offences, and the phantoms of anticipated wrongs were
conjured up to meet the guest, and where he thought to be treated
as a benefactor, he found himself virtually arraigned as a criminal.
His advantages of person and education served only to increase the
disfavor with which he was beheld, for in these things, his host saw
but the confirmation of Carlton's suspicions, and the probable cause
of his daughter's mysterious conduct.
Henrich was, in short, barely forgiven as an offender, was insulted
by the offer of a pecuniary reward for his services, and, if not denied
the hospitalities of the castle, they were tendered in a way which
rendered their rejection necessary to his self-respect. He departed,
as he came, with the Lynx, more cold and stately than the man
whose presence he left, and scathing, with the legible scorn of his
face and air, a heart which scorn alone could scathe.
He did not see Blanche: she knew not of his presence, and heard
only at a subsequent hour an imperfect and unreliable account of
what had taken place; and it was in vain that either herself or
Emily sought to gain speech with the incensed baron on the subject.
She learned, however, through Myrtle's agency, that Henrich had
taken up his abode with the Lynx, and rejoicing in the security which
the attachment of the faithful chief afforded him, she still indulged
the hope that some returning sense of justice would yet actuate her
father's conduct towards him. She did not, indeed, anticipate a
change which could ever favor Henrich's claims as her suitor, but at
the same time she remained comparatively free from any serious
apprehensions of a compulsory union to another. The plot, however,
was thickening around her, the mesh was entangling her steps, the
more securely, because unsuspected.
CHAPTER XXX.
Come, Friar Francis, be brief; only to the plain form of marriage, and you shall recount
their particular duties afterward.
Shaks. Much Ado about Nothing
.
A week
, marked by no important events, ensued, during which,
Huntington continued with his Huron friend, partaking, to some
extent, both of his labors and his sports. The Indian, it will
be remembered, had overheard the promise made by the
baron to Carlton, that within a week Blanche should become his
bride, but the subject, exciting little interest at the time, had been
subsequently expelled from his mind by the engrossing emotions
incident to Henrich's reception. It recurred to him, however, at
length, on the very last of the limited days, and he was little
prepared for the agitation which the casual announcement of the
tidings to his guest occasioned. Incredulous of danger at first, doubt
and alarm rapidly succeeded in Huntington's mind; he believed it
indeed
impossible that Blanche's consent could fairly have been obtained
to so speedy a marriage, but he knew not to what influences she
might have been subjected, while his knowledge of the baron's
character taught him to dread the worst.
Filled with fear and anxiety, and feeling his utter impotence to
stay the impending blow, (alas! might it not already have fallen?)
he walked at dusk, towards the castle, hoping to glean some
information
,
which might relieve his mind from its torturing apprehensions.
He thought it a favorable sign, as he drew near the building, that it
was not unusually lighted, and that there was not the least of that
bustling commotion, which, to some extent, usually marks so
momentous an event even when it is comparatively private. He had
gazed long and closely, and was about turning away, when his eye
fell upon a solitary light gleaming through a window of the chapel,
an edifice of considerable size, which stood without the walls, about
sixty yards north of the castle, and like it, fronting towards the river.
With the sight, the remembrance flashed upon his mind, that the
baron belonged to a church, which regarded the marriage ceremony
as a sacrament, to the validity of which, as consecrated hands were
essential, a consecrated altar was scarcely less so. Was it not
possible then, that at that very moment the mystic words were
spoken, almost within his hearing, which would prove the knell of
hope and joy to his heart?
Resolved to know the worst, to behold, if he could, the dreaded
rite, and to learn at least if there were not some tokens of sadness
and reluctance on the part of Blanche, which might take from his
anguish a portion of its intensity, he turned quickly and with
resolute
air towards the church. He approached the principal entrance,
and finding it closed, passed around the building, to a small postern
door through which the priests were accustomed to enter. This also
was fastened, but scarcely had he relinquished the unyielding latch,
when he heard the sound of coming footsteps, and at the next breath,
he discovered, through the dim light, the bulky figure of Father
Parez, clad in sacerdotal robes, approaching with a slow and heavy
tread. Henrich stepped aside to make way for the priest, who,
either unobservant of his presence, or mistaking him for some
official of the chapel, passed him without remark, and applying a key
to the door, opened it, and went in. Huntington followed, with no
attempt at secresy, yet unseen; with no suppressed tread, yet
unheard; he entered the main body of the church, and remained
standing near the centre of the principal aisle.
The clergyman, meanwhile, with no little rattling of his robes,
approached the reading desk, and bending for a minute in the
posture of devotion, rose and peered earnestly around him in search
of the wedding
cortge
which he did not seem to doubt were
assembled somewhere near the chancel. Failing in his search, yet
supposing them to be seated in some of the surrounding pews, he
repeated the first few words of the marriage service, by way of an
invocation to bring them forward; but the husky tones died away
unanswered, and the priest, wisely concluding that the party had not
yet arrived, seated himself to await their coming.
The stolidity of this conduct did not fail to excite Henrich's
suspicions
.
Why, with quick thought, he asked himself, has this palsied
man been selected to perform a rite like this? Why is he unattended
by clerk or associate? Why this dimly lighted room, and these
closely fastened doors? True, the appointed hour might not yet
have arrived; the church might yet be more fittingly lighted, and
its portals thrown open, but with such fearful conjectures as now
forced themselves upon his mind, he resolved at least to seek a position
which would not expose him to observation, and await the result.
He accordingly selected an obscure seat, into which the dim light
did not penetrate, and from which, unobserved, he could plainly see
all that occurred in the vicinity of the altar. Scarcely had he done
so, when the sound of coming steps reached his ears, and startled his
throbbing heart into increased and violent action, for, on the
revelations
of the next moment would depend, as he supposed, the question
whether some reluctant consent to the ceremony had been wrung by
threats and entreaty from Miss Montaigne, or whether she was sought
to be made the victim of a still more perfidious plot. If Emily and
Myrtle, or either of them, should accompany her, he must believe
the former; if not, there could no longer be a doubt as to the
nefarious design, and he resolved at least boldly to lift up his voice
in protest against it. Yet alas! what could he do, beyond drawing
the full weight of the despotic baron's wrath upon himself, producing
his immediate banishment, and perhaps even his death, and that too
without affording relief or rescue to the object of his solicitude.
Racked with agony by the impending crisis, which even his ever
elastic hope foresaw no means of averting, his eye rested upon the
now opening door, where he beheld Carlton, richly dressed, entering
noiselessly and alone. The count bowed low to the priest, who
seemingly unobservant of the greeting, continued to rattle the leaves
of his prayer book, and look vacantly around, while the former
remained standing near the chancel, watching with a nervous and
excited air, the door through which he had just passed. Five
minutes elapsed, when it again slowly opened, a sob and voice of
entreaty were heard without, and a stern reply, and the Baron
Montaigne supporting his half-swooning daughter upon his arm,
entered the chapel.
Not herenot thusmy father, she said; if indeed it must
be! give me at least time for thought and preparation, and let Emily
and Myrtle stand at my side; I appeal to you, sir count! I came
hither, as I supposed, to attend religious service, and it was only this
moment at the door that I was undeceived: give me timetime
time to think, she said, faintly, pressing her hand to her head, and
looking around with a bewildered air.
An air of some incertitude marked the baron's conduct: his attempt
at a surreptitious marriage was, indeed, only an experiment, yet it
was one which a knowledge of his daughter's timidity induced him
to believe would be perfectly successful; if it should prove otherwise,
he had other schemes in reserve more certain to be effectual.
Seemingly listening to her expostulations, he had contrived to station
her directly in front of the priest, and while he replied, the count had
stepped to her side, and Father Parez, being notified by a gesture to
proceed, was already rapidly reciting the marriage service.
It shall be repeated in the castle, if you desire, my child, said
the baron, speaking in a far louder tone than the clergyman's, and
endeavoring to distract her attention from what was taking place;
then they shall all be present, and there shall be a great
fte
only
be calm nowbe calm
Give me timetime, she said, heedless that the priest was
rapidly running through the mystic ceremony, and that the count was
responding and bowing assent to the demands of the ghostly father
give me time! she repeated, with a look of agony at her parent,
who, under pretence of supporting her, was holding her by the arm,
If it is my duty, I will submitbut not nowoh not nowI will
notcan not
Shall not
! exclaimed Henrich, wrought to desperation by the fear
that the fatal tie would be completed beyond reliefSHALL NOT!
he said, springing, almost at a bound, to her side, and startling the
group as if a thunderbolt had fallen in their midstwhile still the
nasal song of the priest went on, undisturbed even by the commotion
around him. Carlton had sprung backward and stood transfixed
with terror, gazing at the intruder; Blanche, released from her
father's grasp, was clinging to the rail of the chancel, while the baron
himself had receded a step, and stood looking with such amazement
on Henrich, as that with which one might view a spirit evoked from
the grave.
Shall not
! repeated Huntington, in tones that rang and vibrated
through every corner of the darkened building, and which awoke the
automaton priest, at length, to a consciousness that something was
amiss, and caused him to suspend his chant, not while I have voice
to forbid, and strength to stay the unhallowed deed?
What madman is this? exclaimed Montaigne, nearly voiceless
with rage, and stepping towards Henrich as he spoke: is it thou,
most insolent, and audacious?
It is I! replied Henricha madman, if you will, yet driven to
madness: listen, lord baron, one moment to mefor her sakefor
yoursnot for mine
In the dungeon I will listen to thee! answered Montaigne,
stepping towards the door: see to your bride, sir count, while I
summon some men from the garrison.
The baron disappeared as he spoke, and Carlton stood motionless,
gazing at the door through which he had vanished.
FlyflyMr. Huntington, I implore you! exclaimed Blanche,
addressing him in English, you do not know of what my father is
capablego, I beseech you; your very life may be in danger.
And you,dear Blanche?
You can do nothing for meI am lostbut fly, and save your
lifethe Lynx can protect you.
And he can protect
you
, Miss Montaigne, or at least can conceal
you until this danger is past, and your father relentsorwe may
escape togetherdearest Blancheifif you will be mine!
It is impossible!
there is no hope. Go, I beseech you; I hear
my father shouting to the men! oh, they will surely kill you! go,
go, I beseech!
Never without you, Blanche! If you would save my life, fly
with me! Oh, resist this tyranny; there is no law, human or
divine
,
which requires you to submit to it. Will you go? there is not
a moment to lose.
Henrich seized the arm of the wavering girl as he spoke, and,
while bewildered and undecided she yet stepped slowly forward, the
count, with sudden suspicion of the movement, shouted, Stop!
stop, I command you! and advanced hesitatingly towards her.
This movement decided Blanche, and turned into a flight, what
otherwise, perhaps, would not have become so; clinging to Henrich's
arm, she darted with him through the doorway by which they had
entered the chapel, and as they passed it, Carlton, more courageous
than usual, was close behind them; but Henrich, withdrawing
Blanche's arm for a moment from his own, turned quickly around,
and thrusting his pursuer suddenly back into the building, closed the
door, and locked it by means of the key which had remained in the
outer side.
The voice of the returning baron and the tread of the
approaching
soldiers were already sounding in his ears, as, again supporting
Blanche, he turned an angle of the church, and sought to escape
towards the forest, the dense border of which was scarcely a
hundred
yards distant; but, alas, the heavily increasing burden on his
arm told him that Miss Montaigne was incapable of flight, and in
another moment he became sensible that she had swooned. To
carry her, unobserved, across the interval which separated them from
the woods was clearly impossible, and nearly hopeless of eluding
observation
,
he yet drew her closely within the shade of the chapel,
and with fast throbbing heart awaited the result.
A confused sound of rapid talking at the same moment was
heard, the crash of a yielding door, and then the count's agitated
voice, shouting, They have fled! they have fled! get lights and
follow, towards the forest; cut him down! cut him down!
Silence!
exclaimed the baron, in a voice hoarse with terrific
rage; say not my daughter has fled! The miscreant has carried
her off, and he shall surely die for the act; but take him unharmed;
there is a fitter death for him than the sword.
So saying he led the way towards the wilderness, and in a moment
the whole tide of pursuit had passed by; yet scarcely had
Montaigne
gone a dozen rods, when, again stopping, he called aloud,
Back! back, half of you, to the river, and guard the boats; call
out more men; he cannot escape us!
This order, indeed, anticipated the design of Huntington, and
seemed to cut off his last chance of retreat; the river was about thirty
rods distant towards the west, and he had resolved to gain it, if
possible, when Blanche revived, and by means of a canoe, set out
northwardly for the St. Lawrence, and Montreal. In a few moments
the returning soldiers again passed him scarcely twenty feet distant,
eager and voluble as hounds on the chase, and sending one towards
the barracks for a reinforcement, they dashed onward to the river.
The whole castle was now in commotion, while its precinets were
alive with people, running in every direction, and inquiring the cause
of the alarm; moving lights were flashing from a dozen windows;
screams of affright were heard, and anon, booming loudly above the
uproar, a cannon roared sullenly from the walls. The baron,
thoughtful of every precaution, had despatched back a messenger to
give this signal to put his Indian allies on the alert, and to summon
their leaders to his presence, for he well knew the extraordinary daring
and sagacity of Huntington, and wisely conjectured that if he once
attained an advantageous start, there might be the most serious
difficulty in overtaking him.
It was in the midst of this tumult that Blanche at length awoke
to a sense of her situation, and listened to the earnest importunities
of Henrich to rally her strength and courage.
This way, dear Blanche! to the river! he said, pointing in a
direction north of where the soldiers had goneif I can procure a
boat, we may yet be safe.
Oh, no, no, Henrich! alone! in the wilderness! I cannot go;
I am dying with terror; let us stay; let us return to my father; I
will throw myself upon my knees, and never, never rise until he has
forgiven you.
It is idle to talk thus, dearest Blanche! replied Henrich,
speaking
with great rapidity: he will not relent, nor will he release you
from this hated marriage; I have learned the whole storyit is the
darling project of his heart; it is connected with his political fortunes,
and for this alone is it that you have been brought from your home
in England. Renounce then, these scruples, and assert your liberty:
the world is before us
Hist! exclaimed a whispering voice at their side, and Myrtle,
trembling like an aspen, stood before them: the soldiers are coming
this way, she said: you cannot escape; every point is guarded;
but there are safe hiding-places in the castle, where you can remain
until means of successful flight are found,if we can but reach them:
if you dare to try, follow me!
She turned as she spoke, and darted close along the northern wall
of the chapel, followed by Blanche and Henrich, and turning another
angle, the party gained the front of the building, still keeping within
its deep shadows. Scarcely sixty yards separated them from the
castle walls, but the intervening space was alive with moving figures,
traversing it in every direction, and shouting unintelligibly to each
other. If the faint starlight revealed no one distinctly, neither did
it admit of any altogether escaping observation.
Follow boldly! said Myrtle; there is no other way; a minute
hence and it will be too late.
With quick step she started forward, again followed by Henrich
and Blanche; but scarcely were they in motion, when two soldiers,
hastening directly towards them, struck new terror into their hearts.
But Myrtle advanced a step to meet them, preventing their close
approach to her companions: Go quickly, and ring the chapel
bell! she said; why do you loiter here, where you can do no
good?
Zealous to do something, and glad of such a commission, the men
rushed forward to the church, and left the way unobstructed. But a
more serious impediment was at hand. Carlton was among those
who had turned at the command of the baron, to prosecute the
search in the vicinity of the river, and he had since wandered
aimlessly
about in every direction, giving a multiplicity of useless
instructions
to all whom he met, with his usual bustling inefficiency.
He was now almost directly in the route of the fugitives, of whom he
caught sight nearly at the moment that Myrtle, with quick eye,
recognised
his figure, and diverged from her course in a direction
towards the rear of the castle. Discerning female forms, but entirely
unsuspicious of the character of the party, he still approached in a
direction to intercept them. There was no evading the encounter,
without the most direct flight, and in a few seconds he was at the
side of Myrtle, who, as before, had advanced a little to meet him.
Ah, ha! are you out in this tumult, Miss Myrtle? he said,
speaking quickly; isn't it a marvellous affaira forcible abduction!
was ever the like heard! But we shall have himwe shall have
him; who are these with you?
As he spoke he gave a quick start of surprise, but immediately
12
added, with seeming equanimity, Ah, ha! I see: Miss Roselle and
and Lieutenant Seabury, I presume. So saying he turned away,
with quick step, towards a small party of soldiers who were passing
at a little distance, leaving the greatly relieved friends at liberty to
pass on, which they now did with increased speed; but only for a
moment. A shout and rush were heard behind theman order to
stand; and Carlton again made his appearance in the rear of three
soldiers, who rushed breathlessly upon Henrich, and bore him to the
ground.
The screams of the ladies, and the repeated calls of the count for
more help, were followed by the rapid running of people from all
quarters towards the point of attraction, while the dignified Carlton
continued to announce to the successive comers, the triumphant
event:
He's caught! he's caught! I did it myself! I found him! hold
on to him there, boys! another man to each of his arms! there,
don't let him slip: the baron will be here in a moment; I've sent
for himha! ha! I did it myself!
Central amidst this group, when at length permitted to rise, stood
Henricha prisoner, pinioned, hooted, derided, and mute; the
agitation of hope and suspense was pasthis was the silent serenity
of despair.
CHAPTER XXXI.
I see thou art implacable, more deaf
To prayers than winds and seas: yet winds and seas
Are reconciled at length, and sea to shore:
Thy anger, unappeasable, still rages,
Eternal tempestnever to be calm.
Milton's Samson Agonistes
.
In
a dungeon rayless as his heart, Henrich passed the ensuing
nighta night, which to more than one of the inmates of Castle
Montaigne was replete with prolonged misery; a night dilated by
terror, until its moments became minutes, its minutes hours, and its
every hour a long age of anguish and suspense. Montaigne had
preserved an ominous silence in relation to the prisoner, utterly
refusing all intercourse with any one upon the subject, and giving no
other clew to his design in regard to him than could be derived from
a knowledge of the ignominious place of his confinement. Vainly
did Blanche seek again and again her father's apartment; vainly did
she send message after message to beg a moment's interview; she
received no answer; her envoys could not even penetrate to the
presence of the forest autocrat.
In the morning, Carlton alone was summoned to his room, and
the sanguinary nature of a decree emanating from such a tribunal
may well be anticipated.
He should die, if he had a thousand lives! said the baron,
striding excitedly to and fro in his apartment, while the gratified count
stood listening to the ebullitions of his wrath, and feeding, from time
to time, its flame: the disgrace shall be wiped out and for ever; a
pardoned mutineer and spyhe has revived his crimes, and added
to them sacrilege, and the kidnapping of my own child!
Besides, replied the count, with him will be buried the
knowledge of some circumstances, whichare all right, you know,
but which might be misconstrued by an uncharitable world.
The baron knit his brow, angry that his secret thoughts had been
probed by his partner in guilt.
I do not shrink from my acts, sir count, he said;or deprecate
the censure of mortal man. The intended marriage
was
right, and
shall yet be consummated; it's only obstacle will now be removed,
for mortifying as the fact may be, Blanche has evidently felt or
fancied some attachment for this miscreant. Enough, however, of
this; it was not to decide whether he shall die, that I have called on
you; for justice, honor, and the preservation of discipline alike require
this; I only hesitate whether to accord him a soldier's death.
He is not a soldier, answered Carlton.
He is not a coward, replied Montaigne, calling, undesignedly,
the quick blood to the cheek of the other; and he has done us some
service, although out of no good will, and only in the prosecution of
his own most presumptuous purposes.
Yes, certainly, of course; ah, I think you had better hang him,
said the count, taking a pinch of snuff.
But then the other is a simpler process, said the baron, and
can be more quickly despatchedit is only to call out a file of
soldiers and the prisoner, give the word of command, and it is all
overwhat say you?
The idea of despatch struck the count favorably: Perhaps it
would be best, he answered: I believe you are right: the gallows
would add nothing to his infamy.
It is decided then: go if you please, and send Sergeant Grill
to me.
The count bowed and departed, and in a few minutes the sergeant
entered the apartment where Montaigne was now quietly seated with
no trace of excitement on his calm stern face. Grill was a very
machine in everything pertaining to discipline; his obedience was
as perfect as clock-work, and had almost as little to do with any
degree of ratiocination. That an act was ordered by a superior
officer was to him as ample a justification of it, as if its propriety had
been shown by more than Euclidian demonstration; and as he now
made his appearance in the baron's presence, everything in his air
and step, and in the quick, sharp tones of his responding voice, spoke
the rigid martinet.
Sergeant Grill, said the baron, with more of a mild and
condescending air, than was wont to characterize his deportment to
his inferiors: Sergeant Grill will have anticipated that the outrage
of yesterday can have but one issue. The offender dies at noon,
to-day; he is to be shot, on the green, behind the barracks. You
will detail a dozen men for this duty, and report to me when
everything
is in readiness.
The precisian bowed stiffly.
There will be a strong interest made to save him, continued the
baron, and I may be compelled to hear some petitions and
lamentations; if you find me thus engaged, when you call to make
your report, remember that the raising of my finger thus, is a signal
for you to proceed, and while the work is being done, I can hear the
childish supplications through; the easiest way to answer a foolish
remonstrance is by showing that it is made too late, and the sentence
being once executed, acquiescence will speedily follow. If I am not
prevented by any such annoyances, I will myself attend the execution.
Do you understand?
I doI am to report to you when everything is in readiness;
if I find you engaged, this motion, he said, repeating the one made
by Montaigne, will be a signal to go on without further orders.
Meanwhile, added Montaigne, you will hold communication
with no one on the subject, excepting at once to announce to the
prisoner his fate, and provide him a priest, if he desires.
Grill again bowed and departed.
Blanche, in the meantime, with the aid of both Myrtle and Emily,
had exhausted every effort to learn the situation of Henrich, and the
nature of the punishment which was designed for him. They knew
only that he was in the dungeon, and that the passage which led to
it was guarded by sentinels who permitted no approach to the
prisoner. Miss Montaigne, despite her knowledge of her father's
severity, indulged a strong hope that when the first fierceness of his
anger had cooled, he would not prove sanguinary or unrelenting;
she entertained indeed, no faintest suspicion of the secret sentence
already pronounced upon her friend, nor dreamed that he could be
doomed to death without some show of trial, either civic or martial.
When that should take place, said whispering Hope, she would
herself, if necessary, plead his cause; she would move the stony
hearts of his judges; she would in some way, by some unyielding
importunity, win lenity in his behalf, although it must be the lenity
of perpetual banishment from her presence.
Secret, however, as had been Montaigne's movements, they could
not long be concealed, and it was the knowledge of this fact which
had induced him to appoint so early an hour for the execution.
Conjecture had been rife among his retainers and dependants, ever
since the moment of Henrich's capture, as to the punishment to be
inflicted upon him, and the first note of preparation for the sad
tragedy was heralded by the busy tongue of rumor in every
direction.
Blanche sat in her own apartment, wearied with exhausting
fears, and awaiting the return of Emily and Myrtle, both of whom,
with untiring assiduity, had sought to encourage and soothe her, and
were now absent on some mission of inquiry and observation. The
door opened, and Miss Roselle, pale as a ghost, entered and sank
trembling at her cousin's feet, vainly seeking to speak the words
which faltered on her lips; while Myrtle, with extended arms and
dishevelled hair, came flying behind her, not voiceless indeed, yet
scarcely more intelligible in her incoherence, than Emily in her
silence.
They will not do it! they will not do it, dear Blanche, she said;
do not be frightened; oh, my father cannot, will not be so cruel.
What is it that you mean, MyrtleEmily? speak quickly, if
you would not see me die.
He is to be shot, faltered Emily, within an hour!
It shall not be
! exclaimed Blanche, springing to her feet,
and looking upwards with a face from which grief and terror had been
driven by a look of the most lofty resolution;
It shall not be
!
Thrice has he saved my life, and nowGod of Heaven, hear my
vow! I will save his, or die at his side!
She passed with quick step from the room as she spoke,
motioning
to her friends to follow, and in another minute the three were at
the door of the baron's state apartment. A soldier, acting as
doorkeeper
,
who was stationed there for no other purpose than to save
Montaigne from the importunities which he anticipated, informed the
ladies that they could not enter; but Blanche, without reply, sprang
past the surprised sentinel, as he spoke, and opening the unlocked
door, rushed into the room, followed by her companions. The baron
and the count were together, seated, and earnestly conversing; the
latter rose; the former remained sitting, with fierce and frowning aspect.
You have sentenced him to die! said Blanche, standing before
her father, with flashing eyes and pallid face, and quailing not at a
look, which, under other circumstances, would have paralysed her
frame; you have sentenced him to die, and would have kept it
from us! Now hear me; for I have come, not to beg, but to
demand
his release. By your sense of justice,by the honor of your
ancient family,by your self-respect, and your hopes of happiness,
here and hereafter,murder not the man who has been thrice the
preserver of your daughter's lifewhose single arm saved us all
from destruction, when this miserable man played the coward and
poltroon.
She cast a look of unutterable scorn at the count as she spoke, and
again fastened her gaze upon her father's face, searching for some
yielding expression.
Go on! said the baron, fixing his stony eye upon his daughter,
with such relenting as the rock yields to the rose.
For
yourself
I speak, she said, breathing hard with the violence
of her emotion,lay not this sin upon your soul! nay, you dare
not do it! she continued, with sudden vehemence, and with a
return
of that remarkable expression which assimilated her
countenance
so nearly to that of the man she was addressing; you may
be absolute here; but while from yon bending sky, God and angels
watch your actions, you
dare not
do it! Oh, my father, my father!
she added, unable long to sustain so unwonted a part, and frightened
by a changed expression in his face, which, whatever its character, was
not mercy; save him! pardon him! spareoh, spare his life!
Emily and Myrtle added their earnest supplications, the latter
now sinking to her knees before her father, and now clinging to his
neck, and imploring, with prolonged and plaintive accents, a
remission
of the prisoner's doom.
For Blanche's sake, she said, for poor dear Blanchedo not
be angry for her words; it was but your own high spirit which spoke
in her; oh, have pity on her, father, or she will surely die.
You have all spoken, said the baron, at length; is there any
one else? I think I hear voices at the door.
The baroness, if you please, sir, wishes to come in, said the
sentinel
,
thrusting in his head.
Admit her! he continued, with the same calm voice; we
will hear them all. Are you also, madam, a petitioner for the
prisoner
?
Yesoh, yes, said the frightened woman, clasping her hands
and looking everywhere excepting in the face of her lord; but you
will not hear
me
but Myrtle! Myrtle! she whispered; speak to
himthe time is short!
Myrtle has spoken, replied Montaigne, and I will now answer
you all
The Lynx, if you please, my lord, desires to come in, said the
doorkeeper, again making his appearance.
Let him come, replied the baron; and the Indian stalked
silently
but swiftly to the front of the tribunal, around which so many
suitors were clustered. He was dressed with elaborate care; his
scalp-lock was trimmed and adjusted with unusual neatness, and his
exposed chest was painted as for some expected ceremonial.
The Lynx will die for Henrich! he said: the soldiers of my
cousin shall plant their balls here, touching his breastnot in the
heart of the young Brave of Manahatta!
The baron scowled ominously as he listened, but before he could
reply, the door again opened, and the Algonquin was announced.
Show him in! said Montaigne, now folding his arms, and
throwing
himself back in his chair with an air of composed determination:
show him in, Francis, and please to step aside and leave the way
free for future comers; your labors must be wearisome.
The Indian stationed himself beside his red brother, and looking
at the baron, said: My warriors have heard that the young Brave
of the south must die, and their eyes are wet. Let him live, and
they will heap your hearth with the scalps of the Iroquois for his
ransom; the King of the Hurons is not cruel; he will spare his
young brother, and the hearts of our tribes will be glad.
I have heard you allpatiently and attentively, said the baron,
looking at his watch as he spoke, and glancing towards the door
with an expectant air: you are all my friends, and if I cannot give
you reasons that are satisfactory, within a few minutes, why I ought
not to listen to your requestsI will hear you further.
Sergeant Grill entered the room at this moment, and stood just
within the door, erect and motionless.
I say nothing, continued the baron, of the nature of the
opposition which I meet to-day in the exercise of my most undoubted
12*
and legitimate powersthe punishment of an atrocious criminalof
the almost mutinous manner in which I am beset on every hand for
his pardon, as if
The speaker paused, and catching the eye of the watchful sergeant,
made the preconcerted signal to the latter to withdraw, and fulfil his
work, and as the officer silently departed, he continued
as if I were incompetent to administer the laws of my own
domainnay, with a spirit that imputes to me more than the guilt
of the accused, and would hold him innocent. For this cause alone
which strikes at the very foundation of my authority, I should be
compelled to deny your requests; when I add to them the heinous
nature of the crimes to be punishedcrimes both private and
politicalcommitted by a citizen of a country with which we are at
war,while he was in fact receiving our protection
The baron paused, and looked impatiently at his watch, and then,
turning towards the window, assumed a listening attitude:
andandour hospitality; when all these things are
considered, I say, it becomes a matter of surprise that any should be
found who could indulge the hope of lenity to the prisoner. Some
of you, who know nothing of the principles of government, or of the
degree of rigidity in its laws which is essential to its safety, are more
excusable; but there are those here, he added, glancing at the
Indians, who compel me to remind them that I have lately
overlooked
serious offences of their ownoffences which have led
indirectly, to this very crime, which is to-day to be expiated.
Nononooh say not so, my father Blanche replied
rapidly, and in tones of agonyyou will at least take one day for
deliberation; you will hear his defencehis vindicationyou will
notcannot condemn him unheard?
Unheard?
answered the baron in a voice of grating harshness
unheard?
Have I not myself been a spectator of his crime?
Shall I summon witnesses to prove what my own eyes have
beheld?
But you will take
one day
oh,
one day
for reflection, she
continued
with choked and tremulous articulation, and extending her
clasped hands towards her parent; let it at least not be with the
setting of
this
sun that he dies; thinkoh think, if to-morrow you
should regret itit will then be for ever too late.
If to-morrow I shouldregret it, replied the baron, slowly:
if to-morrow I shouldregret itthen and again the speaker
pausedand
listened!
His gaze was outward, through the window, and Blanche, whose
eyes were fixed upon his, seemed suddenly electrified by their
expression; a dreadful suspicion flashed upon her mind, and uttering
a piercing scream, she sprang to the door, and in another breath, her
shrieks were heard from without, as she darted along the hall and
into the inner court of the castle. In a moment everything was
uproar and confusion; Myrtle and Emily rushed in pursuit, and the
Lynx, catching with quick suspicion the meaning of the movement,
leaped, like a loosened tiger, through the doorway.
Blanche meanwhile, whose eyes, running rapidly over the ground,
had failed to discover the dreaded sight which she anticipated, had
taken a direction towards the barracks, and turned the corner of the
buildings just as the quick sharp voice of Sergeant Grill rang upon
the air, and the presented arms of the soldiers waited but the final
monosyllabic order, to pour forth their deadly contents. Her white
robes flashed for a moment on the eyes of the astonished soldiers, as
she passed directly in front of their upraised weapons, and in the same
moment, stood panting and speechless before the kneeling prisoner.
Her form intercepted the view of his; her arms were extendedher
chest rose and fell with the stormy violence of her emotion, and
flashing
eye, and flaring nostril, and quivering lip, spoke the raging
tumult within.
Remove her! shouted Grill, and one from the line stepped
quickly forward for that purpose, but, ere he had reached Miss
Montaigne, the Lynx was at her side, menacing, with drawn knife,
the approaching soldier, who hesitated and looked back for aid.
The Huron meanwhile addressed Henrich, whose bandaged eyes
had, up to this moment, taken no cognisance of the strange
interruption
to the melancholy drama.
I have come to die for you, my brother, he said, quickly
removing the handkerchief from the prisoner's face; the King of
the Hurons will hear my words, for the Lynx is a chief, and hundreds
of warriors shout his battle-cry; rise, my brother, and when you
return to Manahatta, tell the Wappeno dogs that the Lynx was not
afraid to die.
But ere he had finished speaking, other actors were added to the
scene; Emily and Myrtle had arrived, followed at a short interval
by the baron, the count, and the Algonquin Indian.
See how rapidly spreads the contagion of mutiny and treason!
shouted Montaigne. Sergeant Grill, remove these, and complete
your work; let Miss Montaigne be conveyed to her room; you, sir,
must answer for this delay!
Hear me, my father, once more! exclaimed Blanche,
maintaining
her position by clinging to the arm of the Huron, whom no
one seemed disposed to interfere with; spare but his life,send
him forth in ignominy and alone, to regain his home,and I here
promise to be obedient to all your requests; I promise, within two
days, peaceably and unrepining, to become, if you desire it, the bride
of Count Carlton; she glanced shudderingly at the latter as she
spoke; but if you will not hear me, I here solemnly swear that I
will never accede to your wishes; never shall this man clasp hand of
mine while I have life and strength to prevent it. Here will I stay,
until torn by force away; and him, whom, living, I might have
forgotten
,
dead, I will for ever love; he shall be enshrined in my heart,
and while life endures, it shall have no other occupant.
As the baron looked around, he saw, through an open gateway, a
crowd of Huron warriors looking with sullen aspect upon the scene,
and recognised them as the immediate followers of the Lynx; they
were doubtless assembled, unbidden; yet, in the present excited
state of all parties, there might be serious danger in attempting to
arrest the Huron, or in applying any force to compel him to abandon
his position. Blanche's resolute language, and above all, her
promise
to consent to a marriage with Carlton, had nearly moved him
to a compliance, which only the strong pride of will restrained; but
now even that yielded.
I accept your terms, Miss Montaigne, he said; and be assured,
I shall hold you most strictly to them; this miserable man shall
receive lenity,such lenity as consists with an immediate banishment
from the territory of New France, under penalty of instant death if
found after twelve hours upon our soil. Sergeant, remove your
men!
Blanche had been excited to the last endurable degree of
intensity
;
a sudden reaction now took place, which reduced her to a state
of stupor and bewilderment bordering on a swoon. When she
recovered
,
she was in her own apartment, and Huntington was already
without the castle walls.
CHAPTER XXXII.
if to robe
This form in bridal ornaments, to smile
(I
can
smile yet,) at thy gay feast, and stand
At th' altar by thy side; if this be deemed
Enough, it shall be done.
Mrs. Hemans
.
The Vespers of Palermo
.
More
malignant than Montaigne, and equally inexorable, Count
Carlton had hoped and believed that the baron would not yield
either to emotions of pity or fear; but when he reflected upon the
conditions with which pardon had been coupled, he did not deeply
regret the turn which events had taken. Huntington was
perpetually
banished, and Blanche had bound her conscience by a solemn
promise to become his bride within two days; so that, after all, as
he argued the matter to himself, everything had turned out for the
best, as it always does to the virtuous and just.
Miss Montaigne, meanwhile, counted her remaining hours of
freedom
,
and watched their departure with a miser's jealous care. She
had no design of retracting the dreadful pledge which she had given,
or of shrinking from a fulfilment of her contract; she had
purchased
Henrich's life; and, fearful as the price must prove, she
resolved
to pay it without a murmur; the solace of her act would at
least remain to her while life endured, which returning hope
suggested
could not be long.
Emily proved an assiduous and zealous, if not altogether a
discreet
friend, in the hour of her cousin's calamity.
Cheer up, dear Blanche, she said, when, on the evening of the
day in which the exciting events last related had occurred, they sat
together in the apartment of Miss Montaigne; the worst, at least,
is escaped; and as to the restwhy, you are not the first lady who
has lost a lovernor is it so dreadful a fate to become a countess,
after all.
Blanche sat by an open casement, looking with fixed and vacant
gaze upon the distant forests; but her senses took little cognizance
of what was passing before them, and the words of Emily did not
wound.
It will be all the same a hundred years hence, Miss Roselle
continued, using one of those consolatory maxims which are ever at
the tongue's end of people who know nothing of misery by
experience
;
you will forget it very soon, I assure you, particularly when
you reach Paris. I wonder, by the way, if they have any decent
stuff in Quebec for dresses: nothing fit for a bride, I'll be bound;
and as to Henrich, you need not grieve on his account; he'll be
safely home in a week, and will think no more about it; I should
not wonder, indeed, if he were married in three months to somebody
else.
Blanche remained heedless, and Emily, becoming conscious that
her words were not heard, ceased to speak, only resuming her
efforts at long intervals, and starting a dozen different themes with
the vain hope of arousing her cousin's attention. Miss Montaigne
did not weep, nor did any external signs mark her misery, excepting
the pallid cheek, and absent air, and that still stupor of deportment
which speaks the paralysis of the heart. If she found voice, at
times, it was only to inquire, with a repetition that evinced a
wandering
mind, the particulars of Henrich's departure.
Did not some one tell me that he went away with the good
Lynx, she asked, and that the Indian promised to send some one
with him on his journey?
Yes, Blanche, they went out of the castle yard together, and
the Huron told Myrtle this evening, that he had sent four strong
men with Henrich, who were to accompany him as far as the
Horicon
lake; they started an hour before sun-down, and are now, of
course, far on their way.
If you should ever see him again, Emily, she said solemnly,
fixing her lustreless eyes upon Miss Roselleif everwhen I am
gonetell himwhat I have never told himtell himfor it will
be no sin thenthat my whole heart was histhat I died thinking
of him,praying for him!
Blanche, dear Blanche, do not talk thus! exclaimed Emily;
you speak wildly: the scenes which you have gone through have
been too much for you.
You are right, cousin Emily, replied Miss Montaigne; they
have
been
too much
for me, and she relapsed again into her dreamy
and silent state, from which no efforts could rouse her, excepting for
a very moment's interval.
This continued through the whole of that and the ensuing day,
greatly to the apprehension of her female friends, who vainly sought
to alarm her father, by representing her condition, and to prevail on
him to desist, at least for a time, from his design. He would listen
to no representations; it was a rusea feint; he would not again
be baffled; he had her promise, from which she did not even ask to
be released. Besides, he said, delay would but make matters
worse, and when once she was married, all these whims would
quickly be dispelled; the excitement of a wedding journey would
of itself work wonders, for they were to set out at once for Quebec,
to spend a few days with the Marquis Vaudreuil, and if Blanche
chose, they would thence proceed directly to Paris; and Emily and
Myrtle were informed, by way, perhaps, of a bribe to their
acquiescence
,
that they should both accompany the bridal party as far as
the former place.
The preparations, indeed, went rapidly forward, and when the
morning of the second day arrived, there was no longer a
dissenting
voice to the ceremony, for Emily and Myrtle had found it useless
to remonstrate, and Blanche seemed more unconscious of what was
passing around her than usual. The two days which had been
stipulated for would not expire until noon of the day which had
now set in, and it was resolved that the marriage should take place
in the evening, in the adjacent chapel, which was to be brilliantly
lighted for the purpose, and various preparations for celebrating the
event, in and about the castle, were also in progress.
Count Carlton, elated beyond expression with his prospects, was
busily engaged in superintending a part of the festive arrangements,
and at about mid-day he mounted a horse and rode forth, in search
of the Lynx and the Algonquin, who were expected respectively to
head processions of warriors of their tribes in honor of the occasion.
The Lynx was easily found, for the principal village of his people
was close at hand, but Anak's abode was more distant, being
situated
several miles southward, and thither with light heart the Count
pursued his way. He found the Algonquin, like the Huron,
acquiescent
with the Baron's wishes, for although neither entered with
alacrity into the proposed arrangements, they were convinced that
they could do nothing further for Henrich, and were not unwilling
either to display themselves in their gala dresses, or to participate in
the expected feastings. Having parted with the last named Indian,
with a great show of cordiality, not forgetting to bestow a few
appeasing presents upon the stately brave, Carlton set out on his
return, rejoicing that his star was at last in the ascendant and that
the hour of his triumph had arrived.
Alas! how sad the contrast between his bliss and the anguish
with which the hapless Henrich had gone forth on his lonely way!
What a night of wretchedness was that, in which, re-traversing his
recent route, he glided, in his little bark, over the now resisting
current of the Sorelle, and re-entered the broad waters of the
Champlain
!
What a weary day of hopeless, joyless, leaden-winged hours
again succeeded, in which, with vain regret, his eyes measured the
still widening distance which separated him from his lost friend, or
dwelt idly upon the far northern sky, which bent tranquilly above
her abode.
At the close of the day succeeding that on which he left Castle
Montaigne, he was aroused from a reverie into which he had fallen
by feeling a sudden grasp upon his arm, and as he looked up to
the Indian who had thus familiarly touched him, he became
conscious
that he had already been earnestly addressed several times,
by name, and doubted not that there was some unusual cause for
accosting him. His conjecture did not prove erroneous; they had
been skirting the eastern shore of the lake, looking for a favorable
place to encamp for the night, and had just doubled a small cape or
promontory, when a sight had met the eyes of the Indians, which
seemed at once to have astounded and rendered them incapable
of action. Well might it do so, for on the shore, scarcely forty rods
distant from them, was a regular military encampment, while a fleet
of batteaux, about fifty in number, lay moored upon the beach.
Henrich's canoe had been discovered, and a dozen men were
rushing towards it on the shore, while others were leaping into boats
for the purpose of pursuit; flight would have been so utterly useless
that the Indians did not once attempt it, and in another moment
Henrich became happily conscious that for him, at least, it was not
desirable, for the force which they had encountered, whatever its
design or destination, was evidently English. He instructed the
men to row immediately to the shore in the direction of the soldiers
who were approaching, himself standing up, meanwhile, in the boat,
and signifying to the strangers, by amicable signs, his design of
submission.
Having landed, he requested to be taken to the commanding
officer, who, seated in his tent, received him with much apparent
curiosity and interest; he was a middle-aged man, seemingly of a
quick mercurial temperament, and giving evidence by his equipment
of no small rank. He at once addressed Huntington in French,
demanding his name and residence, and seemed astonished when
the latter replied politely to him in his own language, giving the
desired information. There was an air of incredulity, however, in
his manner, as he rejoined:
What do you here, Mr. Huntington, in this wilderness, near an
enemy's border, and accompanied by hostile Indians? You are not
their prisoner; they seem rather to be your guard.
They are such, replied Henrich, and I have come, as you
perhaps surmise, from the enemy's territory; under these
circumstances
,
I know that you will consider it your duty to detain me,
and I therefore will not occupy your time by explanations that I
have no means of verifying; more especially as my detention will
contribute to my security, and will afford me the means of safely
regaining my home.
Major Bain smiled as he replied to the young man, with whose
frank and ingenuous air he was not a little pleased:
I shall at least be compelled to detain your men, Mr.
Huntington
,
and you could not safely proceed without them; you may also
consider yourself under arrest, until I have time to make further
inquiries; but you will be compelled to retrace your steps, and
perhaps
to see, if you should not be disposed to participate in, some
military operations of moment.
May I inquire, asked Henrich, with great interest, which way
your expedition points?
We are going where we are very little expected, replied the
officer, excitedly; further I would not say at present, but every
soul in the camp knows our destination, and I shall endeavor to
make up by the celerity of our movements, for the want of their
secresywe go, in short, to smoke out of his castle, a certain Robin
Hood knight here in the north, of whom you must have heard,
whose insolence, long extreme, has latterly grown insufferable, and
has justified the fitting out of an expedition against him, in his own
retreat.
Is it possible that you mean
The Baron Montaigne! replied the major, no one else; the
governors of New York and New England have each contributed a
small force to the enterprise, and we are altogether sure of our game.
I speak freely to you, Mr. Huntington, because I may perhaps be
able to offer you service which you would be glad to accept: one of
our officers has been deserted, sick, at an Indian settlement,
and
It is impossible, replied Huntington, that I should avail
myself
of your generous offer; there are reasons which I will give you
in private, why I can take no part in your expedition, further than
to accompany it as a spectator.
Henrich retired from this interview with emotions the most
thrilling
and exciting; alarm for the safety of Blanche and his other
friends at the castle, had been his first generous feeling, but this had
been succeeded by dawning hopes, the brilliancy of which he scarcely
dared to contemplate. These, in their turn, gave way to other
thick-coming fears and fancies; the army would arrive too late to
prevent the nuptials of the count; the baron would make a
triumphant resistance, or a successful retreat; or a capitulation would
admit him to retire with his family to Quebec, and give up his castle
to his invaders.
Either of these results was, in fact, more probable than that any
favorable change would ensue to his own fortunes from the events
in progressyet there was pleasure in the thought that he might
once more behold the object of his affection, even if it were but to
speak a last farewell. His duty, at least, was clear; he was
compelled
to accompany the invaders; but his position demanded a most
perfect neutrality of conduct; neither by action nor advice might he
assist his country's enemiesnor, while so many of his personal
friends were in their midst, aid to discomfit them. Whatever, by
intercession or otherwise, he could effect for their benefit, if his
people proved victorious, that it would, of course, be his privilege
and delight to do, and with such a conclusion, he sought for a while
to dismiss the agitating theme from his mind, and to find that
composure
to which he had been so long a stranger.
He strolled about the camp and found amusement in observing
the heterogeneous materials of which the little army was composed;
its numbers amounted to about five hundred, of whom full one half
were Indians of various tribes in alliance with the English, and the
remainder were regular troops. The expedition had been set on
foot by Governor Cornbury, who, conscious of his present inability
to make any formal invasion of Canada, had resolved at least to
strike a blow upon one of its strongholds, and inflict signal vengeance
for a series of aggressions which had emanated from that particular
source. The movement had long been in contemplation, and had
been hastened now by the recent capture of Lieutenant Seabury,
and by the governor's anxiety to effect his release. Cornbury, indeed,
had scarcely indulged the hope of seizing Montaigne, whose vigilance
was as proverbial as his valorbut he did not doubt that he should
be able to drive him from his castle, and to destroy, not only that
fastness, but the neighboring Indian villages.
The enterprise was not without its peril, and there were not
wanting those who predicted its failure, and asserted the utter
insufficiency
of the invading force to accomplish its object. Major Bain,
however, felt confident that a prompt movement, which would not
allow Montaigne to summon aid from Montreal, or from the more
distant Indians, must be as successful, as a dilatory one would
certainly
be disastrous, even if made with thrice his strength. He was
a brave man, and had long fretted under the inaction of a command
in Albany, which had afforded him no active service, and he exulted
in his present mission, to which, indeed, his own energetic counsels
had not a little contributed.
You have a motley collection here, said Huntington, to a
sergeant off duty, who had addressed him civilly as he passed, and
from whom he hoped to glean some farther information about the
contemplated attack.
Yes, sir, replied the officer, white, red, and blackit is a
queer-looking army, indeed, but they are all brave men, even the
negroes.
You do not mean that you have any negro soldiers, I presume?
enquired Henrich, they would be rare allies indeed.
Not exactly soldiers, was the reply; but Major Bain has a
couple of servants who profess themselves quite ready for duty, and
then there is a long droll fellow, who insisted on joining us at
Albanyprobably a runaway slave; he makes great fun for the
soldiers, and is the very pet of the Indians; he is as strong, too,
they say, as the giant Goliath.
Ki! Massa Hen
reek!
exclaimed a familiar voice at this
moment
in Huntington's ear, while the rapid evolutions of a body
turning
a somerset at his side, attracted his attention. Oh jingo! if
dis don't beat all nater! Oh Massa Henreek, but dis is de
'markablest
luck dat ebber was.
Amazed at the appearance of the seemingly ubiquitous African,
Huntington for some moments scarcely found voice to address him;
but he extended his hand at length, cordially, to the negro, smiling
as he spoke.
Remarkable, indeed, Harry! he said; what in the world has
brought you here, and how is it that you did not return to New
York, as you intended?
I wuz waitin', Mass Henreek, at Albany for de opptoonity, when
I hare of dis ere 'speditiondey stop daredey say dey come to
take Castle Mountain; it frighten me berry much, kaze I t'ought
of you and Missa Blanche, and Missa Emily, and I didn't know what
might happen, and I t'ought I better come alongI 'clare, Massa
Henreek, I berry glad to see you.
And I am very glad to see
you
, Harry! This is the second
time we have met most unexpectedly; I hope we shall not part
again until we return together to New York.
Ki! Massa Henrich, but I tickled to hare you say dat: ony let
me stay by you, and I can do any tingbut tell-a me, what you
trampoose about so much alone for? I find you, afore, all alone in
de woods.
Then, replied Huntington, I was the victim of guile and
treachery: where you found me, Carlton had deserted me, forcing
me to quit his boat, a crime which has since been followed by others,
still worse; you shall know more of it, perhaps, hereafter.
Harry listened with marked attention to this brief exposition, but
made no other reply than might be contained in an expressive shake
of the head and a harsh grating of the teeth.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
O'er the rolling waves we go,
Where the stormy winds do blow,
To quell with fire and sword the foe.
Old Song
.
As
the evening advanced, and Henrich was contemplating
retirement
for the rest which he so much needed, he was surprised and
delighted to hear orders issued for re-embarking, and on seeking for
the cause of so unexpected a movement, he encountered the polite
Major Bain, who was personally superintending the preparations.
We travel by night, you perceive, Mr. Huntington, he said;
our camp was pitched at dawn, and you must allow that our Indian
guides have selected an unequalled hiding-place here for an army,
where no intruder could discover us, without being first seen by our
sentinels.
I have neither seen nor heard of any sentinels, replied
Henrich, and have been wondering at your remissness in that
respect.
They saw
you
, however, I assure you, full half an hour before
you so valorously invaded us, said the major, smiling; there are
a dozen glowing eyes on each of these hills, sleepless as the stars,
and commanding every point of the compass; I can well believe
that you have not seen them, for if they were wrapt in that magic
mantle which is said to confer invisibility, they would not be less
easily found; in fact, I don't know exactly where they are myself;
my friend Kogegogey there, with the black feather, planted them,
and will bring them in, I presume, presently with some forest
signal.
Major Bain offered Huntington a seat in his own boat, and
everything
being in readiness, the fleet started at about eight o'clock, and
pursued their way with great rapidity. The ardor of the
commanding
officer would scarcely permit him to confine his travel to the
night, which, indeed, in its earlier stages he had not done; but as
he came farther north, his Indian counsellors had urged the point
as so certainly essential to the project of surprising the garrison at
Montaigne, that he had yielded to their advice. Let but one distant
eye, they said, catch a sight of the armament, and scores of runners,
fleet as the wind, would bear the news to the baron far in advance
of their approach.
If Henrich had exulted at the unexpected embarkation of the
army, his fears all returned when he comprehended the commander's
design; for on the ensuing day at noon, terminated the stipulated
time, at the end of which Blanche had promised to become the
bride of Carlton, and he well knew that the marriage would not be
deferred materially beyond that time. Major Bain intended to invest
the castle silently by night, and as it was impossible, with any speed
which they could command, to reach it before the ensuing morning,
it could only be after another day's delay and concealment that
they would approach the walls. That day, alas, Henrich had reason
to apprehend, would be fatal to all his hopes, and the returning light
which had illumined his heart, again gave way to the inroads of
despair.
The commander had resolved, however, to make his next
encampment
as near the castle as prudence would permit, in order to learn
by espionage its situation and means of defence, relying upon the
sagacity of his Indian allies to ensure meanwhile his own
concealment
,
and he succeeded greatly to his satisfaction, in attaining and
entering the mouth of the Sorelle, just as the waning stars
proclaimed
the approach of day. Two hours more of darkness would
13
have enabled him, unseen, to place his forces at once under the walls
of the enemy, but he did not greatly regret the delay, as his men
were jaded with toil, and required rest to fit them for service.
As before, a favoring locality was found, for a secret camp, in a
very dense part of the forest, about eight miles south of the castle,
and here every precaution was taken to avoid discovery, sentinels
being posted in hiding-places on every side, so that any wanderer
who should be unfortunate enough to stray near the foe, would be
tenfold more likely to be caught and conveyed into their midst than
to escape and carry the tidings.
For several hours Major Bain was content to keep close in his
spider-like retreat, well satisfied that there seemed no prospect of his
being disturbed, but as the day advanced he resolved to send forth
an emissary to the neighborhood of the castle to observe its
condition
.
There was no difficulty in finding a messenger for such an
errand among the valorous and crafty savages, who delighted in any
achievement involving cunning and adroitness, and the
commission
fell upon a young Mohawk Brave, who was celebrated for
sagacity. Being allowed to select a companion for his enterprise,
his choice, to the great chagrin of his brethren, fell upon Harry, who
could see, he said, as well as an Indian, and was three times as
strong.
It was nearly noon when they left the camp, and proceeded in a
canoe down the river about four miles, where they left their boat
concealed, and taking opposite sides of the stream, continued their
way on foot, carrying of course their usual weapons. They had been
instructed to learn whether there were any Indian villages on the
route to the castle, and it was for this purpose that they had
separated
,
pursuing thenceforward independent courses, and expecting
only to re-unite at nightfull at their canoe, after having completed
their separate explorations.
Harry went about a mile further on his lonely way, and was
proceeding
cautiously through the forest, about a dozen rods from the
river side, when a sudden noise arrested his attention, and caused
him to drop, skulking, among the thick bushes. Looking warily out
from his covert, he saw a single horseman approaching at a slow
amble through the woods, in the direction of a beaten path which
led from the interior diagonally to the river. The road, if such it
could be called, passed about twenty yards from the negro's place of
concealment, and Harry, remaining silent, entertained no fears of
discovery, more especially as the equestrian, so far from seeming
observant
or watchful, had an air of perfect ease and unconcern. As
he drew nearer, the eyes of the vigilant African, which had been
fixed unwaveringly upon him, dilated to a prodigious extent, and his
surprise found vent in the whispered words,
Golly! if it aint de count!
The count it certainly was, who, as has been related, was
returning
at this hour from his interview with the Algonquin Indian, and
was riding towards the castle, deeply wrapt in the contemplation of
his approaching wedding.
I aint afraid of
him
, any way, said Harry; but den he mustn't
see me, else he gib de alarmunlessunlessoh, jingo! and the
negro clutched his large hands together, as if unable to restrain a
wish that had suddenly formed in his mind.
He got pistols, continued the soliloquist; but dat aint nottin,
nottin at all; be quick, Harry! make up your mind! he said,
apostrophizing himself; see, he almost here! he put Massa
Henreek
ashore, you know; golly,
I'll do it!
and the negro leaped
like some wild animal, headlong from his lair, and, at three bounds,
stood in front of the count, with one huge hand grasping the bridle
of the rearing and plunging steed. The frightened rider, scarce able
to tell whether his assailant was man or beast, was vainly trying to
draw a pistol from his belt, when the disengaged hand of Harry was
on his arm, and he felt himself dragged forcibly from his seat.
Come a you down off dere, said the negro, and go along
wiv me; dere's a gempleman ober here want to see you; and
Carlton landed, shaking, at his side.
Dis-a-way, ef you please, continued the negro, quickly regaining
his gun, which he had dropped on the ground, and starting at once
towards the English camp with his prisoner, while the freed horse
scampered rapidly off; dis ere is de waycome along!
Harry's motions had been so rapid and impetuous, that it was not
until Carlton was whirled along in his powerful grasp that he found
voice to speak; and although he now began to pour forth a most
voluble tide of ejaculations and prayers, they were in a language
unintelligible
to Harry; and if it had been otherwise, they would
scarcely have interrupted the flow of his own congratulatory
soliloquy
.
I got himdat a fact, he said; and then, looking back for an
instant, I wish I brought de horse along; but nebber mindI got
de count. What dat you say? more blue? yhah! yhah! it will be
more blue dan dis for you, old boy!
Carlton recognised his captor, at length, and his terror increased,
if possible, when he did so; for although he had no suspicion of the
causes which had led to his misfortune, he did not doubt that his
dreaded rival was at hand, and that the vengeance which conscious
guilt told him was deserved, was destined now to overtake him.
The discovery made him frantic with fear; and finding his reiterated
appeals to the negro unheeded, he grew courageous enough to
suddenly
draw a pistol with his disengaged hand; for Harry, in his
utter contempt of the little weapons, had forgotten to take possession
of them. He observed the motion, however, in time to strike down
the arm of the prisoner before any harm was effected, and snatching
the pistols, he flung them with sudden wrath over the tree-tops.
Gosh, he said, you grow 'fract'ry, hay? here, den, I'll show
you; and the negro, taking from his shoulder one of a pair of
thick leathern suspenders, proceeded to bind the wrists of the count
tightly together; after which, clutching him again by the arm, he
hurried along. A weary walk of five miles was before the pinioned
man, for Harry did not consider himself at liberty to take the boat
without the Indian's permission, and he reflected, moreover, that he
would be far less liable to observation or interruption, in the woods,
than on the river; he was a good pedestrian, however, and compelling
his companion to nearly equal his own prodigious strides, the distance
was soon overcome.
It was with no little surprise that Major Bain and his fellow
officers
beheld the negro returning to the camp with a prisoner of so
distinguished appearance, and Henrich's astonishment and exultation
cannot easily be imagined. He had not felt himself called upon to
interfere with the movements of Harry, who had regularly joined the
army at Albany, of his own volition, after being discharged from
Huntington's service, and upon whom, indeed, he had not now the
right to enjoin neutrality or inaction, if he had desired.
Carlton's amazement at finding himself in the camp of an invading
enemy was without bounds; yet his alarm was rather diminished
than increased, for he was now a prisoner of war, and not, as he had
anticipated, the victim of personal retribution. He at once announced
his name and rank, and claimed the privilege of his parole, which
Major Bain, with a politeness that transcended his discretion,
promptly
accorded. That gallant officer was incapable of suspecting a
depth of infamy in his prisoner which would render his word of
honor an insufficient barrier to his escape, while, perhaps, the
inconvenience
of confining him, and the difficulty of flight, if attempted,
contributed to a leniency, which, in the peculiar situation of the
invading
force, was at least impolitic.
Harry, who looked upon Carlton as peculiarly his prize, was by
no means satisfied with the result, which he was quite unable to
comprehend, and he continued to follow his released captive at a
little distance about the camp, seldom removing his eyes from him,
and indulging not infrequently in his accustomed mode of thinking
aloud.
He look as if he wuz loose, he said, peering curiously at the
arms and feet of the Frenchman. Dey say he got a
parole
on him
somewhere, but I can't see itgolly, dey better lef de 'spender on,
by half!
When a soldier, with whom he conversed on the subject, had in
some degree succeeded in explaining the nature of the invisible
fetters which were supposed to bind the count, the African shook
his head with marked significance.
May be it will hold him, he said, angrily; but why dey no
leave de 'spender on, and put anudder on his ancles, and den let him
go on his parole, ef he want to?Blazes!
The Mohawk returned at dusk, and reported that he had been
within pistol shot of Castle Montaigne, and had lain concealed an
hour watching the movements of its inmates. There was no
appearance
of alarm, he said, or of any unusual vigilance; the principal
gate was open, and there was much passing in and out, especially of
the Hurons, who seemed to be dressed and painted for a powow;
soldiers were lounging idly around the walls, and he had even seen
the King of the Hurons talking with a chief in the gateway. He
had discovered no Indian villages on the western side of the river,
but had judged there was a Huron settlement on the eastern shore,
and north of the castle, having seen numbers of that tribe approach
and depart in that direction. The castle walls, he said, were of earth
and timber, not more than two soldiers high, and hinted that they
could be scaled by half the army, by a sort of leap-frog operation,
over the shoulders of their fellows, a somewhat novel mode of
storming
a fortress, which Major Bain promised to take into consideration.
He manifested much satisfaction at the intelligence received, and
issued orders that everything should be in readiness for departure
at the hour of ten.
CHAPTER XXXIV.
Bellario
.Are you not ill, my lord?
Philaster
.Illno, Bellario.
Bellario
.Methinks your words
Fall not from off your tongue so evenly,
Nor is there in your looks that quietness
That I was wont to see.
Beaumont and Fletcher. Tragedy of Philaster
.
The
prolonged absence of the count excited a surprise at the
castle, which, as the day began to wane, grew into solicitude, and
finally into serious anxiety. Messengers were despatched in every
direction in search of him, and the baron, pacing the court of his
castle with a perturbed air, awaited their return, and instituted
meanwhile the closest inquiry of all his adherents as to the time and
place in which the expected bridegroom had last been seen.
He is coming, my lord, said one, entering with breathless haste
while these investigations were pending; he is coming under
whip and spur, down the river road, just this side the woods; you
can see him from the west gate.
A crowd rushed to the gateway, and the baron beheld with
joy, for a moment, the distant spectacle which was pointed out to
him; but as the equestrian drew near it soon became evident that
it was not the count. A soldier, one of the searching party, had
found the freed horse in the woods, and mounting him, had galloped
home to convey the alarming intelligence. The utmost consternation
now prevailed; another large detachment of soldiers and Indians
was sent out to search for the lost rider, to whom some casualty was
supposed to have happened, but one which it was yet hoped might
not prove of a serious character.
Ignorant for a while of the alarm, Blanche had remained in her
room in painful expectation of the approaching ceremony, for the
friendly stupor which had so long deadened her sensibilities had
passed away, and left her keenly alive to all her sufferings. Emily
brought to her the first tidings of Carlton's singular absence, exciting
great astonishment, and a vague anticipation of relief which she was
still unwilling to build upon the hope of a disaster to a fellow being.
Not so, however, with Emily, who could not conceal the
complacency
with which she contemplated the subject, and enumerated
the various fatal accidents that might have befallen the missing man.
It is very shocking, of course, she said, but he has doubtless
been thrown, and had his neck dislocated; they can't re-set necks, I
believe, can they? Or else, perhaps, some of the Hurons have
way-laid
him, and they always make sure work of what they take in
handit is awful, certainlybut he's probably dead!
Myrtle displayed much anxiety, and shuddered at the levity of
Miss Roselle; a suspicion had taken possession of her mind, not
unnatural
to one to whom tales of murder and revenge were familiar
as household words. Who knew, she asked, that Mr. Huntington
had really departed? might he not be lurking in the wilderness,
and might not his hand?
Mr. Huntington is no assassin! answered Blanche, indignantly,
yet not unalarmed at the horrid suspicion; he is incapable of such
an act.
Nay, I said not that he had slain him, replied the abashed
girl; but he may have carried him off, or
There is some new commotion below, interrupted Emily, looking
from the window into the court of the castle; a crowd is entering
the gate, led by the Lynx; see! the baron advances to meet them,
and the Indian is talking and gesticulating with much earnestness;
now he stoops and marks something on the ground; look! it
is the track of a large foot; now he holds up some little broken
sticks, which he has brought with him; what can it mean? Wait,
while I run and learn; I will be back in a minute.
Emily departed; and while both Blanche and Myrtle were yet
trembling with the violence of their excitement, and watching the
movements below, she returned.
The Huron, she said, quickly, has followed the trail of the
horse in the woods to a place where the ground and leaves are much
trampled, and where there are frequent marks of a huge foot, and
also of the count's well known steps; the horse has reared, he says,
for there are deep dents in the soil, made by his hind shoes.
Besides
all this, she said, breathlessly, the trail of the men leads
southerly from that spot, and that of the horse in another direction;
three experienced path-finders are on the track, accompanied by a
hundred men, and further news is expected every moment.
Myrtle turned pale as she listened, and left the room without
reply
,
while Blanche, greatly moved, continued to gaze, expectantly,
from the window.
The Lynx had made his discoveries in the presence of others who
had also discerned the signs which he had so plainly construed;
and as they could not be kept secret, nor the chase restrained, he
had done all that he could to retard it, by returning to the castle
with the intelligence, leaving the pursuers to the guidance of less
experienced trail-seekers than himself. For if Harry Bolt had left
an engraved card on the scene of his exploit, bearing his name in
full, it could not more distinctly have revealed his presence to
enlightened
eyes, than his footsteps had done to the Lynx. There
was, indeed, no mistaking the sign; the Indian knew every curve
and angle of the prodigious track, and the very number of the
hobnails
in either heel; he had seen it on the banks of the Hudson, on
the day of his first singular interview with Harry, and had perused
it with unabated interest at every subsequent landing-place on their
13*
joint route. How it came on the shore of the Sorelle, he considered
it no part of his province to determine;
but there it was
, as legible
as a signature or a countenance. The negro, he supposed, had in
some way followed his master, and encountered him on his return,
and they had together planned and executed the recent adventure,
which he considered a gallant and daring act, every way justifiable,
and he was by no means desirous to assist in defeating it. Yet, if
he had apprehended for a moment the true state of affairs, no one
would have been more prompt in repelling the approaching invasion
of his country, at whatever sacrifice of personal feelings.
The baron remained in a state of momentarily increasing
agitation
,
awaiting and receiving the successive tidings that reached him
from the forest; but the night began to close in without anything
decisive being heard, and an hour after dark a few of the pursuing
party returned to the castle with the intelligence that they had
followed
the trail four miles, until the darkness prevented further search,
and that the main body of pursuers had encamped in the woods,
ready to resume their quest with the first return of light.
The count, in the meantime, as the hour for the embarkation of
the invaders arrived, finding himself not only unguarded, but
seemingly
unwatched, began to contemplate the project of escape. One
hour's warning, he knew, would enable the baron not only to make
a successful defence of his post, but probably to utterly discomfit his
foes, while without it everything would be irremediably lost. To
retrieve his own fortunes, to avenge himself fully on Henrich and
the exulting negro, and to close the exciting drama of his adventures
by his own final triumph, what was there that he would not do to
accomplish ends like these? Should an idle punctilio restrain him
from reaping such a harvest of advantages? He had passed his
word of honor, indeed; but was it not to a treacherous foe, who
were themselves advancing stealthily upon their adversaries, with
strategy and guile? Had he not himself been artfully and
surreptitiously
captured, and in no fair and open combat? Such were
some of the arguments with which the count fortified his growing
resolution; for when did infamy or crime ever lack extenuation in
the breast of its perpetrator?
The danger attending the deed scarcely occurred to his mind, for
although he knew the penalty to which it would technically render
him liable if the English should prove successful, and he should
again fall into their hands, he did not conceive such a result possible,
if the baron were once fully apprised of his peril; and he
apprehended
,
in no event, any extremity of punishment from the urbane
officer, who had already shown so marked a consideration for his
prisoner's rank and title. The risk, indeed, was slight in comparison
with the vast benefits in prospect, and so busy was the captive in
calculating the practicability of his scheme, and in overcoming the
obstacles in its way, that he scarcely looked beyond.
A seeming opportunity at length occurred in the bustle of
departure
;
the vigilant Harry, his self-constituted guide, had been separated
from him in the order of embarkation, and while the boats were put
in readiness, and were receiving their respective occupants, Carlton
stepped backward a little and observing that the movement was
unnoticed, glided silently into the deeper shade of the forest, and
then quickened his pace. In another moment he was running
plunging deeper into the sheltering woodsskulking through its
densest shades, and listening with terror to the fancied sounds of
pursuit. The escape was almost instantly discovered, yet no one
could tell the precise time of the prisoner's departure, or the direction
he had taken; it was at once reported to the commanding officer,
whose astonishment was unbounded, and yet was not greater than
his wrath.
It is idle to pursue, he said; we must quicken our speed and
try to outstrip the scoundrel; yet our ignorance of the channel will
impede us; was ever such infamy heard of? A gentlemana
countand a commissioned officer, forfeiting his pledged honor!
let me but take the lying knave once more, and if he escape his
deserts again, mine shall be the blame!
CHAPTER XXXV.
Ho! sound the tocsin from my tower
And fire the culverin,
Bid each retainer arm with speed,
Call every vassal in.
Albert G. Greene
.
It
was a little before midnight that the exhausted count arrived
at the castle gate, and ere he had succeeded in obtaining admittance
the intelligence of his return had been diffused in every direction
through the court, along the walls, and in every apartment of the
building; so that by the time he had gained the principal hall, he
was surrounded by an eager throng of soldiers, Indians, and
domestics
,
who pressed unreproved around him, to hear the story of his
wonderful abduction and escape. Into the midst of this excited
crowd rushed the delighted baron, just as with faint and panting
voice Carlton was inquiring for him, while beckoning with one hand
to keep his motley retinue back.
Joy! joy! sir count, for your escape, exclaimed Montaigne;
though from what danger we do not yet know; we have had
great alarm
My lord! my lord! gasped the pallid count, there is an
English army, six hundred strong, almost at your gates; I have been
their prisoner and am but just escaped; they advance by the river,
and may be under your walls in half an hour!
Let the drum beat to arms! shouted Montaigne, with
sudden animation and alarm, yet, no! Lieutenant Leighton, muster
the men in perfect silence; see that the guns are trebly manned;
place fifty musketeers on the western walls; quick, ho! extinguish
these lights, and let every man to his post in silence. You, Francis
and Mallory, fly to the Lynx and warn him of the danger; let
another of your men, lieutenant, mount my best horse and speed to
Anak with the news; Windfoot, you also may goaway! away!
by St. Francis, but we will give them a reception they little dream
ofbut, hark! what noises are these?
My lord, said a soldier, rushing breathlessly in, the castle is
attacked! an enemy is scaling the walls, and forming in the court,
and three of the guns are already in their possession; Sergeant Grill
is rallying the men and making a stand in front of the south wing,
but he has only thirty men
Tell him to
charge
if he has but six! shouted the baron;
quick, form your men, and follow, Leighton; I will stay them till
you come! and, springing through the doorway, in a moment he
stood beside Grill, in front of the little band who had dauntlessly
opposed themselves to tenfold their number. The darkness,
however
,
had favored the minority, whose weakness was concealed, while
the loud prompt accents in which the sergeant's orders were issued,
conveyed the idea that they were directed to a company of
considerable
strength, and induced the English commander to forbear an
attack, until more of his own men were assembled.
What say you? cried the major, repeating a summons which
had already been made upon the sergeant; will you surrender, and
save bloodshed? You are quite in my power; I have five hundred
men, and I cannot answer for my Indian allies, if resistance is
made.
On what terms? asked Montaigne, anxious to gain time, yet
speaking in tones of defiance which belied his professed willingness
to negotiate,On what terms do you ask me to give up this castle
of my sovereign, and who is it that makes the demand?
My lord baron, replied the Englishman, for such, if I mistake
not, is the person I am addressing; I am Major Bain, in the service
of Her Majesty, the Queen, and their Excellencies the governors of
New York and New England; I have travelled fast and far to pay
you a visit, and I now demand an instant surrendry of your post,
without other terms and conditions than those which necessarily
pertain to civilized warfare; all who are taken will be regarded as
prisoners of war, with the exception of a person styling-himself Count
Carlton, who to-day forfeited his parole of honor in my camp, and who,
if taken, will be hung: I give you two minutes to answer!
Now by all the saints, but this is too insolent! replied Montaigne,
as his lieutenant silently ranged about eighty armed men beside his
little corps, yet scarcely swelling his force to a hundred; know
then, Major Bain, if such you be, that you are caught in a trap; we
have had ample notice of your coming, and have intentionally
permitted
you, unopposed, to scale our walls; four hundred of his
majesty's troops stand this moment at my sidesix hundred of our
Indian allies await my call without the gates. Fool! did you think
to surprise as old a warrior as I, or to take Castle Montaigne with
less than a regiment? I now summon
you
to surrender, and give
you but
one
minute to decide! Present arms!
This ingenious falsehood, and the bold manner in which it was
asserted, struck alarm into the heart of Major Bain, for he did not
know how long Carlton's return had preceded his own arrival, and
feared that he had really become the victim of that individual's
treachery. There was danger also that a panic might be created
among his men, which would prove highly disastrous, and a moment
of most painful incertitude and indecision passed, during which he
hesitated whether to await an attack or to commence one.
But the voice of the undisciplined Harry was at this moment heard,
as he approached skulkingly from the direction of the French force,
where he had been on a sort of private exploring expedition, being
shielded from observation by the night-like hue with which Nature
had invested him.
Oh dat's a whopper, massa major! he said, I jis been right
ober dare 'mong 'em, looking for de count; dare aint more'n fifty
on 'em, 'pon honor!
We have certain intelligence of your strength, my lord, now
retorted the Englishman promptlyyou cannot deceive us! once
more I demand, will you spare the lives of your followers, and avert
the scenes of horror which must ensue, when once the Indians are
engaged? My men are impatient for the attack, nor shall I restrain
them another minute.
Let the signal be given for our allies to advance through the
north gate! Fire! shouted Montaigne, and almost in the same
breath, a volley was given and returned, and the coincident order to
charge, range from the lips of the opposing commanders. For a few
minutes a dreadful encounter ensued in which the clashing of
bayonets
,
the shrieks of the wounded, the yells of the Indians, and the
stentorian voices of the officers, outsounding the combined clamor,
rang with varied and terrific tones through the air. Montaigne
raged like a Lybian lion in the front of his little band, dealing death
on every side with his single arm, and driving back the invaders at
a dozen points, who, wherever his towering form was seen, and his
hoarse shouts were heard, quailed and wavered as if before the onset
of some supernatural foe. The darkness favored his attacks, and
added to the mystic dread with which he was regarded by men, to
whom his exploits, exaggerated by fame, had long been the themes
of familiar story; while the Indians scarcely ventured near enough to
his person, to hurl the charmed hatchets which had been prepared
by incantation to penetrate his supposed enchanted armor. His
followers, inspirited by his presence and example, performed prodigies
of valor, and were emulous to gain his cheers and approval, which
were repeatedly bestowed even in the heat of the conflict. Many of
the Iroquois warriors retreated, and stood clustered behind the main
body of the combatants awaiting the issue, and the moment when, if
successful, their own bloody work of extermination might begin;
but the English soldiers displayed a bravery, which more than
compensated for the defection of their allies. If they faltered, they
rallied; if they wavered, it was but to renew their attacks more
vigorously than before, under the calm encouraging orders of their
leader, who like his competitor shrank from no danger, and although
severely wounded, remained in the midst of the
mle
.
But the contest was too unequal to be of long duration; the
French party, despite their valor, was rapidly thinned, and was in
momentary danger of being hemmed in on every side, when the
baron issued orders to fall back, and a rapid retreat was effected into
the main hall of the castle, while the shouts of the enemy rang long
and loud through the air, waking the distant echoes in reply. They
promptly pursued, but the massive door which closed behind the
flying garrison withstood for a moment their attacks, and in another
minute a dozen windows were bristling with the protruded guns of the
soldiery from within, and a destructive fire was opened on the
invaders
,
which caused them in turn to retreat, and seek some safer mode
of attack. This, unfortunately for the besieged party, was of easy
procurement; the guns upon the walls were in the undisputed
possession
of the invaders, and it only remained to turn them upon the
castle with a certainty of its speedy demolition, unless by a
sortie
, or
by aid from without, the weaker party might yet obtain relief.
Incited to wrath by the desperate resistance which he had met
from so small a force, Major Bain was not tardy in availing himself
of the advantages which he now possessed; the cannon were brought
to bear on the doors and windows of the main hall and the south
wing of the building, in which the soldiery were concentrated, and,
before firing, the castle was once more summoned to a surrender.
A voice, which was recognised as the baron's, demanded from an
open casement, on what terms a capitulation was asked, or would be
received, and although the proposition betrayed a sense of his
desperate
condition, his words and accents were still more defiant than
conciliatory.
On no terms, replied Bain, wrathfully, other than those which
have been already named; the captured to be treated as prisoners
of war, but death to Count Carlton!
Death to Count Carlton!death to Count Carlton!
was
repeated
by a hundred hoarse throats, in a sullen shout, which told
how deeply incensed were the enemy towards him, and how much
of their loss they imputed to his baseness.
I will consult with my officers, replied Montaigne, dissembling
his rage, and hoping momentarily for a diversion from without by an
Indian force under command of the Lynx, who could not have failed,
he thought, to hear the tumult of the battle; I will consult with
my officers, and give you my answer speedily; if you are really
desirous of saving life
Our matches are lighted, and by all the saints in your Popish
calendar, I swear I will not wait one minute for an answer, replied
Bain.
Then
fire!
shouted the baron, to his men, a part of whom had
been stationed, during the colloquy, at upper windows, which
admitted
of their again, to some extent, commanding the enemy's
position;
Fire
, and let the dogs feel your strengthin three
minutes we shall have relief.
The scene which ensued was terrific beyond description. The
feeble volley of the garrison, which served but to reveal, by its
flashing
light, the location of the doors and windows, and enabled the
gunners to aim their pieces aright, was followed by the roar of
artillery, by the crashing of pannels and casements, the jingling of
glass, the groans of the dying, and the screams of the affrighted
inmates
of every part of the building, which rang in prolonged and
wailing accents, awaking pity even in the stern hearts which caused
their misery.
There is no harm done, my boys! exclaimed Montaigne,
springing
back to the window from which he had momentarily retreated;
that noise will wake up the Hurons, and in a few minutes we shall
have them with us; give them another round, my bull-dogs! and
be sure to aim towards the guns.
His orders were obeyed, and the firing was again returned by a
discharge of cannon more destructive than the former, accompanied
by a volley of small arms, from some protected position on the walls;
but scarcely had the roar of the guns died away when a messenger
entered from a lower room to say that a dozen men had been killed
by the shot, including Sergeant Grill, and that Lieutenant Leighton
was dangerously wounded.
I am sorry for it! replied the baron, but those who remain
must fight the harder; now, my boys! but as he spoke, he
staggered
backwards and dropped into the arms of his men, while
another peal of musketry rang from without.
Lieutenant Leighton says he has not twenty men alive below,
my lord! said another messenger, entering hastily. He is himself
dying, and he, therefore, takes the liberty of begging that you will
spare the men and surrender.
Never! gasped the baron; neverwill Isurrender! There
will soonbe help
He was borne to a couch which stood in the apartment and
deposited upon it; a surgeon in attendance bent for a few moments
above him, feeling meanwhile of his pulse; then turning sadly to the
messenger, he said, Tell Lieutenant Leighton that he commands
this fortress! and a groan of anguish burst from the stout hearts,
who, suspending their labors, had gathered around their fallen lord.
The wounded lieutenant received the intelligence with great
emotion
,
and hastened to follow his own convictions of duty by instantly
surrendering the castle into the hands of his victorious enemy, who
proceeded to take possession and receive the submission of the
surviving
soldiery. The destruction of life on both sides had been
great, but the loss of the besieged party had been far larger in
proportion to their number than that of the English. The Indians,
as had been anticipated, were with some difficulty restrained from
falling upon the prisoners, none being more forward in this fiendish
desire than those who had done the least towards achieving the
victory.
Major Bain gave orders for the interment of the dead, and the
care of the wounded, and placing a strong guard on the walls and
at the gates, directed his men to hold themselves in readiness for a
march at dawn against the neighboring Huron settlement. Count
Carlton not appearing among the prisoners, he ordered a diligent
search to be made for him among the fallen, and in every part of
the castle. He paid a visit to the remains of the baron, in which
solemn presence he encountered the half-distracted Blanche, and
Myrtle, with Emily and the baroness, and several of the priests and
domestics, to all of whom he gave assurances of protection, until
the morrow, and permission then to depart to Montreal, or to such
other French post as they might choose, and to take with them the
body of the baron, or to bestow upon it, before leaving, such fitting
burial as the time and place would permit.
It will be my duty, he said, amidst the interrupting sobs and
groans of his auditors, to destroy the castle before leaving, and I
shall be therefore under the necessity of hastening your departure.
But the severely wounded and dying? interposed a venerable
priest: they who can neither accompany you as prisoners, nor go
with us? Surely you will make some provision for men who require
both medical aid, and the consolations of religion.
I have not overlooked their necessities, replied the major
humanely; a portion of the barracks will be left standing for their
accommodation, and such of your order who desire, can remain with
them; doubtless, also, some of your Indian allies will come to their
assistance, after we have departed.
The chapel, if your honor pleases, will better accommodate
them, replied another, anxious to preserve a building hallowed by
many sacred associations.
The chapel will be destroyed, replied Bain, in tones that
admitted of no remonstrance,it is a strong building, and might
itself be turned into a fort.
Blanche was with difficulty induced to withdraw from the side of
her deceased parent, and to seek that quietude and restoration which
her shocked and agitated heart required. Her grief for her father
was most intense, despite all his harshness and severity towards her,
and was aggravated by the thought that her own conduct, although
dictated by the strictest sense of duty, had contributed to his fate by
engrossing his attention, and thus causing a remissness and
relaxation
of his ordinary vigilance in defence of his post.
Scarcely had she reached her own room, when the astonishing
intelligence was brought to her that Mr. Huntington was among the
conquering army, and desired to be permitted to speak to her; but
the consolation which the knowledge of his presence would
otherwise
have imparted, was now lost in the dreadful thought that he
had been an actor in the scenes which had resulted so tragically to
her nearest relative; nay, that perhaps his agency had chiefly caused
the success of the attack. Was it possible, she asked herself, that
he had been capable of using the knowledge which he had gained,
during his stay at the castle, to aid in its overthrow, and in the
destruction and subjugation of her friends and countrymen? True
he had been greatly wronged and oppressed by that haughty and
powerful man, who was now turned to clay, harmless as its kindred
clods, but there was no justification for revenge, and above all for a
revenge which included the innocent with the guilty. The thought
that Henrich had been thus culpable was agonizing beyond
endurance
,
and a confirmation of her suspicions must not only place a
barrier between them which no time could remove, but would
crumble
,
at a blow, her bright ideal of human excellence and worth.
But Henrich came, and all these apprehensions were dispelled;
he hastened, indeed, unaccused, to disclaim the very acts of which
she had so much reason to suspect him, and to place his conduct in
the irreproachable light, which truth admitted and required. He
had neither by advice nor action contributed in the slightest degree
to the surprise or capture of the castle; he had entered within the
walls with that portion of the enemy to whom the gates had been
opened by the scaling party, and had remained a passive spectator
of the scenes which ensued. Unspeakable was Miss Montaigne's
relief to learn these gratifying factsto learn that it was in reality
as a prisoner of the invading army, and not as an enemy, or as a
retributor of private wrongs, that Henrich had returned; and she
rejoiced that now, in the midst of the horrors which surrounded her,
she might still look for advice, consolation, and support, to one who
had so often before shown his willingness and ability to aid her.
Yet she did not forget amidst this returning calm, that her plighted
promise to wed the count was still binding upon her, if he yet lived,
and should claim its fulfilment. The decease of her father, so far
from releasing her from the obligation, had given to it additional
force. It was a promise
to the dead
, who could not claim its
performance
,
who could not reproach her for dereliction, and thus it
became doubly imperative. She shuddered as this dreadful
remembrance crossed her mind, but banished it for a time, with some
indefinite hope of relief.
The fate of Carlton, meanwhile, remained undiscovered. He had
taken but little part in the engagement, and it was supposed that,
impelled by the consciousness of his peculiar danger, he had fled to
the forest before the gates were fully in the possession of the foe.
Major Bain was greatly disappointed at not finding him; he did not
believe, however, that he had escaped, and ordered the strictest
vigilance to prevent his passing out, either in disguise or otherwise, if
he was yet within the fort.
In the morning he carried out the plan of action on which he had
resolved; he attacked the Huron village (from which the warriors
and other inhabitants, warned of his approach, and conscious of their
inability to withstand him, had fled with their effects), and burned
it to the ground, destroying at the same time, with the cruel policy
of war, the growing harvests around it. He next fired the chapel,
having first permitted the weeping priests to remove what they
chose of its sacred contents, and while its lurid flames were gilding
the heavens, the torches were preparing for the nobler pile, which
had so long been the ornament and pride of the now rapidly
desolated district.
Prompt and speedy movements were still essential to his complete
success: he had struck a flying blow, and it was necessary to retire
before the more inland regions could be aroused to unite with the
forces of the Lynx and Anak, and dispute his egress from the country.
The wounded prisoners were removed to that portion of the barracks
which it had been determined to spare for their benefit, and the
ladies and priests having been allowed to remove their effects, such
of the residue of the property as was portable, was speedily taken
possession of by the soldiery, and then the devouring flame was
communicated at once by a score of willing hands to as many different
parts of the edifice.
From a little distance, the now re-forming army of invaders
watched the progress of the fire, while preparing to withdraw from
the scene of their devastationsand in another part of the trampled
and blood-stained court, near the spared building, were assembled
the mournful group who had been set at liberty by their captor, and
who, being yet unprepared to depart, remained unwilling spectators
of the melancholy scene. Henrich was with these, once more at the
side of Blanche as her friend and adviser, having obtained his full
liberty by the courtesy of the English commander; yet he was not
without apprehension that the withdrawal of the army would be the
signal for the return of his rival from some lurking-place in the
wilderness. Such an event might render his own position highly
perilous in a territory where the count's authority would now perhaps
be temporarily recognised, and the more by reason of his own recent
and unreversed sentence of banishment, and the suspicions to which
he had rendered himself liable of having advised and abetted the
invaders.
But Carlton was not in the wilderness. He had heard, with
unspeakable terror, his name excepted in the offered terms of quarter
made by the English commander; he had heard these terms repeated
with the same explicit and fearful reservation; had listened to the
hoarse shouts of the soldiery applauding his anticipated doom, and
had felt, at that moment, in his coward and guilty breast, more than
the pains of death. For a while, encouraged by the confident
language of Montaigne, he had hoped for victory, and dreading the
baron's wrath and scorn for pusillanimity, had made some feint of
aiding in the contest at points where the danger was least. As the
battle went on, and its issue became more certain, he had sought to
flee, but his frightened imagination had peopled the whole court with
vigilant guards watching to intercept him, and he did not dare to
venture forth. Too frantic for reflection, he yet remembered a secret
room and its ingeniously contrived entrance which had once been
shown to him by Montaigne, and he hastened to make it at least a
temporary refuge.
In an upper chamber, a large iron chandelier was suspended from
a circular panneling in the ceiling; seemingly immovable, it could
yet be drawn down by touching a spring at the end of the rod which
supported it, and with it descended not only the panelling to which
it was attached, but an extending ladder of rope, forming an
entrance
into a room above, to which there was no other access. When
the ponderous chandelier was drawn back to its place, and the
fastening
adjusted, there was no longer any trace of the passage, and
the upper apartment, which was small, was also unexposed to
observation
from without, being lighted and ventilated only by a small
window in the roof.
To this retreat Carlton, in his terror, had fled, to avoid the
immediate
danger, for he rightly conjectured that the first movement that
followed victory would be a vigorous and diligent search for him.
He had intended to descend during the night, and in disguise or
otherwise
,
attempt an escape to the forest; but this design was defeated
by an unexpected occurrence. The chamber with which his
hiding-place
communicated was appropriated, after the engagement, to the
use of several of the wounded English soldiers, a circumstance which
their voices and groans plainly proclaimed to the entrapped count.
To discover himself to these, who imputed all their injury to his
perfidy
,
would be a betrayal to certain death. It was late in the
morning
when they were removed, and then the precincts of the castle
were swarming with the foreign soldiery, and flight was still
impossible
;
he remained half senseless in his retreat, hoping against hope
for the several contingencies which might yet save him. The enemy
might be attacked and driven off by the Indians; they might not
destroy the castle, or they might only set fire to it and depart,
without
waiting to see it consumed, and thus afford him an opportunity
of escape.
These, with other hope-woven fallacies, occupied his mind for a
while, and were only dispelled by the smell of fire, by the crackling
sound of its progress, and by the thin wreaths of smoke which began
to force themselves up through the floor of his apartment.
Appalled
,
he flew to the passage, and opening it, was met by a stifling
current of heated air; the room was in flames; he could not
descend
but to instant suffocation. Closing the aperture, he piled the
scant furniture of his room together, and from the summit of the
heap reached the skylight, and dashing it open climbed to the roof,
at once discovering the assembled multitude below, and revealing
himself to their view. A shout from the soldiery announced his
appearance
,
but the spectacle was too awful for exultation; the circling
smoke was already enveloping his figure, as he hastily traversed the
summit of the building and approached its edge, now brushing the
blinding clouds from before him, and now extending his arms, as if
imploring pity and aid from those who had no power to assist him.
Horror held motionless the beholders; but Myrtle, with a piercing
shriek, darted from the side of her friends, and rushing towards the
main entrance of the castle, disappeared within the burning pile.
The distracted baroness followed with faltering steps, but a score of
soldiers, obeying not less the impulse of their own hearts than the
quick signal of the officer, sprang past her and reached the doorway,
though only to battle for a moment with the heated vapors that
encountered
them, and fall back proclaiming the impossibility of
rescue
.
As they retreated, however, a young Mohawk brave sped past
them at a bound, and entered the hall. Unbreathing, to avoid the
stifling air, he groped for the main stairway, which he rightly judged
Myrtle had attempted to ascend, and, mounting its hot steps, gained
the first landing, and saw the white robes of the prostrate maiden
before him. To seize the light burden and bear it back to the outer
air was but the work of a second, and the prolonged shouts of the
spectators spoke their gratification, and their applause of the heroic
deed.
Myrtle was borne senseless into the barracks by her anxious
friends, and the attention of the throng, momentarily diverted by
this frightful episode, was again given to the unhappy Carlton. He
now stood at the edge of the parapet which overlooked that part of
the court where the people were assembled, and seemed to
contemplate
a leap from his dizzy height. Now he shouted for helpfor a
ladderfor a ropefor something to break his fall; now he ran
back and looked vainly into the aperture through which he had
ascended, and anon he sought to gain the less elevated roof of a
wing of the building, but was prevented by the flames, which had
already broken forth in that direction. While he hoped, and
hesitated
,
and despaired, a thick column of smoke, spangled with
sparkling
cinders, rolled towards him, and enveloping his figure in its
murky pall, concealed it from the view of the horrified spectators.
A half-stifled cry proceeded from the midst of the whirling mass,
which, growing blacker and blacker with continued accessions, and
rising higher and higher into the air, seemed like one of the
genii
of
14
oriental fable, released from the confinement of centuries, and
expanding
its gigantic bulk above the diminutive prison in which it
had been so long compressed. Now revealing, through its rent
folds its staggering victim, and now closing again around him, it
moved, with solemn gyrations, slowly onward, and passing, at length,
left the unhappy man prostrate in its path, struggling, but vainly
attempting to rise.
An Indian chief who stood by the side of Major Bain, whispered
a moment to the latter, who, unreplying, turned away with an
agitated air, and the savage, taking his silence for assent to his really
humane proposition, passed a brief word of command to a small
division of his men. A dozen rifles were raised simultaneously, and
as their sharp report rang upon the air, the body of the count rolled
lifeless down a slight descent of the roof, to a point where the greedy
flames were raging and raged higher as they received it. He had
passed from earth, and his ungathered ashes mingled with those of
his lofty funeral pyre.
In another hour the triumphing army had vanished from the
scene of their victory, and were rapidly pursuing their homeward
route; they were accompanied by the liberated Seabury, who,
having been at large on his parole, had taken no part in the combat,
although his soldier spirit had chafed at the intangible fetters which
restrained him from doing so.
Myrtle's injuries proved severe, and the intelligence of Carlton's
fate gave a shock to her mind, which added greatly to her sufferings,
and increased the peril of her situation. For several days the fair
patient remained an inmate of an apartment in the barracks,
attended with kindness and solicitude by her friends, who waited
only her convalescence to quit for ever a spot rife with the memory
of so many tragedies. Their anxious hopes in her behalf were not
disappointed, and on the third day they were enabled to set out in
boats, for Montreal, accompanied by several of the returned Hurons
as guides and assistants. The baron's remains, in the interval, had
been interred within the undemolished walls of his ruined castle,
Blanche having been prevailed on with difficulty to relinquish the
idea of transporting the body over their long and difficult journey.
The priests remained at their post faithful to the wounded men in
their charge, of whom several were evidently destined to require the
last consolations of religion and the solemn rites of sepulture at their
hands.
From such a scene of ruin and misery went Blanche and Henrich,
with Emily, Myrtle, and the baroness; their tears were many, and
their hearts were sad, some with their own bitter grief, and some
with sympathetic sorrow.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
She is mine own,
And I as rich in having such a jewel,
As twenty seas, if all their sands were pearl,
The water nectar, and the rocks pure gold.
Shakspeare
.
The
Marquis Vaudreuil received early intelligence of the
disastrous
blow which had been inflicted upon the province of New
France, and having heard that the family of his deceased friend had
taken refuge at Montreal, he promptly despatched a vessel to that
post, to convey them to the capital, where a fitting home was
meanwhile
prepared for their reception. He did not grieve deeply over
the loss of Carlton, whose evil reputation had followed him from
Paris, and had recently reached the ears of the deceived and
indignant
viceroy, causing him deeply to regret his agency in
commending
his nephew to the good will of the baron.
Months passed away, during which Huntington, who had
accompanied
his friends to Quebec, continued a resident of that city,
and an ever-welcomed friend and visitor of Miss Montaigne. They
were speedily betrothed, and ere yet the autumn had fully passed,
Henrich, unwilling that Blanche should spend the wintry season in a
clime so ungenial, had obtained her consent to an immediate union,
with a view to a journey to England and a sojourn until spring,
amid its milder airs. If inducements were needed, none could have
been presented to Blanche's mind of greater efficacy; already had
she pined, with that love of country which forms so commendable
a trait in almost every heart, to tread again the green soil and gaze
upon the bright landscapes which had been familiar to her
childhood
,
and which were ever dear to memory. They were married
without ostentation, at the mansion of the marquis, who, finding his
efforts to prolong their stay in Quebec useless, desired, with
characteristic
kindness, to give his especial sanction to their union, and to
retain the bridal party, at least for the first happy week, under his
hospitable roof.
Emily, of course, was to return with them, and Blanche, who had
acquired the most sisterly feeling for Myrtle, spared no pains to
induce her also to accompany them, but neither the baroness nor
Vaudreuil would consent to such a deprivation. The marquis,
indeed
,
who had consented to administer upon the large estate of his
friend for the benefit of the heirs, urged that her presence in the
province might be essential to his labors, and offered both herself and
her mother a welcome home in his own house. This kindness was
accepted for the time, and the sisters parted with mutual tears and
regret, for although their acquaintance had been brief, the
extraordinary
events through which they had passed had served to rapidly
develope their respective characters, and a communion of suffering
had endeared them to each other.
Henrich, Blanche, and Emily sailed for Havre, and having reached
that port in safety, they passed into the Netherlands, and thence
crossed to England. In the ensuing summer they returned to New
York, where they took up their abode, greatly to the delight of old
Jacobus, who had never ceased to reflect over his semi-hourly pipe,
upon his interview with the baffled ensign, and upon the happy
train of smoke-generated ideas which had resulted in the despatch
of Harry and Ruppy to warn the forest fugitives of their danger.
Myrtle continued to reside with the marquis, the object of much
unheeded admiration, and a mourner in heart, although not in
apparel, for the unworthy Carlton. The decease of her mother, three
years later, left her still more desolate, and peace having then been
established between France and England, she accepted an earnest
invitation from Blanche and Henrich to remove to New York, and
make their house her future home. There she became contented and
cheerful: her heart was gradually weaned from the memory of its
misapplied affection, and she became at the age of twenty-three, the
happy wife of a young English gentleman, of great worth, who
knew her whole history, and whose attachment for her was
unbounded
.
Miss Roselle remained a welcome inmate of Henrich's family, and,
professedly from choice, a member of the single sisterhood; having
relinquished, with her matrimonial aspirations, her airs and
affectation
,
it is not improbable indeed that she may have found admirers
among the many visiters of her cousins, but none, it appeared, who
possessed sufficient attractions to tempt her from what she called her
chosen path of celibacy.
The cessation of hostilities between the provinces enabled Henrich
to visit Quebec, and render more fully available to Blanche and
Myrtle their large property, of which the marquis was found to have
proved a faithful steward. There he heard of the welfare of the
Lynx and Anak, for whom, in token of his regard, he left highly
valuable presents, of the kind most likely to suit their tastes:
including among the gifts to the former, one which he knew would
be beyond price in his estimation. This was the enchanted rifle, so
called, of which, in his character as the Beaver, he had made such
effective use, and which he had now been careful to bring with him
for the benefit of his Indian friend.
The happiness of Henrich and Blanche remained unimpaired by
farther calamities; if much suffering had been crowded into a short
period of their lives, it was followed by a long exemption from
trouble. They were not even annoyed by the continued abode, in
their vicinity, of the evil man to whom so much of their misery, and
at the same time, so large a share of their felicity was owing, for in
the very year of their return to New York, Lord Cornbury was
removed from his office by his relative, the Queen, for official
oppression
and malconduct, and Grover, who was a satellite of the profligate
governor, returned with him to England.
Jacobus Waldron lived to the ripe age of ninety, and so happy
were his declining days rendered by the assiduous kindness of
Hetty's Hanreek as he was wont to call his grandson, that
hegradually
ceased looking for that sudden influx of fortune which had
been all his lifetime on the eve of overwhelming him with its golden
waves. Nay, he began to suspect, with the wisdom of age, that he
had already found more than his anticipated treasure in his faithful
and affectionate children, and his changed hopes, placed now on
worthier objects than wealth, were looking beyond those solemn
portals which Death, with no forbidding aspect, stood ready to fling
open for his exit.
Harry Bolt returned with the army of Major Bain, which did not
succeed in escaping from the French territory without some marks of
the vengeance of the Lynx and Anak, who, rallying their scattered
warriors, intercepted the invaders on the banks of the Sorelle, and
caused them no little damage. The chief triumph of the Indians,
however, was in effecting the release of the prisoners, about sixty in
number, of whom the English officer did not greatly regret to be
disencumbered.
Harry was discharged from the army with great credit and no small
bounty, and the story of his exploits soon became public in the city,
rendering him an object of general interest, and affixing upon him
for life, the highly relished
sobriquet
of Major Bolt. Jule, ever
gleeful and grinning, became his wife, and in a comfortable home,
provided by their grateful friends, they lived in much happiness,
disturbed only on the part of the negress, by imaginary calls at every
dawn, in the sharp voice of Mrs. Sniff, denouncing her as an idle
huzzy, and bidding her rise and begin her daily work. This wore
away, however, with the wearing years; Harry, who had entered
into traffic, in a small way, soon drew around him many friends,
gradually extending his business, and acquiring a competence which
soon enabled him to boast that if Jule were yet a slave, he could
purchase not only her, but her mistress also, unless the latter held
herself at a far higher valuation than did either he or Mrs. Major
Bolt.
THE END.